<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89127-0025 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.1-27-89.f2.A1024</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register </T4> / Vol. 54, No. 17 / Friday, January 27, 1989/ Rule and Regulations <ITAG tagnum="52">FEDERAL RESERVE SYSTEM </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">12 CFR Parts 208 and 225</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Reg. H, Reg. Y; Docket No. R-0628]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Capital; Risk-Based Capital Guidelines</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="44">January 18, 1989. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Federal Reserve System.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final Risk-Based Capital Guidelines.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>Since the early 1980s, the Board of Governors of theFederal Reserve System has employed minimum supervisory leverage ratiosof primary and total capital-to-total assets in assessing the capital adequacyof state-chartered banks that are members of the Federal Reserve Systemand bank holding companies (collectively, ``banking organizations''). While these ratios of capital-to-total assets have served as useful toolsfor assessing capital adequacy, the Board has determined that there isa need for a measure that is more sensitive to the risk profiles of individualbanking organizations. In this regard, the Board, together with the otherU.S. Federal banking agencies, first proposed in early 1986, and againin 1987 in conjunction with the Bank of England, the adoption of a risk-basedcapital measure that took explicit account of board differences in risksamong a banking organization's assets and off-balance sheet items. The Board deferred action on these earlier proposals in order to participatein the development of a more broadly based capital framework that wouldbe applicable to international banking organizations. As a result of consultationswith supervisory authorities from certain major industrial countries, onMarch 1, 1988, the Federal Reserve issued for public comment a revisedrisk-based capital framework that superseded the previous proposals. Therevised proposal was based upon a risk-based capital measure developedjointly by supervisory authorities from the 12 countries that are representedon the Basle Committee on Banking Regulations and Supervisory Practices.The comment period for the Federal Reserve's proposal ended on May 13,1988. The Board received comments that addressed various aspects of itsproposal from over 180 respondents. Based upon the comments received, discussionwith the other U.S. banking agencies, and further consultation with internationalsupervisory authorities, the Board has made some modifications to its March1988 proposal. The Board is now issuing in final form its revised proposal as Risk-BasedCapital Guidelines. The Board is issuing two sets of guidelines: one isapplicable to state member banks, and the other is applicable to bank holdingcompanies. The guidelines will be appended to the appropriate supervisoryregulations for those organizations_for state member banks, the Board'sRegulation H (12 CFR Part 208) and for the bank holding companies, RegulationY (12 CFR Part 225). The Board's adoption of these guidelines achieves important goals longsought by U.S. banking supervisors. First, it establishes a risk-basedcapital framework that is more sensitive than the current leverage ratiosto risk factors, including off-balance sheet exposures. Second, it encouragesinternational banking organizations to strengthen their capital positions.Finally, it mitigates a source of competitive inequity arising from differentsupervisory capital requirements across countries. These guidelines represent a major step in the process of coordinatingwith regulatory authorities or other countries to establish appropriatecapital standards for banking organizations, in accordance with the InternationalLending Supervision Act of 1983. In that regard, the Board notes that theregulatory authorities of the 12 major industrial countries intend to issueappropriate directives to those banking organizations falling under theirsupervision, in order to facilitate implementation of the risk-based capitalframework on an international basis.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>March 15, 1989. The framework for calculatingrisk-based capital ratios will take effect on March 15, 1989. As furtherdetailed below, the minimum supervisory ratios reflected in the framework'stransitional provisions become effective on December 31, 1990. The supervisoryratios in their final form become effective on December 31, 1992.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Richard Spillenkothen, DeputyAssociate Director (202/452-2594), Roger Cole, Assistant Director (202/452-2618),Stephen M. Lovette, Manager (202/452-3622, Rhoger H. Pugh, Manager (202/728-5883),Norah Barger, Senior Financial Analyst (202/452-2402), or Kelly S. Shaw,Financial Analyst (202/452-3054), Division of Banking Supervision and Regulation,Board of Governors; or J. Virgil Mattingly, Deputy General Counsel (202/452-3430),or Michael J. O'Rourke, Senior Attorney (202/452-3288), Legal Division,Board of Governors; or Andrew Spindler, Vice President (212/720-5846),Betsy B. White, Vice President (212/720-5874), Donald E. Schmid, Manager(212/720-6611) or Jeffrey Bardos, Special Assistant (212/720-7962), FederalReserve Bank of New York. For the hearing impaired <T3>only, </T3>Telecommunication Device for the Deaf, Earnestine Hill orDorothea Thompson (202/452-3544).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>supplementary information:</T2><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Supplementary Information and Background</ITAG>A. Purpose and History of the Risk-Based Capital GuidelinesIn 1986, and again in 1987 in conjunction with the Bank of England, theFederal banking agencies issued for public comment risk-based capital proposalsapplicable to U.S. banks and bank holding companies. The principal objectivesof these early proposals were: (1) To develop more systematic proceduresfor factoring on- and off-balance sheet risks into supervisory assessmentsof capital adequacy; (2) to reduce disincentives to holding liquid, low-riskassets; and (3) to foster coordination among supervisory authorities frommajor industrial countries, many of which employ risk-sensitive capitalmeasures.These risk-based capital proposals were consistent with one of the majorgoals of the International Lending Supervision Act of 1983 (``ILSA''),12 U.S.C. 3901 <T3>et seq., </T3>which was to strengthen the bank regulatory frameworkby encouraging greater coordination among regulatory authorities in differentcountries. In addition to enhancing the banking agencies' authority toestablish and enforce minimum levels of capital for U.S. banking organizations,this Act instructed those agencies to work with governments, central banks,and regulatory authorities of other countries to maintain and, where necessary,strengthen the capital positions of banking institutions involved in internationallending.The Federal Reserve deferred final action on the 1986 and 1987 proposalsin order to participate in the development of a more broadly based capitalframework that would be applicable to international banking organizationsfrom the major industrial countries. In December 1987, the Basle Committeeon Banking Regulations and Supervisory Practices (``Basle Supervisors'Committee'') issued a consultative paper (the ``Basle Accord'') containingproposals for a risk-based capital framework.\1\<NOTE/> The principal objectives of the framework were to achievegreater convergence in the measurement and assessment of capital adequacyinternationally and to strengthen the capital positions of major internationalbanking organizations. That document served as the basis for consultationsand public comment in the Group of Ten (``G-10'') countries.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ The Basle Supervisors' Committee is comprised of representativesof the central banks and supervisory authorities from the Group of Tencountries (Belgium, Canada, France, Germany, Italy, Japan, Netherlands,Sweden, Switzerland, the United Kingdom, and the United States), and Luxembourg.Domestically, the vehicle for consultation and public comment took theform of proposed risk-based capital guidelines, which were based upon theDecember 1987 Basle Accord, and which the Federal Reserve issued for publiccomment on March 1, 1988. The comment period on the proposed guidelinesformally ended May 13, 1988, although the Board continued to receive andconsider comments after that date. Over 180 comment letters were receivedthat addressed various aspects of the proposed guidelines.\2\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ A summary of the comments received is contained in a memorandumdistributed at the Federal Reserve's August 3, 1988, public meeting, atwhich the Board approved in principle certain revisions to the risk-basedcapital proposal.A number of changes were made to the December 1987 Basle Accord in lightof comments received by both domestic and foreign banking authorities andas a result of consultations among the G-10 countries. The revised July1988 Basle Accord that was endorsed by the central bank governors of theG-10 countries on July 11, 1988, reflects these changes.\3\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\ The Basle Accord is described in a paper prepared by theBasle Supervisors' Committee entitled ``International Convergence of CapitalMeasurement and Capital Standards'' dated July 1988.The Board is not issuing in final form its risk-based capital guidelines,revised in light of the public comments received in response to the March1988 proposal, the ongoing consultative process among the G-10 countries,and discussions with the other U.S. banking agencies. The Board is issuingtwo sets of guidelines: one is applicable to state member banks and theother is applicable to bank holding companies. The guidelines will be appendedto the appropriate supervisory regulations for those organizations_forstate member banks, the Board's Regulation H (12 CFR Part 208) and forbank holding companies, Regulation Y (12 CFR Part 225).These guidelines establish a systematic analytical framework that: (1)Makes regulatory capital requirements more sensitive to differences inrisk profiles among banking organizations; (2) takes off-balance sheetexposures into explicit account in assessing capital adequacy; and (3)minimizes disincentives to holding liquid, low-risk assets.The development of a risk-based framework in conjunction with supervisoryofficials from other industrial countries acknowledges the growing internationalizationof major banking and financial markets throughout the world. The harmonizationand strengthening of capital standards worldwide should contribute to amore stable and resilient international banking system and help mitigatea source of competitive inequality for international banks stemming fromdifferences in national supervisory capital requirements. In addition to international banks (to which the Basle Accord is specificallydirected), the Federal Reserve is extending the application of the risk-basedcapital framework to all other U.S. banking organizations under its jurisdiction,regardless of size (as suggested in the March 1988 proposal). The Boardbelieves that the underlying rationale behind the use of a risk-based capitalapproach applies to small domestic banking institutions as well as largeinternational banking organizations. The final guidelines contemplate, as did the March 1988 proposal, thatthe calculation of a risk-based capital ratio is only one step in evaluatingcapital adequacy. The focus of these guidelines is principally on broadcategories of credit risk, although the risk-based framework does takesome transfer risk considerations, as well as limited instances of interestrate and market risk, into account in assigning certain assets to riskcategories. The measure does not take explicit account of other factorsthat can affect an organization's financial condition, such as overallinterest rate exposure; liquidity, funding and market risks; the qualityand level of earnings; investment or loan portfolio concentrations; thequality of loans and investments; the effectiveness of loan and investmentpolicies; and management's overall ability to monitor and control otherfinancial and operating risks. A complete assessment of capital adequacymust take account of each of these considerations including, in particular,the level and severity of problem and classified assets. Thus, the risk-basedcapital ratio is but one element in the assessment of overall capital adequacy,and the final supervisory judgment of an organization's capital adequacymay differ significantly from conclusions that might be drawn solely fromthe absolute level of the organization's risk-based capital ratio. The guidelines, both for state member banks and bank holding companies,consist of a definition of capital, a system for assigning assets and off-balancesheet items to risk categories, a schedule for achieving a <T3>minimum</T3> risk-based capital ratio, and a phase-in period that providesfor transitional arrangements. In light of the considerations just discussed,the Board expects that banking organizations will, as a general matter,operate with capital levels well above the minimum risk-based levels. Asthe Board previously has noted, this is particularly appropriate for bankingorganizations contemplating significant expansion proposals, as well asfor institutions with high or inordinate levels of risk. In all cases,institutions should hold capital commensurate with the level and natureof the risks to which they are exposed. B. Overview of the Final Risk-Based Capital Guidelines The guidelines comprise four basic elements: (1) An agreed definition of core or Tier 1 capital, consisting primarilyof common stockholders' equity and certain categories of perpetual preferredstock, and a ``menu'' of internationally accepted items for supplementingcore capital (supplementary or Tier 2 capital). (2) A general framework for assigning assets and off-balance sheet itemsto broad risk categories and procedures for calculating a risk-based capitalratio. (3) A schedule for achieving, by no later than the end of 1990, a minimumratio of total capital-to-risk-weighted assets of 7.25 percent (of whichat least 3.25 percentage points should be in the form of core capital elements)and, by no later than the end of 1992, a ratio of 8.0 percent (of whichat least 4.0 percentage points should be in the form of core capital elements).(4) Transitional arrangements and a phase-in period (running through theend of 1992) permitting banking organizations to include some supplementarycapital elements in Tier 1 capital on a temporary basis and providing timeto bring their capital positions into full comformity with the risk-basedcapital definitions and minimum supervisory standards. C. Comments Received in Response to the March 1988 Proposal As mentioned above, these final guidelines include a number of changesto the March 1988 proposed guidelines based, in part, on the public commentsreceived by the Board. Most respondents expressed general support for theconcept of a risk-based capital measure; however, many objected to specificaspects of the proposed ratios. In addition, some large institutions andbank trade associations opposed the Board's proposal to apply the risk-basedframework to bank holding companies. Some respondents expressed the viewthat the risk-based capital proposal might adversely affect the abilityof banking organizations to compete with nonbank financial institutionsthat are not subject to similar standards. Specific comments on the framework covered the proposed capital definition,the treatment of assets and off-balance sheet activities, and the applicationof the framework. The principal concerns regarding the definition of capitalfocused on the treatment of perpetual preferred stock, loan loss reserves,and goodwill. Comments on risk weights addressed the proposed treatmentof country exposures, claims on domestic central governments, claims onlocal governments, claims on international institutions, claims on government-sponsoredagencies, claims backed by private sector financial guarantees, and residentialmortgages. With respect to off-balance sheet items, the major commentsrelated to the recognition of counterparty netting arrangements and thecredit conversion factor for long-term foreign exchange rate contracts.Comments were received on the use of original, rather than remaining, maturityin both the assignment of risk weights to long-term claims on foreign banksand the assignment of credit conversion factors to commitments. Some commentersalso addressed the use of average, versus period-end, data in calculatingthe risk-based capital ratio. Finally, a number of respondents commentedon the relationship of the risk-based capital ratio to the Board's existingguidelines and policy statements, as well as the application of the risk-basedframework to small banking organizations. Sections II through V below describe modifications to the March 1988 proposalthat the Board has adopted as a result of public comments received andchanges incorporated into the July 1988 Basle Accord, or as part of thecontinuing consultative process within the Basle Supervisors' Committee(and with the other Federal banking agencies). Section II outlines revisionsmade to the definition of capital; Section III describes changes in thetreatment of assets and off-balance sheet exposures; Section IV deals withthe implementation of the risk-based framework; and Section V discussesthe requirements for bank holding companies.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Definition of Capital </ITAG>The final guideline set forth a definition of capital for state memberbanks that is substantially similar to that contained in the March proposal.This section reviews comments received on, and revisions made in, the treatmentof three elements of capital_perpetual preferred stock, loan loss reserves,and term subordinated debt.  A. Perpetual Preferred StockConsistent with the December 1987 Basle Accord, the March 1988 proposedguidelines stated that for supervisory purposes capital would consist oftwo tiers: Tier 1 capital comprising core capital elements, and Tier 2capital, comprising supplementary capital elements. Tier 1 capital wasdefined to include common stockholders' equity and disclosed reserved thatrepresent after-tax retained earnings. Perpetual preferred stock was excludedfrom the definition of Tier 1 capital. A large number of organizations argued that perpetual preferred stock shouldcount as an element of Tier 1 capital. These organizations suggested thatperpetual preferred stock, in terms of its ability to absorb losses, servesas a nearly perfect substitute for common equity because it is permanent,it is subordinate to deposits and general debt obligations, and preferreddividends can be deferred without triggering an act of default. Some respondentsfavored including only limited amounts of perpetual preferred stock withinTier 1, while others took the position that regulations should define thecharacteristics of preferred stock that may be of some supervisory concernand include those forms of preferred stock that do not possess such characteristics.Several organizations noted that perpetual preferred stock is the mostexpensive form of Tier 2 capital, and suggested that outstanding issuesof such stock might be redeemed if not given Tier 1 treatment. Consistent with the revised Basle Accord, the Board has modified its definitionof Tier 1 capital for state member banks to include <T3>noncumulative </T3>perpetual preferred stock\4\<NOTE/> in Tier 1 capital with no limitations. Cumulative preferredstock, however, remains in Tier 2 for banks. Perpetual preferred stockthat has a noncumulative feature is a closer substitute for common stockthan cumulative preferred stock since any dividend payments that have beenwaived do not represent a contingent claim on the issuer. Despite the inclusionof preferred stock in Tier 1, the Board believes that, from a supervisorystandpoint, it is desirable that common shareholders' equity remain thedominant form of Tier 1 capital. Thus, state member banks are expectedto avoid overreliance on preferred stock or any type of non-voting equityelements within Tier 1.\5\<NOTE/> <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\Perpetual preferred stock is defined as preferred stockthat has no maturity date, that cannot be redeemed at the option of theholder of the instrument and that has no other provisions that will requirefuture redemption of the issue.  <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\As discussed in Section V (B) below, the Board has limitedthe amount of perpetual preferred stock in Tier 1 for bank holding companiesto 25 percent of total Tier 1 capital.  The decision to include perpetual preferred stock in Tier 1 raises thequestion of whether there are some specific forms of preferred stock thatpossess features that do not warrant such favorable treatment. While theBoard believes that reasonable amounts of noncumulative perpetual preferredstock should be included in Tier 1, it has determined that auction ratepreferred stock (including so-called ``Dutch auction'' preferred stock)has certain features that do not allow it to fulfill the supervisory purposessof Tier 1 capital and, hence, has excluded such stock as a core capitalelement.\6\<NOTE/> <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\6\The decision to exclude auction rate stock is discussedfurther in Section V (B).Although auction rate preferred stock is not included in Tier 1, the guidelinesdo not prohibit the inclusion of floating rate or adjustable rate perpetualpreferred stock in Tier 1 capital, so long as the yield on these instrumentsis based solely on general market interest rates and is not subject toan auction mechanism that requires or allows the rate to vary in relationto the financial standing or credit rating of the issuer. B. Loan Loss Reserves Recognizing that it is not always possible to distinguish clearly betweengeneral and specific reserves, the December 1987 Basle Accord proposedphasing in a limit on the amount of loan loss reserves includable in Tier2 capital. By the end of 1992, the allowance for loan and lease lossesincluded in Tier 2 capital cannot exceed 1.25 percent of weighted riskassets. The Board's March proposal treated the allowance for loan and leaselosses as Tier 2 capital up to this limit, and, consistent with the BasleAccord, excluded from capital any specific reserve established againstidentified losses. Comments received from U.S. banking organizations on the proposed treatmentof loan loss reserves suggested including general reserves in Tier 1 andraising or eliminating the proposed limits on reserves. Banking organizationsin other G-10 countries, on the other hand, expressed the view that certaintypes of reserves, such as those established against loans to developingcountries, are not in fact freely available, and noted that in many G-10countries such reserves are excluded from bank capital. These commentersaccordingly argued for the exclusion of all such reserves from capital.Under generally accepted accounting principles, the loan loss allowancein U.S. banking organizations takes the form of a valuation adjustmentto the entire loan portfolio. These adjustments represent losses inherentor anticipated in the existing portfolio but not yet identified. Becausecapital is intended to serve as buffer against unanticipated losses, itwould appear appropriate to place such reserves in Tier 2 subject to thelimit contained in the Basle Accord. In addition, the amount of reservesincludable in Tier 2 is generally consistent with the amount of loan lossreserves that historically were included in U.S. bank regulatory capitaluntil 1987, when banking organizations established large reserves againstcountry risk exposure. During the transition period, the Basle Supervisor's Committee intendsto continue to try to reach agreement on the types of reserves that aretruly general in nature and, therefore, freely available to absorb lossesanywhere in the portfolio. If an acceptable agreement is reached, thenthe Basle Accord and these guidelines would permit the inclusion of unlimitedamounts of such general reserves within Tier 2. If an acceptable agreementis not reached, then the amount of general reserves includable in Tier2 capital by the end of the transition period would be limited to 1.25percent of weighted risk assets, as originally proposed in the Board'sMarch 1988 proposal, and subsequently set forth in the revised July 1988Basle Accord.  C. Term Subordinated Debt InstrumentsThe December 1987 Basle proposal included subordinated debt instrumentswith a fixed term to maturity as a limited element of Tier 2 capital butdid not specify a minimum term to maturity for these instruments. Consistentwith the Board's existing capital guidelines, the March 1988 proposal statedthat subordinated debt issues and limited-life preferred stock must havea minimum original weighted average maturity of at least seven years toqualify for inclusion in Tier 2 capital. The revised Basle Accord specifies that term debt instruments must havea minimum original term to maturity of over five years to qualify for inclusionin Tier 2. Accordingly, the final risk-based guidelines state that termsubordinated debt instruments and intermediate-term preferred stock withan original average weighted maturity of at least five years are includableas limited elements within Tier 2 capital. <ITAG tagnum="84">III. Risk Weights and Off-Balance Sheet Items </ITAG>A. Treatment of Country Exposure The December 1987 Basle proposal did not attempt to incorporate transferrisk. In general, claims on foreign governments and banks were treatedalike without distinguishing among the countries involved and receivedless favorable risk weights that claims on similar domestic institutions.Banks in European Community (``EC'') countries, however, were permittedto treat claims on institutions in member countries as domestic claims.This aspect of the March proposal generally met with criticism from foreignbanks and large U.S. banks, which noted that the treatment accorded tolong-term claims on foreign banks and claims guaranteed by foreign banksmight disrupt the interbank market and create disincentives for U.S. banksto convey risk participations to foreign banks. Some commenters also arguedthat the preferential treatment accorded banks in EC counties gave theseinstitutions a competitive advantage in dealing with each other. Othersargued for equal, low-risk treatment for claims on banks and governmentsfrom a group of countries identified as being of high credit quality, suchas the signatories to the Basle Accord or members of the Organization forEconomic Cooperation and Development (``OECD''). Taking into account these comments, and consistent with the revised July1988 Basle Accord, these guidelines treat claims on governments and banksof a defined group of countries, which includes members of the OECD andcountries that have concluded special lending arrangements with the InternationalMonetary Fund (``IMF'') associated with its General Arrangements to Borrow(the OECD-based group of countries)\7\,<NOTE/> in the same manner as they do claims on similar domesticinstitutions. Claims on central governments of other countries are assignedto the 100 percent risk category unless denominated in local currency andfunded in local currency liabilities, in which case they may be treatedthe same as claims on domestic central governments. Short-term claims onbanks domiciled in countries that do not belong to the OECD-based groupof countries will receive the same 20 percent risk weight that claims ondomestic banks do; however, long-term claims (remaining maturity of overone year) on the banks from these countries will receive a 100 percentrisk weight.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\7\The OECD includes the following countries: Australia, Austria,Belgium, Canada, Denmark, the Federal Republic of Germany, Finland, France,Greece, Iceland, Ireland, Italy, Japan, Luxembourg, Netherlands, New Zealand,Norway, Portugal, Spain, Sweden, Switzerland, Turkey, United Kingdom, andUnited States. Saudi Arabia has concluded special lending arrangementswith the IMF associated with the Fund's General Arrangements to Borrow.B. Claims on Central Governments   The December 1987 Basle Accord assigned claims on domestic central governments(including claims guaranteed by domestic central governments or collateralizedby their securities) to the zero or a low risk category to reflect thepresumed absence of credit risk. National supervisors were granted discretion,however, to place some of these claims, including long-term claims, ina slightly higher risk category in order to capture a degree of marketand interest rate risk. The guidelines proposed in March, accordingly,assigned a zero percent risk weight to securities (direct obligations)issued by the U.S. Government with a remaining maturity of 91 days or lessand a 10 percent risk weight to similar claims or over 91 days. A 10 percentrisk weight also was assigned to all claims guaranteed by the U.S. Governmentor collateralized by its securities. A number of respondents to the March proposal disagreed with the proposedmethod for incorporating interest rate risk because it did not take intoaccount all assets, liabilities, and off-balance sheet transactions. Somecommenters argued that all government obligations, long-and short-term,should be assigned to the zero percent risk category due to the absenceof credit risk. Others expressed concern about the framework's lack ofa more sophisticated approach to interest rate risk, arguing that placinglong-term government bonds in the zero percent risk category could imply(incorrectly) that there are no risk to holding such instruments.In addition, some commenters opposed the proposed maturity split for governmentsecurities on the grounds that it would place them at a competitive disadvantageto banks in other G-10 countries. In this regard, respondents assertedthat most G-10 countries intended to assign a zero percent risk weightto all claims on their domestic central governments, regardless of maturity.It should be noted that, in light of the recognition of transfer risk nowincorporated in the Basle framework, the zero percent risk weight wouldapply not only to claims on the domestic central government, but also toclaims on, and guaranteed by, foreign central governments of the OECD-basedgroup of countries. After careful consideration of all of the above factors and consultationwith the other U.S. Federal banking agencies, the Board has decided toeliminate the distinction between long- and short-term OEDC central governmentsecurities. The Board has decided to assign all such securities, as wellas all claims unconditionally guaranteed by the full faith and credit ofOECD central governments, to the lowest (zero percent) risk category. Ifthe validity of the guarantee to the holder of the claim is dependent uponsome affirmative action by the holder or a third party, then the guaranteeis not considered unconditional. Thus, with respect to the United States,all direct U.S. Treasury obligations are assigned to the zero percent riskweight category. This category would generally include all securities withunconditional guarantees by the U.S. Government or its agencies intendedto facilitate active trading in financial markets, including GovernmentNational Mortgage Association (GNMA) pass-through securities. Loans guaranteedby the U.S. Export-Import Bank (Exim Bank) would generally also be assignedto the zero percent risk category. This approach has the benefit of restricting the lowest risk category toobligations of the central government in the form of direct claims on orclaims unconditionally guaranteed by the central government. By eliminatingthe maturity break on central government securities, this approach alsosimplifies the framework. Claims that are conditionally guaranteed by OECD central governments (includingthe U.S. Government and its agencies) are generally assigned to the 20percent risk category. For example, in the case of the United States, suchclaims generally would include loans guaranteed under certain programsadministered by the Veterans' Administration (VA) and the Federal HousingAdministration (FHA). Student loans that are indirectly guaranteed or reinsuredby the U.S. Government would also be assigned to the 20 percent risk category.In addition, all claims <T3>collateralized </T3>by securities issued by OECD-based central governments(including the U.S. Government and its agencies) will generally be assignedto the 20 percent risk category. The Board believes that this treatmentis appropriate since, as a general matter, such secured claims on privatecounterparties are not in all respects equivalent from a risk standpointto the direct holding of central government debt securities. Moreover,the Board believes that restricting the zero percent category to directholdings of government securities and obligations unconditionally guaranteedby the government lessens supervisory concerns regarding the volume andriskiness of assets assigned the zero percent risk weight. Assigning long-term direct government obligations to the zero percent riskcategory differs from past Board proposals, and should not be interpretedas suggesting that the holding of such instruments involves little or norisk. The Board's previous concerns about this treatment are mitigatedby the retention of an overall leverage constraint (see Section IV (A)).Retaining a leverage ratio does, in fact, ensure a minimum capital chargefor central government securities, together with all other assets, andprecludes the possibility of excessive leveraging of the government securitiesportfolio. Moreover, examiners will continue to carefully scrutinize bankingorganizations' interest rate exposure and require that institutions withundue levels of interest rate risk strengthen their capital positions eventhough they may meet the minimum capital standards. In addition, the FederalReserve will continue to work with the other domestic and internationalsupervisory authorities to develop better procedures for measuring andassessing interest rate exposure.C. Claims on the Non-Cental (Local) Government Public Sector The July 1988 revised Basle Accord continues to provide for national discretionin assigning risk weights to claims on domestic local governments to therisk categories. However, the framework generally assigns a standard 20percent risk weight to claims on, or guaranteed by, foreign local governmentsof the OECD-based group of countries. The Board's March 1988 proposal assigned a 20 percent risk weight to <T3>general </T3>obligation (full faith and credit) claims on a domesticlocal government, as well as to all claims guaranteed by the full faithand credit of a domestic local government. It also assigned a 50 percentrisk weight to local domestic government <T3>revenue </T3>obligations for which the government entity is committedto repay the debt only with revenues from facilities financed, rather thanfrom general tax funds. Consistent with the December 1987 Basle proposal,revenue obligations issued by local governments for the benefit of <T3>private entities </T3>that are committed to repay the principal andinterest were accorded a 100 percent risk weight as were claims on, orguaranteed by, foreign local government entities. Several commenters suggested that all public sector claims that a localgovernment is committed to repay (including revenue bonds) receive a 20percent risk weight. In their views, assigning a 20 percent or 50 percentrisk weight to such obligations based on the source of repayment wouldcreate unwarranted distinctions among classes of state and municipal debt.Upon consideration of all relevant factors, the Board has decided to retainthe proposed risk weights for claims on domestic local governments and,consistent with the Basle framework, to extend the same treatment to similarclaims on foreign local governments of the OECD-based group of countries.Also consistent with the Basle framework, a 100-percent risk weight isassigned to all claims on local government entities of countries that donot belong to the OECD-based group of countries. Financial guaranty insurance industry commenters objected to an aspectof the March proposal related to the treatment accorded to local governmentrevenue obligations. Consistent with the Basle framework, the proposalrecognized bank, but not nonbank, guarantees of local government obligations(or of any other type of claim). The commenters argued that the proposal'spreferential treatment for bank-issued guarantees creates an incentivefor banks to hold local government revenue obligations backed by bank-issuedstandbys, which would have a 20-percent risk weight, rather than similarobligations backed by triple A-rated financial guaranty insurance companies,which would have a 50 percent or 100 percent risk weight, depending uponthe nature of the underlying obligor.Because the Basle Accord does not recognize nonbank private sector guaranteesor take private sector credit ratings into account in assigning assetsto risk categories, recognition of private sector financial guaranteesfor risk-based capital purposes, as urged by this group, would be inconsistentwith the framework agreed upon by the G-10 countries. Accordingly, thefinal guidelines do not recognize such guarantees. Nonetheless, the treatmentof private sector financial guarantees may be considered in the futurein connection with international discussions on refinements to the risk-basedcapital framework.D. International InstitutionsThe December 1987 Basle proposal granted national supervisory authoritiesdiscretion to assign a zero to 20 percent risk weight to claims on multilaterallending and regional development institutions and assigned a 100 percentrisk weight to claims guaranteed by these organizations or collateralizedby their securities. Several international organizations expressed concernthat proposals of member countries to the Accord inconsistently assignedrisk weights to claims on the same international institutions. Others supporteda 20 percent risk weight for <T3>all</T3> such institutions, and requested that this treatment be extendedto claims guaranteed by these entities and to claims collateralized bytheir securities.These final guidelines reflect the revised Basle Accord's uniform 20 percentrisk weight for claims on five multilateral development banks_the AfricanDevelopment Bank, the Asian Development Bank, the European Investment Bank,the Inter-American Development Bank, and the World Bank_as well as forclaims guaranteed by these institutions or collateralized by their securities.As permitted by the revised Basle Accord, the final guidelines extend thesame treatment to claims on similar institutions in which the U.S. is ashareholding or contributing member.E. Government-Sponsored AgenciesThe Board's March 1988 proposal assigned a preferential 20 percent riskweight to claims on U.S. Government-sponsored agencies to reflect theirrelatively low risk and what is viewed as their special relationship tothe U.S. Government.\8\<NOTE/> Of the comments received on this issue, about half, includingsome from government-sponsored agencies themselves, offered support forthe proposed 20 percent risk weight; about half the commenters advocateda lower 10 percent risk weight.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\8\ Government-sponsored agencies are entities that were establishedor chartered by the U.S. Government to serve public purposes specifiedby the U.S. Congress but whose obligations do not carry the explicit fullfaith and credit guarantee of the U.S. Government.Respondents that opposed a risk weight lower than 20 percent pointed outthat government-sponsored agency securities lack the explicit full faithand credit backing of the U.S. Government. Respondents in favor of a lowerrisk weight contended that the market does not distinguish in a significantway between the level of risk associated with these obligations and therisk associated with long-term claims on the U.S. Government, which theproposal weighted at 10 percent. Several commenters opposed the differentialbetween the 10 percent risk weight proposed for GNMA securities_which bearthe full faith and credit guarantee of the U.S. Government_and the 20 percentrisk weight assigned to Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation (``FHLMC'')and Federal National Mortgage Association (``FNMA'') securities_which donot explicitly bear such a guarantee_on the grounds that it would createtiering in the secondary mortgage market and raise mortgage costs for consumers.In view of the structure of the Basle framework, the Board has determinedto maintain the 20 percent risk weight for claims on all government-sponsoredagencies. The Board continues to believe that the debt obligations of government-sponsoredagencies should not be accorded the same treatment as other direct governmentobligations that carry the explicit U.S. Government guarantee. The Boardnotes that the 20 percent risk weight is much lower than the implied riskweight of 100 percent under the current leverage guidelines.F. Mortgages and Mortgage-Backed Securities<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Mortgages</ITAG>The Board's March 1988 proposal assigned a 100 percent risk weight to loanssecured by owner-occupied 1-4 family residential mortgages, rather thanthe preferential 50 percent risk weight proposed by the Basle Supervisors'Committee. In proposing not to apply the preferential weight, the FederalReserve sought to avoid the appearance or reality of regulatory creditallocation among private sector borrowers.Those commenters that addressed this issue overwhelmingly opposed the proposed100 percent risk weight. Respondents stated that it would place U.S. banksat a competitive disadvantage in both domestic and foreign mortgage marketsand cited the historically low default rate on residential mortgages asa justification for a lower risk weight.Upon consideration of these comments, the Board has determined to assigna preferential risk weight of 50 percent to loans secured by owner-occupied1-4 family residential mortgages. Consistent with the revised Basle Accord,the Board is extending this preferential risk weight to mortgages on 1-4family residential properties that are rented as well. In this regard,the revised Basle Accord instructs national supervisory authorities toapply this preferential weight restrictively as to emcompass only residentialpurposes; that is, it is not to apply to speculative property development.Moreover, national authorities are granted the latitude to develop strictprudential criteria for the application of this low risk weight. Accordingly,the guidelines assign a 50 percent risk weight only to laons secured by<T3>first </T3>liens on 1-4 family residential properties that are performingin accordance with their original terms and are not 90 days or more pastdue or carried in nonaccrual status.The assignment of mortgages to the 50 percent risk category is based uponthe presumption that banking organizations will adhere to prudent and conservativeunderwriting standards with respect to the maximum loan-to-value ratio,the borrower's paying capacity, and the long-term expectations for thereal estate market in which they are lending. If, in the course of thesupervisory process, it is determined that an organization has not adheredto such standards, the Federal Reserve may require additional capital,increased reserves, or both.The treatment of 1-4 family residential mortgages also affects the riskweight assigned to the <T3>undrawn </T3>portion of home equity lines of credit. As is the casewith other commitments, home equity loan commitments that a bank: (1) Canunconditionally cancel within one year \9\<NOTE/>; and (2) reviews at least annually to determine whether ornot they should be extended, are treated as short-term commitments. Short-termcommitments are deemed to involve low risk and, therefore, are not assesseda capital charge. However, like other long-term commitments, the undrawnportion of long-term home equity lines of credit are converted at 50 percent.The resulting credit equivalent amount is then assigned a 50 percent riskweight if it is secured by a first lien or a 100 percent risk weight ifit is secured by a junior lien.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\9\ In the case of consumer home equity lines of credit securedby liens on 1-4 family residential property, a bank is deemed able to unconditionallycancel the line for purposes of this criterion if, at its option, the bankcan prohibit additional extensions of credit, reduce the credit line, andterminate the line of full extent permitted by relevant Federal law. TheBoard has determined that this approach is appropriate in view of the preferentialtreatment that the Basle Accord grants home mortgages generally and inlight of the Congressional purposes behind the Home Equity Loan ConsumerProtection Act of 1988, which sets forth certain guidelines under whichlenders may cancel or not make advances on home equity lines.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Mortgage-Backed Securities</ITAG>The Basle Accord does not specifically address certain instruments, suchas mortgage-backed securities and the newly developed stripped mortgage-backedsecurities. Nonetheless, the Board has determined that within the contextof the overall risk-based capital framework, it is appropriate to viewprivately-issued mortgage-backed securities, such as mortgage pass-throughsecurities and collateralized mortgage obligations (CMOs), that meet certaincriteria outlined in the guidelines as essentially indirect holdings ofthe underlying assets. Accordingly, such securities are generally assignedto the same risk weight appropriate to the highest risk-weighted assetin the underlying asset pool, except that in no case will these securitiesbe assigned to the zero percent risk weight category,\1\\0\<NOTE/> which is reserved for <T3>direct </T3>claims on central governments. Privately-issued mortgage-backedsecurities that do not meet the specified criteria are assigned to the100 percent risk weight category. Any classes of a mortgage-backed securitythat can absorb more than their <T3>pro rata </T3>share of the loss without the whole mortgage-backed securityissue being in default, for example, so-called subordinated classes orresidual interests, are also assigned to 100 percent risk weight regardlessof the issuer or guarantor of the security.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\\0\ Mortgage-backed securities issued or guaranteed byU.S. Government agencies or U.S. Government-sponsored agencies are assignedto the same risk weight as other claims issued or guaranteed by such agencies.Stripped mortgage-backed securities, including interest-only strips (IOs),principal-only strips (POs), and similar instrument, posses different structuralcharacteristics from the typical mortgage-backed securities. These differingcharacteristics are reflected in the extreme price volatility and marketrisk that may be associated with these instruments. For this reason, theBoard at this time has assigned these instruments, regardless of issueror guarantor, to the 100 percent risk category.Nonetheless, the Board recognizes that these instruments can be used tohedge risk and does not want to discourage their use for this purpose.Accordingly, examiners will take into account the manner in which an organizationuses IOs and POs, as well as other instruments, in its hedging strategybefore making an overall judgment on the organization's capital adequacy.While organizations will be encouraged to operate above minimum capitallevels, organizations that have property hedged their interest rate exposurewill, other things being equal, be permitted to operate with lower levelsof capital than those that are vulnerable to rate changes. The treatmentof stripped mortgage-backed securities will also be considered in connectionwith efforts to develop a means for incorporating interest rate risk intothe risk-based capital standard. These efforts will endeavor to recognizethe risk-reducing (hedging) characteristics of these instruments when theyare used properly. Finally, the treatment of IOs, POs, and similar instrumentsmay also be considered in future discussions of the the Basle Supervisors'Committee intended to refine the risk-based capital framework.G. Interest Rate and Foreign Exchange Rate Contracts<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Netting</ITAG>Consistent with the December 1987 Basle proposal, the proposed March guidelinesdid not recognize netting of interest and exchange rate contracts betweencounterparties for the purpose of calculating the risk-based capital ratio.The proposal indicated that this would not be done until legal opinionfirmly established that such contracts may be offset.Commenters on this issue unanimously asserted that netting reduces riskand that, therefore, some form of netting should be recognized. Of thosethat favored a specific netting arrangement, a majority endorsed nettingby novation.\11\<NOTE/> A number of commenters offered legal opinions that the legalefficacy of certain types of netting arrangements was less tenuous thanit was characterized in the December 1987 Basle proposal.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\11\ Netting by novation is a contract between two counterpartiesunder which any obligation to each other to deliver a given currency ona given date is automatically amalgamated with all other obligations forthe same currency and value date, <T3>legally</T3> substituting one single net amount for the previous grossobligations.The revised Basle Accord reflects the determination by the Basle Supervisors'Committee that novated contracts replace in law and in fact the contractsthey have extinguished and that novation is the only form of netting legallyenforcable at this time under the bankruptcy laws of all member countries.Accordingly, these guidelines recognize netting by novation, but no otherforms of netting, for the purpose of calculating credit equivalent amountsof interest and exchange rate contracts. The Federal Reserve will continueto work with the Basle Supervisors' Committee to assess the acceptabilityof various other forms of netting.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. Conversion Factor for Long-Term Exchange Rate Contracts</ITAG>Consistent with the December 1987 Basle Accord, the March guidelines proposeda 5 percent conversion factor for calculating potential future exposureof exchange rate contracts with a remaining maturity of over one year.U.S. and foreign bank commenters stated their view that the conversionfactor was too high. They argued that it not only overstated the risksassociated with such contracts, but also might hurt the competitivenessof banks in this market vis-a-vis other financial firms that are not subjectto the same capital requirements. The Basle Supervisors' Committee decidedagainst reducing this factor in light of the risks relating to the volatilityof exchange rates and because currency swaps, unlike interest rate swaps,involve an exchange of principal on maturity. Accordingly, these guidelinesretain the 5 percent conversion factor for long-term exchange rate contracts.The Board notes that while this factor has not been reduced, rate contractsin general receive favorable treatment under the Basle framework. Whiledirect extensions of credit to standard risk obligors are assigned a riskweight of 100 percent, credit equivalent amounts of rate contracts involvingsuch obligors are assigned a preferential maximum risk weight of 50 percenton the grounds that most counterparties in these markets are of high creditquality. The Federal Reserve intends to monitor the quality of creditsin these markets and, in the future, might consider, if circumstances sowarrant, assigning a 100 percent risk weight to credit equivalent amountsof rate contracts.H. Original Versus Remaining MaturityThe Board's March 1988 proposal, consistent with the December 1987 BasleAccord, assigned risk weights to claims on foreign banks and credit conversionfactors for off-balance sheet loan commitment based, in part, on their<T3>original</T3> maturity. The action reflected the view that, other thingsbeing equal, the longer the term of a claim or commitment, the greaterthe risk. According to this vew, after a long-term claim or commitmenthas been extended, many events can occur to reduce the creditworthinessof the borrower. If such events do occur, the lending institution is subjectto risks greater than those foreseen when the claim or commitment was originallyextended, even if only a short amount of time remains under the facility.U.S. commenters, however, disagreed with this view and overwhelmingly favoredthe use of <T3>remaining</T3> maturity which, they stated, reflects more accuratelythe risk associated with these transactions. Moreover, most respondentsnoted that their internal information systems were based on remaining maturity,and that maintenance of a separate system based on original maturity solelyfor risk-based capital purposes would entail substantial costs.Partially in response to these concerns, the revised Basle Accord and theguidelines apply differential risk weights to claims on foreign banks domiciledin non-OECD countries based on their <T3>remaining</T3>, rather than original, maturity. The Basle Supervisors'Committee remained of the belief, however, that such treatment continuedto be inappropriate for commitments. Consequently, the revised accord basesthe credit conversion factors that apply to loan commitments on their <T3>original</T3> maturity, but allows banks to use <T3>remaining</T3> maturity until year-end 1992. The final guidelines providefor this transition rule so that those banking organizations that currentlytrack loan commitments according to their remaining, rather than original,maturity will have sufficient time to adjust their internal informationsystems.I. Average Versus Period-End Data The Board's March 1988 proposal requested comment on whether the calculationof the risk-based ratio should be based on average or period-end data.Commenters on this issue overwhelmingly favored the use of average datain theory, on the ground that period-end figures could be misleading. However,many of these respondents, as well as those commenters that favored theuse of period-end data, often cited the cost and impracticability of generatingaverage data for all assets and off-balance sheet items. A number of respondentssuggested that average data be used for some items and period-end databe used for others for the purpose of calculating the ratio. No consensusemerged, however, on the items for which average or period-end data wasappropriate. Under the guidelines, banking organizations will use period-end data tocalculate the risk-based capital ratio. However, on a case-by-case basis,banking organizations may also be required to calculate ratios based onaverage balances when supervisory concerns render such a calculation appropriate.In addition, to the extent banking organizations have data on average balancesthat can be used to calculate risk-based ratios, the Federal Reserve willtake such data into account. It can be argued that average figures are preferable to period-end figures.On the other hand, the burden of requiring average figures will need tobe assessed more fully. As more experience is gained with the measure,the Board may consider whether the use of average data should be requiredto a greater extent in the future. <ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Application of the Framework </ITAG>A. The Current Capital (Leverage) Guidelines The Basle framework and the Board's guidelines provide for: (1) A transitionperiod through the end of 1992 during which minimum risk-based capitalstandards will be phased into the existing supervisory system, and (2)interim target ratios that take effect at the end of 1990. As proposedin the March guidelines, the existing primary and total capital-to-<T3>total</T3> assets ratios (leverage ratios) will be retained at leastuntil the initial risk-based capital supervisory ratios take effect atthe end of 1990. The majority of commenters that addressed the issue ofwhether to retain the current capital guidelines favored abandoning theexisting leverage ratios because their continued use could be confusingand would be unnecessary in light of the risk-based framework. However,several commenters advocated retaining the leverage ratios out of concernthat the risk-based standard was too lenient; others argued that continuedapplication of a leverage standard was appropriate until greater experienceis gained with the risk-based ratio. The Board has determined that retention of the current leverage ratiosis desirable in order to maintain some constraint on banking organizations'overall leverage until the minimum risk-based ratios take effect. Evenafter this has occurred, moreover, the Board believes that retention ofan overall leverage contraint is important since, in the absence of sucha constraint and without a comprehensive measure for interest rate risk,the assignment of a significant volume of assets to the zero percent riskcategory under the risk-based capital framework could allow a banking organizationto assume an unwarranted degree of leveraging and risk-taking. In lightof these concerns, the Federal banking agencies have been working towarda common leverage guideline. Continued use of existing leverage ratiosalso will provide an element of continuity as transition is made to a risk-basedframework. In the Board's view, retention of the existing capital standards, at leastinitially, does not mean that well-capitalized organizations would notbenefit from the introduction of a risk-based standard. Indeed, organizationsin sound condition and with strong risk-based capital ratios could, withthe concurrence of the Federal Reserve, be allowed to reduce their primaryand total capital ratios, so long as their ratios remain fully consistentwith their overall financial condition. At the same time, the Board, together with the other Federal banking agencies,recognizes that different capital definitions for leverage and risk-basedcapital purposes carry with them the potential for confusion and perhapsan element of undue burden. Once the risk-based framework has been implemented,the Federal banking supervisors will consider proposing a revised leverageconstraint that would replace the existing leverage guidelines at or beforethe end of 1990. It is contemplated that the definition of capital forthe new leverage guidelines would be consistent with the risk-based capitaldefinition and would be set at a lower level than the current capital-to-totalassets standard. B. Application to Small Banks The Basle Accord applies only to internationally active banks, but it recognizesthat each national supervisory authority may wish to apply the frameworkto a broader class of commercial banking organizations. The Federal Reservebelieves that the risk-based capital guidelines should apply to all bankson a consolidated basis on the grounds that the principle of assessingcapital adequacy against broad levels of risk exposure is relevant to allbanks, regardless of size.Nonetheless, the Federal banking agencies recognize that to a large extentthe impact of these guidelines will predominantly fall on large bankingorganizations and those with significant off-balance sheet exposures. Accordingly,the agencies solicited public comment on several options regarding theappropriate focus of off-site supervisory data collection and monitoringefforts. These options included focusing data collection and monitoringefforts on either all banking organizations, large banking organizationsor institutions with significant off-balance sheet activities.  A majority of commenters on this issue recommended that supervisory datacollection and monitoring efforts focus on organizations above some assetthreshold or level of off-balance sheet exposure. This consensus reflectedconcern about the reporting burden that the proposed capital guidelinescould place on small banks. Several multinational banking organizationsand two respondents from the domestic public sector did, however, supportindustry-wide monitoring and data collection. A trade association for smallerinstitutions favored application of the standard to all banks, but urgedthat additional reporting requirements focus on institutions with assetsin excess of $1 billion.  The Board remains of the opinion that the risk-based ratio should be appliedto <T3>all </T3>banks, since all banks hold low, as well as high, risk assetsand all banks may engage in off-balance sheet activities. Moreover, thisapproach would avoid the appearance of a dual standard for large and smallinstitutions. The Board has also determined, however, that any additionalreporting requirements for small institutions should be minimized. TheBoard, together with the other U.S. Federal banking agencies, intends tobe guided by this principle in developing reporting forms that will allowfor the monitoring of compliance with the risk-based capital standards,while minimizing the burden on small institutions.  <ITAG tagnum="84">V. Capital Requirements for Bank Holding Companies  </ITAG>A. Application  The terms and provisions of the Basle Accord, as noted above, apply tointernational <T3>banks, </T3>not to companies or entities that own banks. Of course,many international banking organizations conduct banking activities, aswell as nonbanking financial business, in separate subsidiaries and affiliates.For this reason, and because the risks assumed by these entities can havea significant effect on the parent bank's overall financial strength, theBasle Accord states that the capital framework ``is intended to be appliedto banks on a consolidated basis, including subsidiaries undertaking bankingand financial business.'' The Accord also indicates that the normal practicewill be to consolidate subsidiaries with parent banks for the purpose ofassessing the capital adequacy of banking groups.  As suggested by this approach, the extension of prudential supervision,including the application of capital standards and reporting requirementsto banks on a consolidated basis, has long been encouraged by banking supervisoryauthorities as a way to strengthen an increasingly interdependent internationalfinancial system. As banking organizations open offices in other countries,the bank supervisors in these countries, or ``host'' supervisors, generallyhave oversight authority only for those offices of the organization thatare located in the host country. However, the condition of these entities,as well as their potential impact on the host country's financial markets,are obviously affected by the health of the consolidated organization.Therefore, given the large role that foreign firms are increasingly playingin other countries' financial markets, host supervisory authorities wantassurance that foreign banks operating in their country are adequatelysupervised on a consolidated, worldwide basis by home country supervisoryauthorities.  While the application of a risk-based capital framework to companies thatown banks is clearly left to the discretion of national supervisory authorities,the Basle Accord does express concern that bank ownership structures oraffiliations with other firms not be allowed to weaken the capital positionof the bank or expose the bank to undue risks. The Basle Accord statesthat the Basle Supervisors' Committee will monitor developments and ownershipstructures in member countries ``in order to ensure that the integrityof the capital of banks is maintained.''  In issuing the March 1988 proposal for comment, the Board exercised itsdiscretion to apply the Basle framework to bank holding companies on aconsolidated basis. This is generally consistent with the treatment ofholding companies under the Board's current primary and total capital adequacyguidelines, although the definition of bank holding company capital underthe current guidelines differs somewhat from the definition of bank capital.The application of risk-based standards to holding companies is also consistentwith the risk-based capital proposals issued for comment by the Board in1986 and 1987.  The Board has long applied capital standards to bank holding companieson a consolidated basis in connection with both on-site inspections andin acting on bank holding company applications. The Board has applied minimumcapital standards to bank holding companies on a consolidated basis becauseexperience has shown that, as with a bank and its affiliates, the risksand problems in the holding company and its nonbank subsidiaries can havean impact on the condition of affiliated banks. In addition to this concern,consolidated supervision of capital adequacy is consistent with the Board'sbelief that the parent holding company should serve as a source of strengthto its subsidiary banks. In evaluating bank holding company applications,capital adequacy is viewed as a particularly important indicator of thesoundness of organizations seeking to expand their banking and nonbankingactivities.  Furthermore, the practice of double leveraging_in which a holding companycan borrow against and, in effect, replace a portion of its subsidiaries'equity capital with debt at the consolidated level_has confirmed over theyears the need for some minimum capital standards for bank holding companies.Without such standards, excessive holding company borrowing or double leveragingcould undermine the capital strength of the overall holding company aswell as its subsidiary banks.  Application of capital standards to bank holding companies also is consistentwith the fact that holding companies are frequently managed on a consolidatedbasis_indeed, the benefits from such integration are one of the key incentivesfor establishing holding companies_and, under generally accepted accountingstandards, bank holding companies file financial statements that fullyconsolidate the assets, liabilities, income and losses of their bank andnonbank activities with the parent company.  In issuing the Board's risk-based capital proposal for public comment,the Board made clear that it retained the flexibility to exclude the assetsof and investments in certain nonbank subsidiaries of the holding companyfrom the calculation of the holding company's risk-based capital ratio.This would be done, for example, to facilitate functional regulation orto assure that the remainder of the holding company meets the Federal Reserve'sminimum capital standards without reliance on the capital resources investedin specified nonbank affiliates.  In response to the Board's risk-based capital proposal, many large multinationalbanking organizations and bank trade associations opposed application ofthe framework to bank holding companies. Only a small number of the regionalbanking organizations took issue with this aspect of the proposal.The respondents that opposed application of the capital standards to bankholding companies argued that: (1) Consolidated capital ratios are unnecessaryif nonbank subsidiaries are functionally regulated and subject to firewallsdesigned to protect affiliated banks; (2) the holding company structureis unique to the United States and, therefore, consolidated risk-basedcapital requirements would constitute a competitive disadvantage for U.S.banking organizations; (3) such requirements could induce increased holdingcompany risk-taking; and (4) applying capital standards to holding companiescould imply an undesirable extension of the federal safety net to parentcompanies and nonbank affiliates.The Board remains of the belief that companies that own insured depositoryinstitutions should have adequate capital and, in particular, that bankholding companies as presently structured should be subject to minimumcapital standards. First, as noted, double leveraging can affect the capitalthat is, in fact, available at the holding company level to support thesubsidiaries. Second, with regard to nonbanking activities, adequate firewallsmay not currently exist between banks and all their affiliates. The Boardbelieves that it is appropriate to <T3>first </T3>ensure that adequate firewalls are in place and sufficientcapital exists in the nonbank subsidiaries to fully protect affiliatedbanks <T3>before</T3> exempting, as a general policy, certain affiliates fromminimum consolidated capital standards.In light of the above factors, the Board has decided to retain its existingpolicy of applying capital standards, including a risk-based capital frameworksimilar to that set forth in the Basle Accord, to bank holding companieson a consolidated basis. However, the Board also has adopted a flexibleframework at the holding company level that will facilitate functionalregulation and the prudent expansion of bank holding company powers, whileat the same time assuring a minimum level of capital for companies whoseprincipal function is the ownership of banking institutions. Through theseguidelines, the Board retains the latitude to deduct from a banking organization'sconsolidated capital, investments in certain nonbank subsidiaries, <T3>provided that</T3> strong firewalls, adequate nonbank capital, andany other protections the Board deems necessary are first put in placeto safeguard the health of affiliated banks. If such a deduction is warranted,the nonbank subsidiary's assets also would be excluded from the holdingcompany's consolidated capital calculation.B. Definition of Capital for Bank Holding CompaniesIn implementing a risk-based capital framework for bank holding companies,the Board has adopted a definition of capital for bank holding companiesthat differs somewhat from the definition contained in the final guidelinesfor state member banks. These differences, which are discussed in greaterdetail below, involve the inclusion of cumulative perpetual preferred stockin Tier 1 for bank holding companies and the treatment of goodwill. Alsodiscussed below is a general approach for deducting investments in certaindesignated subsidiaries from the capital and assets of the bank holdingcompany. The Board believes that applying a similar, but not identical,framework to holding companies provides a reasonable degree of flexibilityto these companies in structuring their capital bases and raising additionalcapital, while maintaining the integrity and adequacy of minimum holdingcompany capital requirements.<ITAG tagnum="81">1. Perpetual Preferred Stock</ITAG>The treatment of perpetual preferred stock for bank holding companies differssomewhat from the treatment accorded to banks. As with banks, noncumulativeperpetual preferred stock has been included in Tier 1 capital of bank holdingcompanies, but subject to certain limitations discussed below. In addition,in light of the comments received and further consideration of the issuesinvolved, the Board has decided that bank holding companies also shouldbe allowed to include <T3>cumulative</T3> preferred stock in Tier 1. While cumulative preferreddividends can only be deferred, the deferral can last as long as necessaryto enable the organization to regain its financial health. Moreover, supervisorshave the authority to prohibit the resumption of preferred, as well ascommon, dividends until they are satisfied that resumption of such paymentsis in the best interest of the institution.While the Board believes that cumulative perpetual preferred stock shouldbe included in Tier 1 for bank holding companies, it does not believe thatsuch instruments, as a matter of general policy, should be viewed as aperfect substitute for common equity. First, it is very difficult, if notimpossible, to issue new common stock if there exist large dividend arrearageson preferred stock that must be repaid before common shareholders can receivedividends. Second, preferred dividends, unlike common dividends, are oftenfixed or set in relation to an external market index, rather than basedupon the bank's earnings. Third, the prior claim on earnings associatedwith many forms of preferred stock gives these instruments some of thecharacteristics of debt obligations. Finally, most forms of preferred stocklack voting rights under normal circumstances. In light of these and otherconsiderations, the guidelines specify that, in the aggregate, the totalamount of perpetual preferred stock (the sum of both cumulative and noncumulativepreferred) included in Tier 1 capital be limited to 25 percent of the sumof all core capital elements.The practical impact of this limitation on the current composition of bankholding company capital is likely to be minimal since, at present, theamount of perpetual preferred stock in major U.S. bank holding companies,most of which is cumulative, is generally consistent with the limitation.Moreover, amounts of perpetual preferred stock in excess of the Tier 1limit can be included in Tier 2 without any sublimits within that tier.This treatment recognizes the value of perpetual preferred stock in a bankholding company's capital structure and provides flexibility to holdingcompanies in raising additional capital. At the same time, it establishesprovisions that limit the substitution of preferred for common stock andprotects the integrity of the holding company's common equity capital base.Paralleling the policy for banks (see Section II (A)), the policy for bankholding companies disallows auction rate perpetual preferred stock (includingso-called ``Dutch auction'' preferred stock)_whether cumulative or noncumulative_fromTier 1. The Board has determined that certain unique features of auctionrate preferred stock do not allow it to fulfill adequately the supervisorypurpose of Tier 1 capital, and hence must be excluded from treatment asa core capital element.Auction-rate preferred stock refers to those types of preferred stock (includingmoney market and remarketable preferred) where the dividend is reset periodicallybased to some degree upon the banking organization's current credit rating.A number of supervisory concerns stem from this type of instrument. Ifsufficient buyers are not interested in holding the stock at the maximumrate at which it can be offered, the auction is said to have failed. This,in itself, can raise questions about the issuer's financial standing andsubject the issuer to pressure from unhappy or unwilling investors to repurchasethe outstanding stock. In addition, the very fact that the preferred stockdividend yield can rise when a banking organization's financial conditionor credit rating is deteriorating can exacerbate the institution's financialdifficulties. In light of these considerations, the Board believes thatthe auction rate features of such preferred shares render them inconsistentwith the notion of Tier 1 instruments as the highest quality form of capital.Auction-rate perpetual preferred stock continues to qualify as an elementof Tier 2 capital.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. </ITAG>GoodwillThe Board's March 1988 proposal stated that all good will carried on thebalance sheet of a bank holding company would be deducted from its Tier1 capital after December 31, 1992, and that any goodwill acquired afterMarch 12, 1988, would be deducted immediately. The proposal also statedthat goodwill in existence before March 12, 1988, would be ``grandfathered''during the transition period but would be deducted from Tier 1 capitalafter December 31, 1992.Banking organizations strongly opposed the proposed deduction of good willfor several reasons. First, they argued that good will has realizable value.Second, they stated their belief that the deduction would place bankingorganizations at a competitive disadvantage relative to nonbank competitorsin bidding for acquisitions. Third, they argued that the deduction wouldhamper the process of domestic banking consolidation by effectively eliminatingpurchase accounting as a viable method of consummating mergers and acquisitions.Many respondents also indicated that the deduction of goodwill is contraryboth to generally accepted accounting principles and existing Board policy.Because of these concerns, several commenters argued that at least a limitedamount of goodwill (generally, 25 percent) should be allowed in Tier 1capital. They viewed this ``cap'' on goodwill as consistent with the Board'sexisting policy of closely monitoring goodwill in excess of 25 percentof tangible primary capital. In the Board's view, the uncertainty often associated with determiningthe future benefits and useful lives of certain intangible assets, especiallygoodwill, raises significant supervisory concerns. During periods of financialadversity some intangibles may not provide the degree of support that isnormally expected from an organization's assets. In this regard, goodwill_whichrepresents the excess of the purchase price over the fair market valueof tangible, as well as identifiable intangible, assets acquired in a purchaseaccounting transaction_in particular raises concerns. As indicated above,the Board's proposal will exclude from capital only goodwill. Purchasedmortgage servicing rights and other identifiable intangibles will not bededucted automatically from the capital base under the revised Basle Accordas they would have been under earlier risk-based capital proposals.Since good will represents the capitalization of anticipated future earningsover and above what is implied by the fair market value of tangible andidentifiable intangible assets acquired, the Board is of the view thatits eventual exclusion from capital does not seem unreasonable. If theexpected superior future earnings materialize, they will be taken intoretained earnings and thereby reflected in capital. Supervisory experiencesuggests that when organizations are under serious financial strain andneed to draw upon their capital base, goodwill is not generally a sourceof financial strength.Accordingly, the Board has determined to adhere to its March proposal tograndfather existing goodwill for the transition period, but to deductall new goodwill_and, after 1992, <T3>all</T3> goodwill_from a holding company's Tier 1 capital. While thisrepresents a departure from the initial capital guidelines promulgatedby the Board in 1985, it is generally consistent with the Basle frameworkand the approach the Board has been employing in acting on major bank holdingcompany acquisitions. In this connection, the Board will retain its existingpolicy that organizations undertaking significant expansion, either throughinternal growth or acquisitions, are expected to have strong capital positionssubstantially above minimum levels without significant reliance on intangibles,particularly goodwill.<ITAG tagnum="81">3. Investments in Designated Subsidiaries </ITAG>The Board's application of a risk-based capital measure to bank holdingcompanies is intended to accommodate functional regulation and the expansionof holding company powers. To accomplish this objective, as indicated inthe March 1988 proposal, the guidelines allow the Board to deduct investmentsin certain subsidiaries from the parent organization's capital and to excludethe assets of these subsidiaries from the parent's consolidated assets,provided that strong firewalls, adequate nonbank capital, and any otherprotections the Board deems necessary are first put in place to safeguardaffiliated banks. This exclusion is designed to ensure that the parentbank holding company maintains a level of capital, exclusive of the resourcesinvested in such subsidiaries, that is sufficient to support its bank andother nonbank subsidiaries.Accordingly, the risk-based capital guidelines for bank holding companiesspecifically allow for the exclusion of the parent's investments in, andthe assets of, designated subsidiaries from the calculation of the holdingcompany's capital ratio. For this purpose, aggregate capital investments(that is, the sum of any equity or debt capital investments and other instrumentsthat are deemed to be capital) in these subsidiaries will be deducted fromthe parent banking organization's total capital components. Advances (thatis, loans, extensions of credit, guarantees, commitments, or any otherforms of credit exposure) to such subsidiaries that are not deemed to becapital will generally not be deducted from capital. Rather, such investmentswill normally be included in the parent banking organization's consolidatedassets and assigned to the 100 percent risk category, unless such obligationsare backed by recognized collateral or guarantees, in which case they willbe assigned to the risk category appropriate to such collateral or guarantees.These other extensions of credit may, however, be deducted from the parent'scapital if, in the judgment of the Federal Reserve, the risks stemmingfrom such advances are comparable to the risks associated with capitalinvestments, or if the advances involve other risk factors that warrantsuch an adjustment to capital for supervisory purposes. These other factorscould include, for example, the absence of collateral support for theseadvances. In assessing the overall capital adequacy of a banking organization,the Board will, as noted above, also consider the fully consolidated capitalposition of the organization.In general, when investments in subsidiary are deducted from a parent bankingorganization's capital, the subsidiary's assets will also be excluded fromthe assets of the parent banking organization in order to assess the latter'scapital adequacy. If the subsidiary's assets are consolidated with theparent banking organization for financial reporting purposes, this adjustmentwill involve excluding the subsidiary's assets on a line-by-line basisfrom the consolidated parent organization's assets. The parent bankingorganization's capital ratio will then be calculated on a consolidatedbasis with the exception that the assets of the excluded subsidiary willnot be consolidated with the remainder of the parent banking organization.The Board has considered the most equitable way in which to implement thesedeductions within the context of the revised Basle Accord. That Accordstates that the ``deduction for such investments will be made against thetotal capital base.'' The Board recognizes that several formulae couldbe devised which would be consistent with this provision. The Board hasdetermined, at least as an initial matter and as a general approach, thatthe most equitable method for implementing such deductions is to deductone-half (50 percent) of the aggregate amount of deductible investmentsfrom the parent banking organization's Tier 1 capital and one-half (50percent) from the parent's Tier 2 capital. However, the Federal Reservemay, on a case-by-case basis, deduct a proportionately greater amount fromTier 1 if the risks associated with the subsidiary so warrant. If the amountdeductible from Tier 2 capital exceeds actual Tier 2 capital, the excesswould be deducted from Tier 1 capital. Bank holding companies' risk-basedcapital ratios, net of these deductions, must exceed the minimum standardsset forth above.This method for deducting capital investments is generally consistent withthe Basle Accord's instruction to deduct such investments from total capital,as well as with the structure of the overall capital framework, which permitsequal amounts of Tier 1 and Tier 2 capital. Nonetheless, the Board willexamine the utilization of this general approach over time as it is implementedby bank holding campanies, and is prepared to reassess this method shouldcircumstances so warrant.C. Exemption for Small Bank Holding CampaniesThe Board's March 1988 proposal indicated that bank holding companies withless than $150 million in consolidated assets would generally be exemptfrom the calculation and analysis of risk-based ratios on a consolidatedholding company basis under the same terms and conditions as provided inthe Board's existing primary and total capital, leverage-based guidelines.That is, to qualify for the exemption, such companies may not be engagedin nonbank activities involving significant leverage or have significantamounts of debt outstanding to members of the general public. In such instances,the leverage capital requirements would apply only to the subsidiary banks,which are required to maintain a total capital-to-total assets ratio of7 percent.Two trade organizations representing smaller institutions argued that theasset size threshold for purposes of this exemption should be raised to$500 million, in order to reflect the effect of inflation on bank assetgrowth since the Board initially adopted the small bank holding companyexemption.The Board adopted its liberalized policy for assessing financial factorsin small one-bank holding companies in March 1980 in order to facilitatethe transfer of ownership in small banks. In pertinent part, this policyallows an applicant involved in the formation of a small bank holding company(total assets of $150 million or less) to borrow up to 75 percent of thepurchase price of the bank being acquired provided the applicant satisfiescertain other requirements. When the Board adopted its leverage-based capitalguidlines in December 1981, it decided to continue this policy and specificallyexempted bank holding companies with consolidated assets of $150 millionor less from meeting the minimum capital guidelines on a consolidated basis.If such companies were to be consolidated, a significant number could havevery low capital ratios due to the amount of leverage at the parent level.The Board believes that raising the $150 million threshold would run counterto a basic objective of both the leverage and the risk-based capital guidelines,which is to encourage consolidated banking organizations to strengthentheir capital positions. That is, if this threshold were raised, a largernumber of companies would be able to utilize the small bank holding companyliberalized debt guidelines to borrow against the equity of their subsidiarybanks. This could put significant pressure on bank subsidiaries to increasetheir dividends to service parent company borrowings, and, in the absenseof consolidated capital ratios, could materially reduce the holding companies'consolidated capital bases. Accordingly, consistent with the existing leverage-basedcapital guidelines, the risk-based guidelines retain the $150 million cutoff.<ITAG tagnum="84">VI. Regulatory Flexibility Act Analysis</ITAG>The Federal Reserve Board certifies that adoption of these guidelines wouldnot have a significant economic impact on a substantial number of smallbusiness entities, in this case small banking organizations, in accordwith the spirit and purposes of the Regulatory Flexibility Act (5 U.S.C.601 <T3>et seq.</T3>) While all commercial banking organizations would presumablybe required to make some revisions to their reporting procedures to permitsupervisory monitoring of risk-based capital ratios, the Board, in conjunctionwith the other Federal banking agencies, intends to adopt, after an opportunityfor public comment, reporting procedures designed to lessen the burdenon small institutions. In addition, these guidelines would generally notapply to bank holding companies with consolidated assets less than $150million.The guidelines are designed primarily to take account of those practices,such as the increased use of off-balance sheet risk and the decline inthe holdings of low-risk, liquid assets, which have been engaged in primarilyby certain larger banking organizations. Moreover, rather than requiringall banking organizations to raise additional capital, the guidelines aredirected at institutions whose capital positions are less than fully adequatein relation to their risk profiles.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>12 CFR Part 208Banks, Banking, Capital adequacy, Federal Reserve System, Reporting andrecordkeeping requirements, State member banks.12 CFR Part 225Banks, Banking, Capital adequacy, Federal Reserve System, Holding companies,Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, State member banks.For the reasons set out in this notice, and pursuant to the Board's authorityunder section 5(b) of the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956 (12 U.S.C. 1844(b)),and section 910 of the International Lending Supervision Act of 1983 (12U.S.C. 3909), the Board amends 12 CFR Parts 208 and 225 as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 208_MEMBERSHIP OF STATE BANKING INSTITUTIONS IN THE FEDERAL RESERVESYSTEM</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 208 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>12 U.S.C. 248, 321-338, 486, 1814, 3907, 3909, and15 U.S.C. 781(i).</ITAG>2. The Board revises andSection;208.13 of Part 208 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;208.13 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Capital adequacy.</ITAG>The standards and guidelines by which the capital adequacy of state memberbanks will be evaluated by the Board are set forth in Appendix A to Part208 for risk-based capital purposes, and in Appendix B to the Board's RegulationY, 12 CFR Part 225, with respect to the ratios relating capital to totalassets.3. The Board adds an Appendix A to Part 208 to read as set forth below.<ITAG tagnum="84">APPENDIX A TO PART 208: Capital Adequacy Guidelines for State MemberBanks: Risk-Based Measure</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">I. Overview</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System has adopted arisk-based capital measure to assist in the assessment of the capital adequacyof state member banks.\1\<NOTE/> The principal objectives of this measure are to: (i) Makeregulatory capital requirements more sensitive to differences in risk profilesamong banks; (ii) factor off-balance sheet exposures into the assessmentof capital adequacy; (iii) minimize disincentives to holding liquid, low-riskassets; and (iv) achieve greater consistency in the evaluation of the capitaladequacy of major banks throughout the world.\2\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ Supervisory ratios that relate capital to total assetsfor state member banks are outlines in Appendix B to Part 225 of the FederalReserve's Regulation Y, 12 CFR Part 225.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ The risk-based capital measure is based upon a frameworkdeveloped jointly by supervisory authorities from the countries representedon the Basle Committee on Banking Regulations and Supervisory Practices(Basle Supervisors' Committee) and endorsed by the Group of Ten CentralBank Governors. The framework is described in a paper prepared by the BSCentitled ``International Convergence of Capital Measurement,'' July 1988.<ITAG tagnum="21">The risk-based capital guidelines include both a definition of capitaland a framework for calculating weighted risk assets by assigning assetsand off-balance sheet items to broad risk categories. A bank's risk-basedcapital ratio is calculated by dividing its qualifying capital (the numeratorof the ratio) by its weighted risk assets (the denominator).\3\<NOTE/> The definition of qualifying capital is outlined below insection II, and the procedures for calculating weighted risk assets arediscussed in Section III. Attachment I illustrates a sample calculationof weighted risk assets and the risk-based capital ratio.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\ Banks will initially be expected to utilize period-endamounts in calculating their risk-based capital ratios. When necessaryand appropriate, ratios based on average balances may also be calculatedon a case-by-case basis. Moreover, to the extent banks have data on averagebalances that can be used to calculate risk-based ratios, the Federal Reservewill take such data into account.<ITAG tagnum="21">The risk-based capital guidelines also establish a schedule for achievinga minimum supervisory standard for the ratio of qualifying capital to weightedrisk assets and provide for transitional arrangements during a phase-inperiod to facilitate adoption and implementation of the measure at theend of 1992. These interim standards and transitional arrangements areset forth in section IV.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The risk-based guidelines apply to all state member banks on a consolidatedbasis. They are to be used in the examination and supervisory process aswell as in the analysis of applications acted upon by the Federal Reserve.Thus, in considering an application filed by a state member bank, the FederalReserve will take into account the bank's risk-based capital ratio, thereasonableness of its capital plans, and the degree of progress it hasdemonstrated toward meeting the interim and final risk-based capital standards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The risk-based capital ratio focuses principally on broad categoriesof credit risk, although the framework for assigning assets and off-balancesheet items to risk categories does incorporate elements of transfer risk,as well as limited instances of interest rate and market risk. The risk-basedratio does not, however, incorporate other factors that can affect a bank'sfinancial condition. These factors include overall interest rate exposure;liquidity, funding and market risks; the quality and level of earnings;investment or loan portfolio concentrations; the quality of loans and investments;the effectiveness of loan and investment policies; and management's abilityto monitor and control financial and operating risks.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In addition to evaluating capital ratios, an overall assessment ofcapital adequacy must take account of these other factors, including, inparticular, the level and severity of problem and classified assets. Forthis reason, the final supervisory judgment on a bank's capital adequacymay differ significantly from conclusions that might be drawn solely fromthe level of its risk-based capital ratio.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The risk-based capital guidelines establish <T3>minimum </T3>ratios of capital to weighted risk assets. In light ofthe considerations just discussed, banks generally are expected to operatewell above the minimum risk-based ratios. In particular, banks contemplatingsignificant expansion proposals are expected to maintain strong capitallevels substantially above the minimum ratios and should not allow significantdiminution of financial strength below these strong levels to fund theirexpansion plans. Institutions with high or inordinate levels of risk arealso expected to operate well above minimum capital standards. In all cases,institutions should hold capital commensurate with the level and natureof the risks to which they are exposed. Banks that do not meet the minimumrisk-based standard, or that are otherwise considered to be inadequatelycapitalized, are expected to develop and implement plans acceptable tothe Federal Reserve for achieving adequate levels of capital within a reasonableperiod of time.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Board will monitor the implementation and effect of these guidelinesin relation to domestic and international developments in the banking industry.When necessary and appropriate, the Board will consider the need to modifythe guidelines in light of any significant changes in the economy, financialmarkets, banking practices, or other relevant factors.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">II. Definition of Qualifying Capital for the Risk-Based Capital Ratio</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A bank's qualifying total capital consists of two types of capitalcomponents: ``core capital elements'' (comprising Tier 1 capital) and ``supplementarycapital elements'' (comprising Tier 2 capital). These capital elementsand the various limits, restrictions, and deductions to which they aresubject, are discussed below and are set forth in Attachment II.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">To qualify as an element of Tier 1 or Tier 2 capital, a capital instrumentmay not contain or be covered by any covenants, terms, or restrictionsthat are inconsistent with safe and sound banking practices.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Redemptions of permanent equity or other capital instruments beforestated maturity could have a significant impact on a bank's overall capitalstructure. Consequently, a bank considering such a step should consultwith the Federal Reserve before redeeming any equity or debt capital instrument(prior to maturity) if such redemption could have a material effect onthe level or composition of the institution's capital base.\4\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\ Consultation would not ordinarily be necessary if an instrumentwere redeemed with the proceeds of, or replaced by, a like amount of asimilar or higher quality capital instrument and the organization's capitalposition is considered fully adequate by the Federal Reserve.<ITAG tagnum="71">A. The Components of Qualifying Capital</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Core capital elements (Tier 1 capital). </T3>The Tier 1 component ofa bank's qualifying capital must represent at least 50 percent of qualifyingtotal capital and may consist of the following items that are defined ascore capital elements:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Common stockholders' equity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Qualifying noncumulative perpetual preferred stock (includingrelated surplus).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Minority interest in the equity accounts of consolidated subsidiaries.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Tier 1 capital is generally defined as the sum of the core capitalelements less goodwill.\5\<NOTE/> (See section II (B) below for a more detailed discussionof the treatment of goodwill, including an explanation of certain limitedgrandfathering arrangements.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\ During the transition period and subject to certain limitationsset forth in section IV below, Tier 1 capital may also include items definedas supplementary capital elements.<ITAG tagnum="21">a. <T3>Common stockholders' equity. </T3>Common stockholders' equity includes:common stock; related surplus; and retained earnings, including capitalreserves and adjustments for the cumulative effect of foreign currencytranslation, net of any treasury stock.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. <T3>Perpetual preferred stock. </T3>Perpetual preferred stock is definedas preferred stock that does not have a maturity date, that cannot be redeemedat the option of the holder of the instrument, and that has no other provisionsthat will require future redemption of the issue. In general, preferredstock will qualify for inclusion in capital only if it can absorb losseswhile the issuer operates as a going concern (a fundamental characteristicof equity capital) <T3>and </T3>only if the issuer has the ability and legal right to deferor eliminate preferred dividends.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The only form of perpetual preferred stock that state member banksmay consider as an element of Tier 1 capital is noncumulative perpetualpreferred. While the guidelines allow for the inclusion of noncumulativeperpetual preferred stock in Tier 1, it is desirable from a supervisorystandpoint that voting common stockholders' equity remain the dominantform of Tier 1 capital. Thus, state member banks should avoid overrelianceon preferred stock or non-voting equity elements within Tier 1.\6\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\6\ The Federal Reserve's capital guidelines for bank holdingcompanies limit the amount of perpetual preferred stock that may be includedin Tier 1 to 25 percent of Tier 1. (See 12 CFR Part 225, Appendix A.)<ITAG tagnum="21">Perpetual preferred stock in which the dividend is reset periodicallybased, in whole or in part, upon the bank's current credit standing (thatis, auction rate perpetual preferred stock, including so-called Dutch auction,money market, and remarketable preferred) will not qualify for inclusionin Tier 1 capital.\7\<NOTE/> Such instruments, however, qualify for inclusion in Tier2 capital.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\7\ Adjustable rate noncumulative perpetual preferred stock(that is, perpetual preferred stock in which the dividend rate is not affectedby the issuer's credit standing or financial condition but is adjustedperiodically according to a formula based solely on general market interestrates) may be included in Tier 1.<ITAG tagnum="21">c. <T3>Minority interest in equity accounts of consolidated subsidiaries.</T3>This element is included in Tier 1 because, as a general rule, itrepresents equity that is freely available to absorb losses in operatingsubsidiaries. While not subject to an explicit sublimit within Tier 1,banks are expected to avoid using minority interest in the equity accountsof consolidated subsidiaries as an avenue for introducing into their capitalstructures elements that might not otherwise qualify as Tier 1 capitalor that would, in effect, result in an excessive reliance on preferredstock within Tier 1.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Supplementary capital elements (Tier 2 capital). </T3>The Tier 2 componentof a bank's qualifying total capital may consist of the following itemsthat are defined as supplementary capital elements:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Allowance for loan and lease losses (subject to limitations discussedbelow).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Perpetual preferred stock and related surplus (subject to conditionsdiscussed below).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Hybrid capital instruments (as defined below) and mandatoryconvertible debt securities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Term subordinated debt and intermediate-term preferred stock,including related surplus (subject to limitations discussed below).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The maximum amount of Tier 2 capital that may be included in a bank'squalifying total capital is limited to 100 percent of Tier 1 capital (netof goodwill).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The elements of supplementary capital are discussed in greater detailbelow.\8\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\8\ The Basle capital framework also provides for the inclusionof ``undisclosed reserves'' in Tier 2. As defined in the framework, undisclosedreserves represent accumulated after-tax retained earnings that are notdisclosed on the balance sheet of a bank. Apart from the fact that thesereserves are not disclosed publicly, they are essentially of the same qualityand character as retained earnings, and, to be included in capital, suchreserves must be accepted by the bank's home supervisor. Although suchundisclosed reserves are common in some countries, under generally acceptedaccounting principles (GAAP) and long-standing supervisory practice, thesetypes of reserves are not recognized for state member banks.<ITAG tagnum="21">a. <T3>Allowance for loan and lease losses.</T3> Allowances for loan and leaselosses are reserves that have been established through a charge againstearnings to absorb future losses on loans or lease financing receivables.Allowances for loan and lease losses exclude ``allocated transfer riskreserves,'' \9\<NOTE/> and reserves created against identified losses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\9\ Allocated transfer risk reserves are reserves that havebeen established in accordance with Section 905(a) of the InternationalLending Supervision Act of 1983, 12 U.S.C. 3904(a), against certain assetswhose value U.S. supervisory authorities have found to be significantlyimpaired by protracted transfer risk problems.<ITAG tagnum="21">During the transition period, the risk-based capital guidelines providefor reducing the amount of this allowance that may be included in an institution'stotal capital. Initially, it is unlimited. However, by year-end 1990, theamount of the allowance for loan and lease losses that will qualify ascapital will be limited to 1.5 percent of an institution's weighted riskassets. By the end of the transition period, the amount of the allowancequalifying for inclusion in Tier 2 capital may not exceed 1.25 percentof weighted risk assets.\10\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\10\ The amount of the allowance for loan and lease lossesthat may be included in Tier 2 capital is based on a percentage of grossweighted risk assets. A bank may deduct reserves for loan and lease lossesin excess of the amount permitted to be included in Tier 2 capital, aswell as allocated transfer risk reserves, from the sum of gross weightedrisk assets and use the resulting net sum of weighted risk assets in computingthe denominator of the risk-based capital ratio.<ITAG tagnum="21">b. <T3>Perpetual preferred stock.</T3> Perpetual preferred stock, as notedabove, is defined as preferred stock that has no maturity date, that cannotbe redeemed at the option of the holder, and that has no other provisionsthat will require future redemption of the issue. Such instruments areeligible for inclusion in Tier 2 capital without limit.\11\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\11\ Long-term preferred stock with an original maturity of20 years or more (including related surplus) will also qualify in thiscategory as an element of Tier 2. If the holder of such an instrument hasa right to require the issuer to redeem, repay, or repurchase the instrumentprior to the original stated maturity, maturity would be defined, for risk-basedcapital purposes, as the earliest possible date on which the holder canput the instrument back to the issuing bank.<ITAG tagnum="21">c. <T3>Hybrid capital instruments and mandatory convertible debt securities.</T3>Hybrid capital instruments include instruments that are essentially permanentin nature and that have certain characteristics of both equity and debt.Such instruments may be included in Tier 2 without limit. The general criteriahybrid capital instruments must meet in order to qualify for inclusionin Tier 2 capital are listed below:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The instrument must be unsecured; fully paid-up; and subordinatedto general creditors and must also be subordinated to claims of depositors.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The instrument must not be redeemable at the option of the holderprior to maturity, except with the prior approval of the Federal Reserve.(Consistent with the Board's criteria for perpetual debt and mandatoryconvertible securities, this requirement implies that holders of such instrumentsmay not accelerate the payment of principal except in the event of bankruptcy,insolvency, or reorganization.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The instrument must be available to participate in losses whilethe issuer is operating as a going concern. (Term subordinated debt wouldnot meet this requirement.) To satisfy this requirement, the instrumentmust convert to common or perpetual preferred stock in the event that theaccumulated losses exceed the sum of the retained earnings and capitalsurplus accounts of the issuer.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) The instrument must provide the option for the issuer to deferinterest payments if: (a) The issuer does not report a profit in the precedingannual period (defined as combined profits for the most recent four quarters),<T3>and</T3> (b) the issuer eliminates cash dividends on common and preferredstock.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Mandatory convertible debt securities in the form of equity contractnotes that meet the criteria set forth in 12 CFR Part 225, Appendix B,also qualify as unlimited elements of Tier 2 capital. In accordance withthat appendix, equity commitment notes issued prior to May 15, 1985 alsoqualify for inclusion in Tier 2.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">d. <T3>Subordinated debt and intermediate-term preferred stock.</T3> The aggregateamount of term subordinated debt (excluding mandatory convertible debt)and intermediate-term preferred stock that may be treated as supplementarycaptial is limited to 50 percent of Tier 1 capital (net of goodwill). Amountsin excess of these limits may be issued and, while not included in theratio calculation, will be taken into account in the overall assessmentof a bank's funding and financial condition.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Subordinated debt and intermediate-term preferred stock must havean original weighted average maturity of at least five years to qualifyas supplementary capital. (If the holder has the option to require theissuer to redeem, repay, or repurchase the instrument prior to the originalstated maturity, maturity would be defined, for risk-based capital purposes,as the earliest possible date on which the holder can put the instrumentback to the issuing bank.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In the case of subordinated debt, the instrument must be unsecuredand must clearly state on its face that it is not a deposit and is notinsured by a Federal agency. To qualify as capital in banks, debt mustbe subordinated to general creditors and claims of depositors. Consistentwith current regulatory requirements, if a state member bank wishes toredeem subordinated debt before the stated maturity, it must receive priorapproval of the Federal Reserve. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">e. <T3>Discount of supplementary capital instruments.</T3> As a limited-lifecapital instrument approaches maturity it begins to take on characteristicsof a short-term obligation. For this reason, the outstanding amount ofterm subordinated debt and any long- or intermediate-life, or term, preferredstock eligible for inclusion in Tier 2 is reduced, or discounted, as theseinstruments approach maturity: one-fifth of the original amount, less anyredemptions, is excluded each year during the instrument's last five yearsbefore maturity.\12\<NOTE/> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\12\ For example, outstanding amounts of these instrumentsthat count as supplementary capital include: 100 percent of the outstandingamounts with remaining maturities of more than five years; 80 percent ofoutstanding amounts with remaining maturities of four to five years; 60percent of outstanding amounts with remaining maturities of three to fouryears; 40 percent of outstanding amounts with remaining maturities of twoto three years; 20 percent of outstanding amounts with remaining maturitiesof one to two years; and 0 percent of outstanding amounts with remainingmaturities of less than one year. Such instruments with a remaining maturityof less than one year are excluded from Tier 2 capital. <ITAG tagnum="21">f. <T3>Revaluation reserves.</T3> Such reserves reflect the formal balancesheet restatement or revaluation for capital purposes of asset carryingvalues to reflect current market values. In the United States, banks forthe most part, follow GAAP when preparing their financial statements, andGAAP generally does not permit the use of market-value accounting. Forthis and other reasons, the Federal banking agencies generally have notincluded unrealized asset values in capital ratio calculations, althoughthey have long taken such values into account as a separate factor in assessingthe overall financial strength of a bank. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Consistent with long-standing supervisory practice, the excess ofmarket values over book values for assets held by state member banks willgenerally not be recognized in supplementary capital or in the calculationof the risk-based capital ratio. However, all banks are encouraged to disclosetheir equivalent or premises (building) and equity revaluation reserves.Such values will be taken into account as additional considerations inassessing overall capital strength and financial condition. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">B. Deductions from Capital and Other Adjustments </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Certain assets are deducted from a bank's capital for the purposeof calculating the risk-based capital ratio.\13\<NOTE/> These assets include: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\13\ Any assets deducted from capital in computing the numeratorof the ratio are not included in weighted risk assets in computing thedenominator of the ratio. <ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Goodwill_deducted from the sum of core capital elements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Investments in banking and finance subsidiaries that are notconsolidated for accounting or supervisory purposes and, on a case-by-casebasis, investments in other designated subsidiaries or associated companiesat the discretion of the Federal Reserve_deducted from total capital components.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Reciprocal holdings of capital instruments of banking organizations_deductedfrom total capital components. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Goodwill and other intangible assets.</T3>_a. <T3>Goodwill.</T3> Goodwill in an intangible asset that represents theexcess of the purchase price over the fair market value of identifiableassets acquired less liabilities assumed in acquisitions accounted forunder the purchase method of accounting. State member banks generally havenot been allowed to include goodwill in regulatory capital under currentsupervisory policies. Consistent with this policy, all goodwill in statemember banks will be deducted from Tier 1 capital.\14\<NOTE/> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\14\ An exception is made for those state member banks thathave acquired goodwill in connection with supervisory mergers with troubledor failed depository institutions and that were given explicit authorityto include such goodwill in capital under the then-existing capital policy.Consistent with this approach, state member banks will be allowed to includesuch goodwill in Tier 1 capital for risk-based capital purposes. <ITAG tagnum="21">b. <T3>Other intangible assets.</T3> The Federal Reserve is not proposing,as a matter of general policy, to deduct automatically any other intangibleassets from the capital of state member banks. The Federal Reserve, however,will continue to monitor closely the level and quality of other intangibleassets_including purchased mortgage servicing rights, leaseholds, and coredeposit value_and take them into account in assessing the capital adequacyand overall asset quality of banks. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Generally, banks should review all intangible assets at least quarterlyand, if necessary, make appropriate reductions in their carrying values.In addition, in order to conform with prudent banking practice, an institutionshould reassess such values during its annual audit. Banks should use appropriateamortization methods and assign prudent amortization periods for intangibleassets. Examiners will review the carrying value of these assets, togetherwith supporting documentation, as well as the appropriateness of includingparticular intangible assets in a bank's capital calculation. In makingsuch evaluations, examiners will consider a number of factors, including:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The reliability and predictability of any cash flows associatedwith the asset and the degree of certainty that can be achieved in periodicallydetermining the asset's useful life and value;  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The existence of an active and liquid market for the asset; and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The feasibility of selling the asset apart from the bank or fromthe bulk of its assets. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">While all intangible assets will be monitored, intangible assets (otherthan goodwill) in excess of 25 percent of Tier 1 capital (which is definednet of goodwill) will be subject to particularly close scrutiny, both throughthe examination process and by other appropriate means. Whenever necessary_inparticular, when assessing applications to expand or to engage in otheractivities that could entail unusual or higher-than-normal risks_the Boardwill, on a case-by-case basis, continue to consider the level of an individualbank's tangible capital ratios (after deducting all intangible assets),together with the quality and value of the bank's tangible and intangibleassets, in making an overall assessment of capital adequacy. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Consistent with long-standing Board policy, banks experiencing substantialgrowth, whether internally or by acquisition, are expected to maintainstrong capital positions substantially above minimum supervisory levels,without significant reliance on intangible assets.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Investments in certain subsidiaries.</T3> The aggregate amount of investmentsin banking or finance subsidiaries\15\<NOTE/> whose financial statements are not consolidated for accountingor bank regulatory reporting purposes will be deducted from a bank's totalcapital components.\16\<NOTE/> Generally, investments for this purpose are defined as equityand debt capital investments and any other instruments that are deemedto be capital in the particular subsidiary.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\15\For this purpose, a banking and finance subsidiary generallyis defined as any company engaged in banking or finance in which the parentinstitution holds directly or indirectly more than 50 percent of the outstandingvoting stock, or which is otherwise controlled or capable of being controlledby the parent institution.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\16\An exception to this deduction would be made in the caseof shares acquired in the regular course of securing or collecting a debtpreviously contracted in good faith. The requirements for consolidationare spelled out in the instructions to the commercial bank ConsolidatedReports of Condition and Income (Call Report).<ITAG tagnum="21">Advances (that is, loans, extensions of credit, guarantees, commitments,or any other forms of credit exposure) to the subsidiary that are not deemedto be capital will generally not be deducted from a bank's capital. Rather,such advances generally will be included in the bank's consolidated assetsand be assigned to the 100 percent risk category, unless such obligationsare backed by recognized collateral or guarantees, in which case they willbe assigned to the risk category appropriate to such collateral or guarantees.These advances may, however, also be deducted from the bank's capital if,in the judgment of the Federal Reserve, the risks stemming from such advancesare comparable to the risks associated with capital investments or if theadvances involve other risk factors that warrant such an adjustment tocapital for supervisory purposes. These other factors could include, forexample, the absence of collateral support.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Inasmuch as the assets of unconsolidated banking and finance subsidiariesare not fully reflected in a bank's consolidated total assets, such assetsmay be viewed as the equivalent of off-balance sheet exposures since theoperations of an unconsolidated subsidiary could expose the bank to considerablerisk. For this reason, it is generally appropriate to view the capitalresources invested in these unconsolidated entities as primarily supportingthe risks inherent in these off-balance sheet assets, and not generallyavailable to support risks or absorb losses elsewhere in the bank.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Federal Reserve may, on a case-by-case basis, also deduct froma bank's capital, investments in certain other subsidiaries in order todetermine if the consolidated bank meets minimum supervisory capital requirementswithout reliance on the resources invested in such subsidiaries.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Federal Reserve will not automatically deduct investments in otherconsolidated subsidiaries or investments in joint ventures and associatedcompanies.\17\<NOTE/> Nonetheless, the resources invested in these entities, likeinvestments in unconsolidated banking and finance subsidiaries, supportassets not consolidated with the rest of the bank's activities and, therefore,may not be generally available to support additional leverage or absorblosses elsewhere in the bank. Moreover, experience has shown that banksstand behind the losses of affiliated institutions, such as joint venturesand associated companies, in order to protect the reputation of the organizationas a whole. In some cases, this has led to losses that have exceeded theinvestments in such organizations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\17\The definition of such entities is contained in the instructionsto the commercial bank Call Report. Under regulatory reporting procedures,associated companies and joint ventures generally are defined as companiesin which the bank owns 20 to 50 percent of the voting stock.<ITAG tagnum="21">For this reason, the Federal Reserve will monitor the level and natureof such investments for individual banks and, on a case-by-case basis may,for risk-based capital purposes, deduct such investments from total capitalcomponents, apply an appropriate risk-weighted capital charge against thebank's proportionate share of the assets of its associated companies, requirea line-by-line consolidation of the entity (in the event that the bank'scontrol over the entity makes it the functional equivalent of a subsidiary),or otherwise require the bank to operate with a risk-based capital ratioabove the minimum.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In considering the appropriateness of such adjustments or actions,the Federal Reserve will generally take into account whether: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The bank has significant influence over the financial or managerialpolicies or operations of the subsidiary, joint venture, or associatedcompany; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The bank is the largest investor in the affiliated company; or</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Other circumstances prevail that appear to closely tie the activitiesof the affiliated company to the bank. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Reciprocal holdings of banking organizations' capital instruments.</T3>Reciprocal holdings of banking organizations' capital instruments (thatis, instruments that qualify as Tier 1 or Tier 2 capital) \18\<NOTE/> will be deducted from a bank's total capital components forthe purpose of determining the numerator of the risk-based capital ratio.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\18\ See 12 CFR Part 225, Appendix A for instruments thatqualify as Tier 1 and Tier 2 capital for bank holding companies. <ITAG tagnum="21">Reciprocal holdings are cross-holdings resulting from formal or informalarrangements in which two or more banking organizations swap, exchange,or otherwise agree to hold each other's capital instruments. Generally,deductions will be limited to intentional cross-holdings. At present, theBoard does not intend to require banks to deduct non-reciprocal holdingsof such capital instruments.\19\ \20\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\19\ Deductions of holdings of capital securities also wouldnot be made in the case of interstate ``stake out'' investments that complywith the Board's Policy Statement on Nonvoting Equity Investments, 12 CFR225.143. In addition, holdings of capital instruments issued by other bankingorganizations but taken in satisfaction of debts previously contractedwould be exempt from any deduction from capital. <ITAG tagnum="28">\20\ The Board intends to monitor non-reciprocal holdings of otherbanking organizations' capital instruments and to provide information onsuch holdings to the Basle Supervisors' Committee as called for under theBasle capital framework. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">III. Procedures for Computing Weighted Risk Assets and Off-BalanceSheet Items </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">A. Procedures. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Assets and credit equivalent amounts of off-balance sheet items ofstate member banks are assigned to one of several broad risk categories,according to the obligor, or, if relevant, the guarantor or the natureof the collateral. The aggregate dollar value of the amount in each categoryis then multiplied by the risk weight associated with that category. Theresulting weighted values from each of the risk categories are added together,and this sum is the bank's total weighted risk assets that comprise thedenominator of the risk-based capital ratio. Attachment I provides a samplecalculation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Risk weights for all off-balance sheet items are determined by a two-stepprocess. First, the ``credit equivalent amount'' of off-balance sheet itemsis determined, in most cases by multiplying the off-balance sheet itemby a credit conversion factor. Second, the credit equivalent amount istreated like any balance sheet asset and generally is assigned to the appropriaterisk category according to the obligor, or, if relevant, the guarantoror the nature of the collateral. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In general, if a particular item qualifies for placement in more thanone risk category, it is assigned to the category that has the lowest riskweight. A holding of a U.S. municipal revenue bond that is fully guaranteedby a U.S. bank, for example, would be assigned the 20 percent risk weightappropriate to claims guaranteed by U.S. banks, rather than the 50 percentrisk weight appropriate to U.S. municipal revenue bonds.\21\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\21\ An investment in shares of a fund whose portfolio consistssolely of various securities or money market instruments that, if heldseparately, would be assigned to different risk categories, is generallyassigned to the risk category appropriate to the highest risk-weightedsecurity or instrument that the fund is permitted to hold in accordancewith its stated investment objectives. However, in no case will indirectholdings through shares in such funds be assigned to the zero percent riskcategory. For example, if a fund is permitted to hold U.S. Treasuries andcommercial paper, shares in that fund would generally be assigned the 100percent risk weight appropriate to commercial paper, regardless of theactual composition of the fund's investments at any particular time. Sharesin a fund that may invest only in U.S. Treasury securities would generallybe assigned to the 20 percent risk category. If, in order to maintain anecessary degree of short-term liquidity, a fund is permitted to hold aninsignificant amount of its assets in short-term, highly liquid securitiesof superior credit quality that do not qualify for a preferential riskweight, such securities will generally not be taken into account in determiningthe risk category into which the bank's holding in the overall fund shouldbe assigned. Regardless of the composition of the fund's securities, ifthe fund engages in any activities that appear speculative in nature (forexample, use of futures, forwards, or option contracts for purposes otherthan to reduce interest rate risk) or has any other characteristics thatare inconsistent with the preferential risk weighting assigned to the fund'sinvestments, holdings in the fund will be assigned to the 100 percent riskcategory. During the examination process, the treatment of shares in suchfunds that are assigned to a lower risk weight will be subject to examinerreview to ensure that they have been assigned an appropriate risk weight.<ITAG tagnum="21">The terms ``claims'' and ``securities'' used in the context of thediscussion of risk weights, unless otherwise specified, refer to loansor debt obligations of the entity on whom the claim is held. Assets inthe form of stock or equity holdings in commercial or financial firms areassigned to the 100 percent risk category, unless some other treatmentis explicitly permitted. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">B. Collateral, Guarantees, and Other Considerations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Collateral. </T3>The only forms of collateral that are formally recognizedby the risk-based capital framework are: Cash on deposit in the bank; securitiesissued or guaranteed by the central governments of the OECD-based groupof countries\22\<NOTE/>, U.S. Government agencies, or U.S. Government-sponsored agencies;and securities issued by multilateral lending institutions or regionaldevelopment banks. Claims fully secured by such collateral are assignedto the 20 percent risk weight category. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\22\ The OECD-based group of countries comprises all fullmembers of the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD),as well as countries that have concluded special lending arrangements withthe International Monetary Fund (IMF) associated with the Fund's GeneralArrangements to Borrow. The OECD includes the following countries: Australia,Austria, Belgium, Canada, Denmark, the Federal Republic of Germany, Finland,France, Greece, Iceland, Ireland, Italy, Japan, Luxembourg, Netherlands,New Zealand, Norway, Portugal, Spain, Sweden, Switzerland, Turkey, theUnited Kingdom, and the United States. Saudi Arabia has concluded speciallending arrangements with the IMF associated with the Fund's General Arrangementsto Borrow. <ITAG tagnum="21">The extent to which qualifying securities are recognized as collateralis determined by their current market value. If a claim is only partiallysecured, that is, the market value of the pledged securities is less thanthe face amount of a balance sheet asset or an off-balance sheet item,the portion that is covered by the market value of the qualifying collateralis assigned to the 20 percent risk category, and the portion of the claimthat is not covered by collateral in the form of cash or a qualifying securityis assigned to the risk category appropriate to the obligor or, if relevant,the guarantor. For example, to the extent that a claim on a private sectorobligor is collateralized by the current market value of U.S. Governmentsecurities, it would be placed in the 20 percent risk category, and thebalance would be assigned to the 100 percent risk category. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Guarantees. </T3>Guarantees of the OECD and non-OECD central governments,U.S. Government agencies, U.S. Government-sponsored agencies, state andlocal governments of the OECD-based group of countries, multilateral lendinginstitutions and regional development banks, U.S. depository institutions,and foreign banks are also recognized. If a claim is partially guaranteed,that is, coverage of the guarantee is less than the face amount of a balancesheet asset or an off-balance sheet item, the portion that is not fullycovered by the guarantee is assigned to the risk category appropriate tothe obligor or, if relevant, to any collateral. The face amount of a claimcovered by two types of guarantees that have different risk weights, suchas a U.S. Government guarantee and a state guarantee, is to be apportionedbetween the two risk categories appropriate to the guarantors. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The existence of other forms of collateral or guarantees that therisk-based capital framework does not formally recognize may be taken intoconsideration in evaluating the risks inherent in a bank's loan portfolio_which,in turn, would affect the overall supervisory assessment of the bank'scapital adequacy. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Mortgage-backed securities. </T3>Mortgage-backed securities, includingpass-throughs and collateralized mortgage obligations (but not strippedmortgage-backed securities), that are <T3>issued </T3>or <T3>guaranteed </T3>by a U.S. Government agency or U.S. Government-sponsoredagency are assigned to the risk weight category appropriate to the issueror guarantor. Generally, a privately-issued mortgage-backed security meetingcertain criteria set forth in the accompanying footnote,\23\<NOTE/> is treated as essentially an indirect holding of the underlyingassets, and assigned to the same risk category as the underlying assets,but in no case to the zero percent risk category. Privately-issued mortgage-backedsecurities whose structures do not qualify them to be regarded as indirectholdings of the underlying assets are assigned to the 100 percent riskcategory. During the examination process, privately-issued mortgage-backedsecurities that are assigned to a lower risk weight category will be subjectto examiner review to ensure that they meet the appropriate criteria. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\23\ A privately-issued mortgage-backed security may be treatedas an indirect holding of the underlying assets provided that: (1) Theunderlying assets are held by an independent trustee and the trustee hasa first priority, perfected security interest in the underlying assetson behalf of the holders of the security; (2) either the holder of thesecurity has an undivided <T3>pro rata </T3>ownership interest in the underlying mortgage assetsor the trust or single purpose entity (or conduit) that issues the securityhas no liabilities unrelated to the issued securities; (3) the securityis structured such that the cash flow from the underlying assets in allcases fully meets the cash flow requirements of the security without unduereliance on any reinvestment income; and (4) there is no material reinvestmentrisk associated with any funds awaiting distribution to the holders ofthe security. In addition, if the underlying assets of a mortgage-backedsecurity are composed of more than one type of asset, for example, U.S.Government-sponsored agency securities and privately-issued pass-throughsecurities that qualify for the 50 percent risk category, the entire mortgage-backedsecurity is generally assigned to the category appropriate to the highestrisk-weighted asset underlying the issue. Thus, in this example, the securitywould receive the 50 percent risk weight appropriate to the privately-issuedpass-through securities. <ITAG tagnum="21">While the risk category to which mortgage-backed securities is assignedwill generally be based upon the issuer or guarantor or, in the case ofprivately-issued mortgage-backed securities, the assets underlying thesecurity, any class of a mortgage-backed security that can absorb morethan its <T3>pro rata </T3>share of loss without the whole issue being in default(for example, a so-called subordinate class or residual interest), is assignedto the 100 percent risk category. Furthermore, all stripped mortgage-backedsecurities, including interest-only strips (IOs), principal-only strips(POs), and similar instruments are also assigned to the 100 percent riskweight category, regardless of the issuer or guarantor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. <T3>Maturity.</T3> Maturity is generally not a factor in assigning itemsto risk categories with the exception of claims on non-OECD banks, commitments,and interest rate and foreign exchange rate contracts. Except for commitments,short-term is defined as one year or less <T3>remaining</T3> maturity and long-term is defined as over one year <T3>remaining</T3> maturity. In the case of commitments, short-term isdefined as one year or less <T3>original</T3> maturity and long-term is defined as over one year <T3>original</T3> maturity.\24\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\24\ Through year-end 1992, remaining, rather than original,maturity may be used for determining the maturity of commitments.<ITAG tagnum="71">C. </ITAG>Risk Weights<ITAG tagnum="21">Attachment III contains a listing of the risk categories, a summaryof the types of assets assigned to each category and the weight associatedwith each category, that is, 0 percent, 20 percent, 50 percent, and 100percent. A brief explanation of the components of each category follows.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Category 1: zero percent. </T3>This category includes cash (domesticand foreign) owned and held in all offices of the bank or in transit andgold bullion held in the bank's own vaults or in another bank's vaultson an allocated basis, to the extent it is offset by gold bullion liabilities.\25\<NOTE/> The category also includes all direct claims (including securities,loans, and leases) on, and the portions of claims that are directly andunconditionally guaranteed by, the central governments \26\<NOTE/> of the OECD countries and U.S. Government agencies,\27\<NOTE/> as well as all direct local currency claims on, and the portionsof local currency claims that are directly and unconditionally guaranteedby, the central governments of non-OECD countries, to the extent that thebank has liabilities booked in that currency. A claim is not consideredto be unconditionally guaranteed by a central government if the validityof the guarantee is dependent upon some affirmative action by the holderor a third party. Generally, securities guaranteed by the U.S. Governmentor its agencies that are actively traded in financial markets, such asGNMA securities, are considered to be unconditionally guaranteed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\25\ All other holdings of bullion are assigned to the 100percent risk category.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\26\ A central government is defined to include departmentsand ministries, including the central bank, of the central government.The U.S. central bank includes the 12 Federal Reserve Banks, and the stockheld in these banks as a condition of membership is assigned to the zeropercent risk category. The definition of central government does not includestate, provincial, or local governments; or commercial enterprises ownedby the central government. In addition, it does not include local governmententities or commercial enterprises whose obligations are guaranteed bythe central government, although any claims on such entities guaranteedby central governments are placed in the same general risk category asother claims guaranteed by central governments. OECD central governmentsare defined as central governments of the OECD-based group of countries;non-OECD central governments are defined as central governments that donot belong to the OECD-based group countries.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\27\ A U.S. Government agency is defined as an instrumentalityof the U.S. Government whose obligations are fully and explicitly guaranteedas to the timely payment of principal and interest by the full faith andcredit of the U.S. Government. Such agencies include the Government NationalMortgage Association (GNMA), the Veterans Administration (VA), the FederalHousing Administration (FHA), the Export-Import Bank (Exim Bank), the OverseasPrivate Investment Corporation (OPIC), the Commodity Credit Corporation(CCC), and the Small Business Administration (SBA).<ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Category 2: 20 percent. </T3>This category includes cash items in theprocess of collection, both foreign and domestic; short-term claims (includingdemand deposits) on, and the portions of short-term claims that are guaranteed\2\\8\<NOTE/> by, U.S. depository institutions \2\\9\<NOTE/> and foreign banks \3\\0\<NOTE/>; and long-term claims on, and the portions of long-term claimsthat are guaranteed by, U.S. depository institutions and OECD banks.\3\\1\<NOTE/> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\\8\ Claims guaranteed by U.S. depository institutions andforeign banks include risk participations in both bankers acceptances andstandby letters of credit, as well as participations in commitments, thatare conveyed to other U.S. depository institutions or foreign banks.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\\9\ U.S. depository institutions are defined to includebranches (foreign and domestic) of federally-insured banks and depositoryinstitutions chartered and headquartered in the 50 states of the UnitedStates, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, and U.S. territories andpossessions. The definition encompasses banks, mutual or stock savingsbanks, savings or building and loan associations, cooperative banks, creditunions, and international banking facilities of domestic banks. U.S.-chartereddepository institutions owned by foreigners are also included in the definition.However, branches and agencies of foreign banks located in the U.S., aswell as all bank holding companies, are excluded.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\\0\ Foreign banks are distinguished as either OECD banksor non-OECD banks. OECD banks include banks and their branches (foreignand domestic) organized under the laws of countries (other than the U.S.)that belong to the OECD-based group of countries. Non-OECD banks includebanks and their branches (foreign and domestic) organized under the lawsof countries that do not belong to the OECD-based group of countries. Forthis purpose, a bank is defined as an institution that engages in the businessof banking; is recognized as a bank by the bank supervisory or monetaryauthorities of the country of its organization or principal banking operations;receives deposits to a substantial extent in the regular course of business;and has the power to accept demand deposits. Claims on, and the portionsof claims that are guaranteed by, a non-OECD central bank are treated asclaims on, or guaranteed by, a non-OECD bank, except for local currencyclaims on, and the portions of local currency claims that are guaranteedby, non-OECD central bank that are funded in local currency liabilities.The latter claims are assigned to either the zero percent risk category.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\\1\ Long-term claims on, or guaranteed by, non-OECD banksand all claims on bank holding companies are assigned to the 100 percentrisk category, as are holdings of bank-issued securities that qualify ascapital of the issuing banks.<ITAG tagnum="21">This category also includes the portions of claims that are conditionallyguaranteed by OECD central governments and U.S. Government agencies, aswell as the portions of local currency claims that are conditionally guaranteedby non-OECD central governments, to the extent that the bank has liabilitiesbooked in that currency. In addition, this category includes claims on,and the portions of claims that are guaranteed by, U.S. Government-sponsored\3\\2\<NOTE/> agencies and claims on, and the portions of claims guaranteedby, the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development (World Bank),the Interamerican Development Bank, the Asian Development Bank, the AfricanDevelopment Bank, the European Investment Bank, and other multilaterallending institutions or regional development banks in which the U.S. Governmentis a shareholder or contributing member. General obligation claims on,or portions of claims guaranteed by the full faith and credit of, statesor other political subdivisions of the U.S. or other countries of the OECD-basedgroup are also assigned to this category.\3\\3\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\\2\ For this purpose, U.S. Government-sponsored agenciesare defined as agencies originally established or chartered by the Federalgovernment to serve public purposes specified by the U.S. Congress butwhose obligations are <T3>not explicitly </T3>guaranteed by the full faith and credit of theU.S. Government. These agencies include the Federal Home Loan MortgageCorporation (FHLMC), the Federal National Mortgage Association (FNMA),the Farm Credit System, the Federal Home Loan Bank System, and the StudentLoan Marketing Association (SLMA). Claims on U.S. Government-sponsoredagencies include capital stock in a Federal Home Loan Bank that is heldas a condition of membership in that bank.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\\3\ Claims on, or guaranteed by, states or other politicalsubdivisions of countries that do not belong to the OECD-based group ofcountries are placed in the 100 percent risk category.<ITAG tagnum="21">This category also includes the portions of claims (including repurchaseagreements) collateralized by cash on deposit in the bank; by securitiesissued or guaranteed by OECD central governments, U.S. Government agencies,or U.S. Government-sponsored agencies; or by securities issued by multilaterallending institutions or regional development banks in which the U.S. Governmentis a shareholder or contributing member.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Category 3: 50 percent.</T3> This category includes loans fully securedby first liens 34<NOTE/> on 1-4 family residential properties 35<NOTE/>, either owner-occupied or rented, provided that such loanshave been made in accordance with prudent underwriting standards, includinga conservative loan-to-value ratio; 36<NOTE/> are performing in accordance with their original terms; andare not 90 days or more past due or carried in nonaccrual status.37<NOTE/> Also included in this category are privately-issued mortgage-backedsecurities provided that: (1) The structure of the security meets the criteriadescribed in section III (B)(3) above; (2) if the security is backed bya pool of conventional mortgages, <T3>each</T3> underlying mortgage meets the criteria described above inthis section for eligibility for the 50 percent risk weight category atthe time the pool is originated; and (3) if the security is backed by privately-issuedmortgage-backed securities, <T3>each</T3> underlying security qualifies for the 50 percent risk category.Privately-issued mortgage-backed securities that do not meet these criteriaor that do not qualify for a lower risk weight are generally assigned tothe 100 percent risk weight category. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>34 If a bank holds the first and junior lien(s) on a residentialproperty and no other party holds an intervening lien, the transactionis treated as a single loan secured by a first lien for the purpose ofdetermining the loan-to-value ratio. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>35 The types of properties that qualify as 1-4 family residencesare listed in the instructions to the commercial bank Call Report. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>36 The loan-to-value ratio is based upon the most currentappraised value of the property. All appraisals must be made in a mannerconsistent with the Federal banking agencies' real estate appraisal guidelinesand with the bank's own appraisal guidelines. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>37 Residential property loans that do not meet all the specifiedcriteria or that are made for the purpose of speculative property developmentare placed in the 100 percent risk category. <ITAG tagnum="21">Also assigned to this category are <T3>revenue</T3> (non-general obligation) bonds or similar obligations,including loans and leases, that are obligations of states or other politicalsubdivisions of the U.S. (for example, municipal revenue bonds) or othercountries of the OECD-based group, but for which the government entityis committed to repay the debt with revenues from the specific projectsfinanced, rather than from general tax funds. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Credit equivalent amounts of interest rate and foreign exchange ratecontracts involving standard risk obligors (that is, obligors whose loansor debt securities would be assigned to the 100 percent risk category)are included in the 50 percent category, unless they are backed by collateralor guarantees that allow them to be placed in a lower risk category. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. <T3>Category 4: 100 percent.</T3> All assets not included in the categoriesabove are assigned to this category, which comprises standard risk assets.The bulk of the assets typically found in a loan portfolio would be assignedto the 100 percent category. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This category includes long-term claims on, or guaranteed by, non-OECDbanks, and all claims on non-OECD central governments that entail somedegree of transfer risk.38<NOTE/> This category also includes all claims on foreign and domesticprivate sector obligors not included in the categories above (includingloans to nondepository financial institutions and bank holding companies);claims on commercial firms owned by the public sector; customer liabilitiesto the bank on acceptances outstanding involving standard risk claims 39<NOTE/>; investments in fixed assets, premises, and other real estateowned; common and preferred stock of corporations, including stock acquiredfor debts previously contracted; commercial and consumer loans (exceptthose assigned to lower risk categories due to recognized guarantees orcollateral and loans for residential property that qualify for a lowerrisk weight); mortgage-backed securities that do not meet criteria forassignment to a lower risk weight (including any classes of mortgage-backedsecurities that can absorb more than their <T3>pro rata</T3> share of loss without the whole issue being in default);and all stripped mortgage-backed and similar securities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>38 Such assets include all non-local currency claims on, orguaranteed by, non-OECD central governments and those portions of localcurrency claims on, or guaranteed by, non-OECD central governments thatexceed the local currency liabilities held by the bank. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>39 Customer liabilities on acceptances outstanding involvingnon-standard risk claims, such as claims on U.S. depository institutions,are assigned to the risk category appropriate to the identity of the obligoror, if relevant, the nature of the collateral or guarantees backing theclaims. Portions of acceptances conveyed as risk participations to U.S.depository institutions or foreign banks are assigned to the 20 percentrisk category appropriate to short-term claims guaranteed by U.S. depositoryinstitutions and foreign banks. <ITAG tagnum="21">Also included in this category are industrial development bonds andsimilar obligations issued under the auspices of states or political subdivisionsof the OECD-based group of countries for the benefit of a private partyor enterprise where that party or enterprise, not the government entity,is obligated to pay the principal and interest, and all obligations ofstates or political subdivisions of countries that do not belong to theOECD-based group.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The following assets also are assigned a risk weight of 100 percentif they have not been deducted from capital: investments in unconsolidatedcompanies, joint ventures or associated companies; instruments that qualifyas capital issued by other banking organizations; and any intangibles,including grandfathered goodwill. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">D. Off-Balance Sheet Items </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The face amount of an off-balance sheet item is incorporated intothe risk-based capital ratio by multiplying it by a credit conversion factor.The resultant credit equivalent amount is assigned to the appropriate riskcategory according to the obligor, or, if relevant, the guarantor or thenature of the collateral.40<NOTE/> Attachment IV sets forth the conversion factors for varioustypes of off-balance sheet items. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>40 The sufficiency of collateral and guarantees for off-balancesheet items is determined by the market value of the collateral or theamount of the guarantee in relation to the face amount of the item, exceptfor interest and foreign exchange rate contracts, for which this determinationis made in relation to the credit equivalent amount. Collateral and guaranteesare subject to the same provisions noted under Section III (B). <ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Items with a 100 percent conversion factor. </T3>A 100 percent conversionfactor applies to direct credit substitutes, which include guarantees,or equivalent instruments, backing financial claims, such as outstandingsecurities, loans, and other financial liabilities, or that back off-balancesheet items that require capital under the risk-based capital framework.Direct credit substitutes include, for example, financial standby lettersof credit, or other equivalent irrevocable undertakings or surety arrangements,that guarantee repayment of financial obligations such as: commercial paper,tax-exempt securities, commercial or individual loans or debt obligations,or standby or commercial letters of credit. Direct credit substitutes alsoinclude the acquisition of risk participations in bankers acceptances andstandby letters of credit, since both of these transactions, in effect,constitute a guarantee by the acquiring bank that the underlying accountparty (obligor) will repay its obligation to the originating, or issuing,institution.\41\<NOTE/> (Standby letters of credit that are performance-related arediscussed below and have a credit conversion factor of 50 percent.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\41\ Credit equivalent amounts of acquisitions of risk participationsare assigned to the risk category appropriate to the account party obligor,or, if relevant, the nature of the collateral or guarantees.<ITAG tagnum="21">The full amount of a direct credit substitute is converted at 100percent and the resulting credit equivalent amount is assigned to the riskcategory appropriate to the obligor or, if relevant, the guarantor or thenature of the collateral. In the case of a direct credit substitute inwhich a risk participation \42\<NOTE/> has been conveyed, the full amount is still converted at100 percent. However, the credit equivalent amount that has been conveyedis assigned to whichever risk category is lower: the risk category appropriateto the obligor, after giving effect to any relevant guarantees or collateral,or the risk category appropriate to the institution acquiring the participation.Any remainder is assigned to the risk category appropriate to the obligor,guarantor, or collateral. For example, the portion of a direct credit substituteconveyed as a risk participation to a U.S. domestic depository institutionor foreign bank is assigned to the risk category appropriate to claimsguaranteed by those institutions, that is, the 20 percent risk category.\43\<NOTE/> This approach recognizes that such conveyances replace theoriginating bank's exposure to the obligor with an exposure to the institutionsacquiring the risk participations.\44\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\42\ That is, a participation in which the originating bankremains liable to the beneficiary for the full amount of the direct creditsubstitute if the party that has acquired the participation fails to paywhen the instrument is drawn.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\43\ Risk participations with a remaining maturity of overone year that are conveyed to non-OECD banks are to be assigned to the100 percent risk category, unless a lower risk category is appropriateto the obligor, guarantor, or collateral.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\44\ A risk participation in bankers acceptances conveyedto other institutions is also assigned to the risk category appropriateto the institution acquiring the participation or, if relevant, the guarantoror nature of the collateral.<ITAG tagnum="21">In the case of direct credit substitutes that take the form of a syndicationas defined in the instructions to the commercial bank Call Report, thatis, where each bank is obligated only for its <T3>pro rata </T3>share of the risk and there is no recourse to the originatingbank, each bank will only include its <T3>pro rata </T3>share of the direct credit substitute in its risk-basedcapital calculation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Financial standby letters of credit are distinguished from loan commitments(discussed below) in that standbys are irrevocable obligations of the bankto pay a third-party beneficiary when a customer (account party) <T3>fails to repay </T3>an outstanding loan or debt instrument (directcredit substitute). Performance standby letters of credit (performancebonds) are irrevocable obligations of the bank to pay a third-party beneficiarywhen a customer (account party) <T3>fails to perform </T3>some other contractual non-financial obligation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The distinguishing characteristic of a standby letter of credit forrisk-based capital purposes is the combination of irrevocability with thefact that funding is triggered by some failure to repay or perform an obligation.Thus, any commitment (by whatever name) that involves an <T3>irrevocable </T3>obligation to make a payment to the customer or toa third party in the event the customer <T3>fails to repay </T3>an outstanding debt obligation or <T3>fails to perform </T3>a contractual obligation is treated, for risk-basedcapital purposes, as respectively, a financial guarantee standby letterof credit or a performance standby.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A loan commitment, on the other hand, involves an obligation (withor without a material adverse change or similar clause) of the bank tofund its customer <T3>in the normal course </T3>of business should the customer seek to drawdown the commitment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Sale and repurchase agreements and asset sales with recourse (to theextent not included on the balance sheet) and forward agreements also areconverted at 100 percent. The risk-based capital definition of the saleof assets with recourse, including the sale of 1-4 family residential mortgages,is the same as the definition contained in the instructions to the commercialbank Call Report. So-called ``loan strips'' (that is, short-term advancessold under long-term commitments without direct recourse) are defined inthe instructions to the commercial bank Call Report and for risk-basedcapital purposes as assets sold with recourse.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Forward agreements are legally binding contractual obligations topurchase assets with <T3>certain </T3>drawdown at a specified future date. Such obligationsinclude forward purchases, forward forward deposits placed,\45\<NOTE/> and partly-paid shares and securities; they do not includecommitments to make residential mortgage loans or forward foreign exchangecontracts.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\45\ Forward forward deposits accepted are treated as interestrate contracts. <ITAG tagnum="21">Securities lent by a bank are treated in one of two ways, dependingupon whether the lender is at risk of loss. If a bank, as agent for a customer,lends the customer's securities and does not indemnify the customer againstloss, then the transaction is excluded from the risk-based capital calculation.If, alternatively, a bank lends its own securities or, acting as agentfor a customer, lends the customer's securities and indemnifies the customeragainst loss, the transaction is converted at 100 percent and assignedto the risk weight category appropriate to the obligor, to any collateraldelivered to the lending bank, or, if applicable, to the independent custodianacting on the lender's behalf.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Items with a 50 percent conversion factor. </T3>Transaction-relatedcontingencies are converted at 50 percent. Such contingencies include bidbonds, performance bonds, warranties, standby letters of credit relatedto particular transactions, and performance standby letters of credit,as well as acquisitions of risk participations in performance standby lettersof credit. Performance standby letters of credit represent obligationsbacking the performance of nonfinancial or commercial contracts or undertakings.To the extent permitted by law or regulation, performance standby lettersof credit include arrangements backing, among other things, subcontractors'and suppliers' performance, labor and materials contracts, and constructionbids.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The unused portion of commitments with an <T3>original </T3>maturity exceeding one year,\46\<NOTE/> including underwriting commitments, and commercial and consumercredit commitments also are converted at 50 percent. Original maturityis defined as the length of time between the date the commitment is issuedand the earliest date on which: (1) The bank can, at its option, unconditionally(without cause) cancel the commitment,\47\<NOTE/> <T3>and </T3>(2) the bank is scheduled to (and as a normal practice actuallydoes) review the facility to determine whether or not it should be extended.Such reviews must continue to be conducted at least annually for such afacility to qualify as a short-term commitment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\46\ Through year-end 1992, remaining maturity may be usedfor determining the maturity of off-balance sheet loan commitments; thereafter,original maturity must be used.  <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\47\ In the case of consumer home equity or mortgage linesof credit secured by liens on 1-4 family residential properties, the bankis deemed able to unconditionally cancel the commitment for the purposeof this criterion if, at its option, it can prohibit additional extensionsof credit, reduce the credit line, and terminate the commitment to thefull extent permitted by relevant Federal law.  <ITAG tagnum="21">Commitments are defined as any legally binding arrangements that obligatea bank to extend credit in the form of loans or leases; to purchase loans,securities, or other assets; or to participate in loans and leases. Theyalso include overdraft facilities, revolving credit, home equity and mortgagelines of credit, and similar transactions. Normally, commitments involvea written contract or agreement and a commitment fee, or some other formof consideration. Commitments are included in weighted risk assets regardlessof whether they contain ``material adverse change'' clauses or other provisionsthat are intended to relieve the issuer of its funding obligation undercertain conditions. In the case of commitments structured as syndications,where the bank is obligated solely for its <T3>pro rata </T3>share, only the bank's proportional share of the syndicatedcommitment is taken into account in calculating the risk-based capitalratio.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Facilities that are unconditionally cancellable (without cause) atany time by the bank are not deemed to be commitments, provided the bankmakes a separate credit decision before each drawing under the facility.Commitments with an original maturity of one year or less are deemed toinvolve low risk and, therefore, are not assessed a capital charge. Suchshort-term commitments are defined to include the unused portion of linesof credit on retail credit cards and related plans (as defined in the instructionsto the commercial bank Call Report) if the bank has the unconditional rightto cancel the line of credit at any time, in accordance with applicablelaw.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Once a commitment has been converted at 50 percent, any portion thathas been conveyed to other U.S. depository institutions or OECD banks asparticipations in which the originating bank retains the full obligationto the borrower if the participating bank fails to pay when the instrumentis drawn, is assigned to the 20 percent risk category. This treatment isanalogous to that accorded to conveyances of risk participations in standbyletters of credit. The acquisition of a participation in a commitment bya bank is converted at 50 percent and assigned to the risk category appropriateto the account party obligor or, if relevant, the nature of the collateralor guarantees. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Revolving underwriting facilities (RUFs), note issuance facilities(NIFs), and other similar arrangements also are converted at 50 percentregardless of maturity. These are facilities under which a borrower canissue on a revolving basis short-term paper in its own name, but for whichthe underwriting banks have a legally binding commitment either to purchaseany notes the borrower is unable to sell by the roll-over date or to advancefunds to the borrower.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Items with a 20 percent conversion factor. </T3>Short-term, self-liquidatingtrade-related contingencies which arise from the movement of goods areconverted at 20 percent. Such contingencies generally include commercialletters of credit and other documentary letters of credit collateralizedby the underlying shipments.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. <T3>Items with a zero percent conversion factor. </T3>These include unusedportions of commitments with an original maturity of one year or less,\4\\8\<NOTE/> or which are unconditionally cancellable at any time, provideda separate credit decision is made before each drawing under the facility.Unused portions of lines of credit on retail credit cards and related plansare deemed to be short-term commitments if the bank has the unconditionalright to cancel the line of credit at any time, in accordance with applicablelaw.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\\8\ Through year-end 1992, remaining maturity may be usedfor determining term to maturity for off-balance sheet loan commitments;thereafter, original maturity must be used.<ITAG tagnum="71">E. Interest Rate and Foreign Exchange Rate Contracts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Scope. </T3>Credit equivalent amounts are computed for each of thefollowing off-balance sheet interest rate and foreign exchange rate instruments:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">I. Interest Rate Contracts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Single currency interest rate swaps.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Basis swaps.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. Forward rate agreements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">D. Interest rate options purchased (including caps, collars, and floorspurchased).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">E. Any other instrument that gives rise to similar credit risks (includingwhen-issued securities and forward deposits accepted).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">II. Exchange Rate Contracts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Cross-currency interest rate swaps.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Forward foreign exchange contracts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. Currency options purchased.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">D. Any other instrument that gives rise to similar credit risks.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Exchange rate contracts with an original maturity of fourteen calendardays or less and instruments traded on exchanges that require daily paymentof variation margin are excluded from the risk-based ratio calculation.Over-the-counter options purchased, however, are included and treated inthe same way as the other interest rate and exchange rate contracts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Calculation of credit equivalent amounts. </T3>Credit equivalent amountsare calculated for each individual contract of the types listed above.To calculate the credit equivalent amount of its off-balance sheet interestrate and exchange rate instruments, a bank sums these amounts:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The mark-to-market value \4\\9\<NOTE/> (positive values only) of each contract (that is, the currentexposure); and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\\9\ Mark-to-market values are measured in dollars, regardlessof the currency or currencies specified in the contract, and should reflectchanges in both interest rates and counterparty credit quality.<ITAG tagnum="21">(2) An estimate of the potential future credit exposure over the remaininglife of each contract.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The potential future credit exposure on a contract, including contractswith negative mark-to-market values, is estimated by multiplying the notionalprincipal amount by one of the following credit conversion factors, asappropriate:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s10,10,10</C> <ITAG tagnum="96">[In percent]</ITAG><H1>Remaining maturity</H1><H1>Interest rate contracts</H1><H1>Exchange rate contracts</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">One year or less <D>0 </D><D>1.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Over one year <D>0.5 </D><D>5.0</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Examples of the calculation of credit equivalent amounts for theseinstruments are contained in Attachment V.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Because exchange rate contracts involve an exchange of principal uponmaturity, and exchange rates are generally more volatile than interestrates, higher conversion factors have been established for foreign exchangecontracts than for interest rate contracts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">No potential future credit exposure is calculated for single currencyinterest rate swaps in which payments are made based upon two floatingrate indices, so-called floating/floating or basis swaps; the credit exposureon these contracts is evaluated solely on the basis of their mark-to-marketvalues.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Risk weights. </T3>Once the credit equivalent amount for interest rateand exchange rate instruments has been determined, that amount is assignedto the risk weight category appropriate to the counterparty, or, if relevant,the nature of any collateral or guarantees.\5\\0\<NOTE/> However, the maximum weight that will be applied to the creditequivalent amount of such instruments is 50 percent.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\\0\ For interest and exchange rate contracts, sufficiencyof collateral or guarantees is determined by the market value of the collateralor the amount of the guarantee in relation to the credit equivalent amount.Collateral and guarantees are subject to the same provisions noted undersection III(B).<ITAG tagnum="21">4. <T3>Avoidance of double counting. </T3>In certain cases, credit exposuresarising from the interest rate and exchange instruments covered by theseguidelines may already be reflected, in part, on the balance sheet. Toavoid double counting such exposures in the assessment of capital adequacyand, perhaps, assigning inappropriate risk weights, counterparty creditexposures arising from the types of instruments covered by these guidelinesmay need to be excluded from balance sheet assets in calculating banks'risk-based capital ratios.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. <T3>Netting. </T3>Netting of swaps and similar contracts is recognizedfor purposes of calculating the risk-based capital ratio <T3>only </T3>when accomplished through netting by novation.\5\\1\<NOTE/> While the Federal Reserve encourages any reasonable arrangementsdesigned to reduce the risks inherent in these transactions, other typesof netting arrangements are not recognized for purposes of calculatingthe risk-based ratio at this time.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\\1\ Netting by novation, for this purpose, is a writtenbilateral contract between two counterparties under which any obligationto each other to deliver a given currency on a given date is automaticallyamalgamated with all other obligations for the same currency and valuedate, <T3>legally </T3>substituting one single net amount for the previous grossobligations.<ITAG tagnum="73">IV. Minimum Supervisory Ratios and Standards</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The interim and final supervisory standards set forth below specify<T3>minimum </T3>supervisory ratios based primarily on broad credit riskconsiderations. As noted above, the risk-based ratio does not take explicitaccount of the quality of individual asset portfolios or the range of othertypes of risks to which banks may be exposed, such as interest rate, liquidity,market or operational risks. For this reason, banks are generally expectedto operate with capital positions above the minimum ratios. This is particularlytrue for institutions that are undertaking significant expansion or thatare exposed to high or unusual levels of risk.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Upon adoption of the risk-based framework, any bank that does notmeet the interim or final supervisory ratios, or whose capital is otherwiseconsidered inadequate, is expected to develop and implement a plan acceptableto the Federal Reserve for achieving an adequate level of capital consistentwith the provisions of these guidelines or with the special circumstancesaffecting the individual institution. In addition, such banks should avoidany actions, including increased risk-taking or unwarranted expansion,that would lower or further erode their capital positions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">A. Minimum Risk-Based Ratio After Transition Period</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">As reflected in Attachment VI, by year-end 1992, all state memberbanks should meet a minimum ratio of qualifying total capital to weightedrisk assets of 8 percent, of which at least 4.0 percentage points shouldbe in the form of Tier 1 capital net of goodwill. (Section II above containsdetailed definitions of capital and related terms used in this section.)The maximum amount of supplementary capital elements that qualifies asTier 2 capital is limited to 100 percent of Tier 1 capital net of goodwill.In addition, the combined maximum amount of subordinated debt and intermediate-termpreferred stock that qualifies as Tier 2 capital is limited to 50 percentof Tier 1 capital. The maximum amount of the allowance for loan and leaselosses that qualifies as Tier 2 capital is limited to 1.25 percent of grossweighted risk assets. Allowances for loan and lease losses in excess ofthis limit may, of course, be maintained, but would not be included ina bank's total capital. The Federal Reserve will continue to require banksto maintain reserves at levels fully sufficient to cover losses inherentin their loan portfolios.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Qualifying total capital is calculated by adding Tier 1 capital andTier 2 capital (limited to 100 percent of Tier 1 capital) and then deductingfrom this sum certain investments in banking or finance subsidiaries thatare not consolidated for accounting or supervisory purposes, reciprocalholdings of banking organization capital securities, or other items atthe direction of the Federal Reserve. These deductions are discussed abovein section II(B).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">B. Transition Arrangements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The transition period for implementing the risk-based capital standardends on December 31, 1992.\5\\2\<NOTE/> Initially, the risk-based capital guidelines do not establisha minimum level of capital. However, by year-end 1990, banks are expectedto meet a minimum interim target ratio for qualifying total capital toweighted risk assets of 7.25 percent, at least one-half of which shouldbe in the form of Tier 1 capital. For purposes of meeting the 1990 interimtarget, the amount of loan loss reserves that may be included in capitalis limited to 1.5 percent of weighted risk assets and up to 10 percentof a bank's Tier 1 capital may consist of supplementary capital elements.Thus, the 7.25 percent interim target ratio implies a minimum ratio ofTier 1 capital to weighted risk assets of 3.6 percent (one-half of 7.25)and a minimum ratio of core capital elements to weighted risk assets ratioof 3.25 percent (nine-tenths of the Tier 1 capital ratio).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\\2\The Basle capital framework does not establish an initialminimum standard for the risk-based capital ratio before the end of 1990.However, for the purpose of calculating a risk-based capital ratio priorto year-end 1990, no sublimit is placed on the amount of the allowancefor loan and lease losses includable in Tier 2. In addition, this frameworkpermits, under temporary transition arrangements, a certain percentageof a bank's Tier 1 capital to be made up of supplementary capital elements.In particular, supplementary elements may constitute 25 percent of a bank'sTier 1 capital (before the deduction of goodwill) up to the end of 1990;from year-end 1990 up to the end of 1992, this allowable percentage ofsupplementary elements in Tier 1 declines to 10 percent of Tier 1 (beforethe deduction of goodwill). Beginning on December 31, 1992, supplementaryelements may not be included in Tier 1. The amount of subordinated debtand intermediate-term preferred stock temporarily included in Tier 1 underthese arrangements will not be subject to the sublimit on the amount ofsuch instruments includable in Tier 2 capital. Goodwill must be deductedfrom the sum of a bank's permanent core capital elements (that is, commonequity, noncumulative perpetual preferred stock, and minority interestin the equity of unconsolidated subsidiaries) plus supplementary itemsthat may temporarily qualify as Tier 1 elements for the purpose of calculatingTier 1 (net of goodwill), Tier 2, and total capital.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Attachment I._Sample Calculation of Risk-Based Capital Ratio for StateMember Banks</T4><H1> </H1><H1> </H1>Example of a bank with $6,000 in total capital and the following assetsand off-balance sheet items:Balance Sheet Assets:<ITAG tagnum="3">Cash</ITAG><D>$5,000</D><ITAG tagnum="3">U.S. Treasuries</ITAG><D>20,000</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Balances at domestic banks</ITAG><D>5,000</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Loans secured by first liens on 1-4 family residential properties</ITAG><D>5,000</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Loans to private corporations</ITAG><D>65,000</D><R>n,s</R><ITAG tagnum="4">Total Balance Sheet Assets<D>$100,000</D></ITAG>Off-Balance Sheet Items:<ITAG tagnum="3">Standby letters of credit (``SLCs'') backing general obligation debtissues of U.S. municipalities (``GOs'')</ITAG><D>$10,000</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Long-term legally binding commitments to private corporations</ITAG><D>20,000</D><R>n,s</R><ITAG tagnum="4">Total Off-Balance Sheet Items<D>30,000</D></ITAG>This bank's total capital to <T3>total</T3> assets (leverage) ratio would be: ($6,000/$100,000)=6.00%</ITAG>To compute the bank's weighted risk assets:1. Compute the credit equivalent amount of each off-balance sheet (``OBS'')item <ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>OBS item</H1><H1>Face value</H1><H1> </H1><H1>Conversion factor</H1><H1> </H1><H1>Credit equivalent amount</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">SLCS backing municipal GOs<D>$10,000</D><D>andmultiply;</D><D>1.00</D><D>=</D><D>$10,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Long-term commitments to private corporations<D>20,000</D><D>andmultiply;</D><D>0.50</D><D>=</D><D>10,000</D></ITAG>2. Multiply each balance sheet asset and the credit equivalent amount ofeach OBS item by the appropriate risk weight.0% Category:<ITAG tagnum="3">Cash</ITAG><D>$ 5,000</D><ITAG tagnum="3">U.S. Treasuries</ITAG><D>20,000</D><R>n,s,n,n,n,n</R><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>25,000</D><D>andmultiply;</D><D>0</D><D>=</D><D>0</D>20% Category:<ITAG tagnum="3">Balances at domestic banks</ITAG><D>5,000</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Credit equivalent amounts of SLCs backing GOs of U.S. municipalities</ITAG><D>10,000</D><R>n,s,n,n,n,n</R><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>15,000</D><D>andmultiply;</D><D>.20</D><D>=</D><D>$3,000</D>50% Category:<ITAG tagnum="3">Loans secured by first liens on 1-4 family residential properties</ITAG><D>5,000</D><D>andmultiply;</D><D>.50</D><D>=</D><D>2,500</D>100% Category:<ITAG tagnum="3">Loans to private corporations</ITAG><D>65,000</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Credit equivalent amounts of long-term commitments to private corporations</ITAG><D>10,000</D><R>n,s,n,n,n,n</R><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>75,000</D><D>andmultiply;</D><D>1.00</D><D>=</D><D>75,000</D><R>n,n,n,n,n,s</R><ITAG tagnum="4">Total risk-weighted assets<D/><D/><D/><D/><D>80,500</D></ITAG>This bank's ratio of total capital to weighted risk assets (risk-basedcapital ratio) would be: ($6,000/$80,500)=7.45%</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Attachment II._Summary Definition of Qualifying Capital for State MemberBanks* Using the Year-end 1992 Standards</T4><H1>Components</H1><H1>Minimum requirements after transition period</H1>Core Capital (Tier 1):<D>Must equal or exceed 4% of weighted risk assets.</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Common stockholders' equity</ITAG><D>No limit.</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Qualifying non-cumulative perpetual preferred stock</ITAG><D>No limit; banks should avoid undue reliance on preferred stock in Tier1.</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Minority interest in equity accounts of consolidated subsidiaries</ITAG><D>Banks should avoid using minority interests to introduce elements nototherwise qualifying for Tier 1 capital.</D>Less: Goodwill \1\Supplementary Capital (Tier 2):<D>Total of Tier 2 is limited to 100% of Tier 1.\2\</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Allowance for loan and lease losses</ITAG><D>Limited to 1.25% of weighted risk assets.\2\</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Perpetual preferred stock</ITAG><D>No limit within Tier 2.</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Hybrid capital instruments and equity contract notes</ITAG><D>No limit within Tier 2.</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Subordinated debt and intermediate-term preferred stock (original weightedaverage maturity of 5 years or more)</ITAG><D>Subordinated debt and intermediate-term preferred stock are limitedto 50% of Tier 1; \3\ amortized for capital purposes as they approach maturity.</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Revaluation reserves (equity and building)</ITAG><D>Not included; banks encouraged to disclose; may be evaluated on a case-by-casebasis for international comparisons; and taken into account in making anoverall assessment of capital.</D>Deductions (from sum of Tier 1 and Tier 2):<ITAG tagnum="13">Investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">Reciprocal holdings of banking organizations' capital securities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Other deductions (such as other subsidiaries or joint ventures) asdetermined by supervisory authority</ITAG><D>On a case-by-case basis or as a matter of policy after formal rulemaking.</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Total Capital (Tier 1+Tier 2-Deductions</ITAG><D>Must equal or exceed 8% of weighted risk assets.</D><F>*See discussion in section II of the Guidelines for a complete descriptionof the requirements for, and the limitations on, the components of qualifyingcapital.</F><F>\1\ All goodwill, except previously grandfathered goodwill approvedin supervisory mergers, is deducted immediately.</F><F>\2\ Amounts in excess of limitations are permitted but do not qu alifyas capital.</F><F>\3\ Amounts in excess of limitations are permitted but do not qualifyas capital.</F></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Attachment III_Summary of Risk Weights and Risk Categories for StateMember Banks</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Category 1: Zero Percent</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Cash (domestic and foreign) held in the bank or in transit. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Balances due from Federal Reserve Banks (including Federal ReserveBank stock) and central banks in other OECD countries. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Direct claims on, and the portions of claims that are unconditionallyguaranteed by, the U.S. Treasury and U.S. Government agencies\1\<NOTE/> and the central governments of other OECD countries, andlocal currency claims on, and the portions of local currency claims thatare unconditionally guaranteed by, the central governments of non-OECDcountries including the central banks of non-OECD countries), to the extentthat the bank has liabilities booked in that currency.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\For the purpose of calculating the risk-based capital ratio,a U.S. Government agency is defined as an instrumentality of the U.S. Governmentwhose obligations are fully and explicitly guaranteed as to the timelypayment of principal and interest by the full faith and credit of the U.S.Government.<ITAG tagnum="21">4. Gold bullion held in the bank's vaults or in another's vaults onan allocated basis, to the extent offset by gold bullion liabilities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Category 2: 20 Percent</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Cash items in the process of collection. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. All claims (long- or short-term) on, and the portions of claims(long- or short-term) that are guaranteed by, U.S. depository institutionsand OCED banks. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Short-term claims (remaining maturity of one year or less) on,and the portions of short-term claims that are guaranteed by, non-OECDbanks. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. The portions of claims that are conditionally guaranteed by thecentral governments of OECD countries and U.S. Government agencies, andthe portions of local currency claims that are conditionally guaranteedby the central governments of non-OECD countries, to the extent that thebank has liabilities booked in that currency. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Claims on, and the portions of claims that are guaranteed by, U.S.Government-sponsored agencies.\2\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\For the purpose of calculating the risk-based capital ratio,a U.S. Government-sponsored agency is defined as an agency originally establishedor chartered to serve public purposes specified by the U.S. Congress butwhose obligations are not <T3>explicitly</T3> guaranteed by the full faith and credit of the U.S.Government.  <ITAG tagnum="21">6. General obligation claims on, and the portions of claims that areguaranteed by the full faith and credit of, local governments and politicalsubdivisions of the U.S. and other OECD local governments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Claims on, and the portions of claims that are guaranteed by, officialmultilateral lending institutions or regional development banks. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. The portions of claims that are collateralized\3\<NOTE/> by securities issued or guaranteed by the U.S. Treasury,the central governments of other OECD countries, U.S. Government agencies,U.S. Government-sponsored agencies, or by cash on deposit in the bank.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\The extent of collateralization is determined by currentmarket value.<ITAG tagnum="21">9. The portions of claims that are collateralized\3\ by securitiesissued by official multilateral lending institutions or regional developmentbanks. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10. Certain privately-issued securities representing indirect ownershipof mortgage-backed U.S. Government agency or U.S. Government-sponsoredagency securities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11. Investment in shares of a fund whose portfolio is permitted tohold only securities that would qualify for the zero or 20 percent riskcategories. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Category 3: 50 Percent</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Loans fully secured by first liens on 1-4 family residential propertiesthat have been made in accordance with prudent underwriting standards,that are performing in accordance with their original terms, and are notpast due or in nonaccrual status, and certain privately-issued mortgage-backedsecurities representing indirect ownership of such loans. (Loans made forspeculative purposes are excluded.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Revenue bonds or similar claims that are obligations of U.S. stateor local governments, or other OECD local governments, but for which thegovernment entity is committed to repay the debt only out of revenues fromthe facilities financed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Credit equivalent amounts of interest rate and foreign exchangerate related contracts, except for those assigned to a lower risk category.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Category 4: 100 Percent</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. All other claims on private obligors. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Claims on, or guaranteed by, non-OECD foreign banks with a remainingmaturity exceeding one year. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Claims on, or guaranteed by, non-OECD central governments thatare not included in item 3 of Category 1 or item 4 of Category 2; all claimson non-OECD state or local governments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Obligations issued by U.S. state or local governments, or otherOECD local governments (including industrial development authorities andsimilar entities), repayable solely by a private party or enterprise.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Premises, plant, and equipment; other fixed assets; and other realestate owned.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Investments in any unconsolidated subsidiaries, joint ventures,or associated companies_if not deducted from capital.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Instruments issued by other banking organizations that qualifyas capital_if not deducted from capital.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. Claims on commercial firms owned by a government.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9. All other assets, including any intangible assets that are notdeducted from capital.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Attachment IV_Credit Conversion Factors for Off-Balance Sheet Itemsfor State Member Banks </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">100 Percent Conversion Factor </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Direct credit substitutes. (These include general guarantees ofindebtedness and all guarantee-type instruments, including standby lettersof credit backing the financial obligations of other parties.) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Risk participations in bankers acceptances and direct credit substitutes,such as standby letters of credit. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Sale and repurchase agreements and assets sold with recourse thatare not included on the balance sheet. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Forward agreements to purchase assets, including financing facilities,on which drawdown is <T3>certain. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Securities lent for which the bank is at risk. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">50 Percent Conversion Factor </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Transaction-related contingencies. (These include bid bonds, performancebonds, warranties, and standby letters of credit backing the nonfinancialperformance of other parties.) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Unused portions of commitments with an original maturity \1\<NOTE/> exceeding one year, including underwriting commitments andcommercial credit lines. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ Remaining maturity may be used until year-end 1992. <ITAG tagnum="21">3. Revolving underwriting facilities (RUFs), note issuance facilities(NIFs), and similar arrangements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">20 Percent Conversion Factor </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Short-term, self-liquidating trade-related contingencies, includingcommercial letters of credit. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Zero Percent Conversion Factor </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Short-term self-liquidating trade-related contingences, includingcommercial letters of credit. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Zero Percent Conversion Factor </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Unused portions of commitments with an original maturity \1\ ofone year or less, or which are unconditionally cancellable at any time,provided a separate credit decision is made before each drawing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Credit Conversion for Interest Rate and Foreign Exchange Contracts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The total replacement cost of contracts (obtained by summing the positivemark-to-market values of contracts) is added to a measure of future potentialincreases in credit exposure. This future potential exposure measure iscalculated by multiplying the total notional value of contracts by oneof the following credit conversion factors, as appropriate:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s25,7.1,8</C> <H1>Remaining maturity </H1><H1>Interest rate contracts (percent)</H1><H1>Exchange rate contracts (percent)</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">One year or less <D>0 </D><D>1.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Over one year <D>0.5 </D><D>5.0</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">No potential exposure is calculated for single currency interest rateswaps in which payments are made based upon two floating rate indices,that is, so called floating/floating or basis swaps. The credit exposureon these contracts is evaluated solely on the basis of their mark-to-marketvalue. Exchange rate contracts with an original maturity of fourteen daysor less are excluded. Instruments traded on exchanges that require dailypayment of variation margin are also excluded. The only form of nettingrecognized is netting by novation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Attachment V._Calculation of Credit Equivalent Amounts Interest Rateand Foreign Exchange Rate Related Transactions for State Member Banks</T4><H1>Type of Contract (remaining maturity) </H1><H1>Potential Exposure </H1><H2>National principal (dollars) </H2><H2>x </H2><H2>Potential exposure conversion factor </H2><H2>= </H2><H2>Potential exposure (dollars) </H2><H1>+ </H1><H1>Current Exposure </H1><H2>Replacement Cost\1\ </H2><H2>Current exposure (dollars)\2\ </H2><H1>= </H1><H1>Credit equivalent amount (dollars)</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">(1) 120-day forward foreign exchange <D>5,000,000 </D><D>  </D><D>.01 </D><D>  </D><D>50,000 </D><D>  </D><D>100,000 </D><D>100,000 </D><D>  </D><D>150,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(2) 120-day forward foreign exchange <D>6,000,000 </D><D>  </D><D>.01 </D><D>  </D><D>60,000 </D><D>  </D><D>^120,000 </D><D> </D><D>  </D><D>60,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(3) 3-year single-currency fixed/floating interest rate swap <D>10,000,000 </D><D>  </D><D>.005 </D><D>  </D><D>50,000 </D><D>  </D><D>200,000 </D><D>200,000 </D><D>  </D><D>250,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(4) 3-year single-currency fixed/floating interest rate swap <D>10,000,000 </D><D>  </D><D>.005 </D><D>  </D><D>50,000 </D><D>  </D><D>^250,000 </D><D> </D><D>  </D><D>50,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(5) 7-year cross-currency floating/floating interest rate swap <D>20,000,000 </D><D>  </D><D>.05 </D><D>  </D><D>1,000,000 </D><D>  </D><D>^1,300,000 </D><D> </D><D>  </D><D>1,000,000</D><R>n,s,n,n,n,n,n,n,n,n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total <D>51,000,000 </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>1,510,000</D><F>\1\ These numbers are purely for illustration.</F><F>\2\ The larger of zero or a positive mark-to-market value.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Attachment VI._Summary</T4><H1>  </H1><H1>Transitional arrangements for State member banks </H1><H2>Initial </H2><H2>Year-end 1990 </H2><H1>Final arrangement_Year-end 1992</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Minimum standard of total capital to weighted risk assets <D>None </D><D>7.25% </D><D>8.0%</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Definition of Tier 1 capital <D>Common equity, qualifying noncum. perpetual preferred stock, minorityinterests, </D><T3>plus </T3>supplementary elements \1\ <T3>less </T3>goodwill <D>Common equity, qualifying noncum. perpetual preferred stock, minorityinterests, </D><T3>plus </T3>supplementary elements \2\ <T3>less </T3>goodwill <D>Common equity, qualifying noncum. perpetual preferred stock, and minorityinterests </D><T3>less </T3>goodwill.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. Minimum standard of Tier 1 capital to weighted risk assets <D>None </D><D>3.625% </D><D>4.0%</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. Minimum standard of stockholders' equity to weighted risk assets<D>None </D><D>3.25% </D><D>4.0%</D></ITAG>5. Limitations on supplementary capital elements:<ITAG tagnum="3">a. Allowance for loan and lease losses </ITAG><D>No limit within Tier 2 </D><D>1.5% of weighted risk assets </D><D>1.25% of weighted risk assets.</D><ITAG tagnum="3">b. Qualifying perpetual preferred stock </ITAG><D>No limit within Tier 2 </D><D>No limit within Tier 2 </D><D>No limit within Tier 2.</D><ITAG tagnum="3">c. Hybrid capital instruments and equity contract notes </ITAG><D>No limit within Tier 2 </D><D>No limit within Tier 2 </D><D>No limit within Tier 2.</D><ITAG tagnum="3">d. Subordinated debt and intermediate term preferred stock </ITAG><D>Combined maximum of 50% of Tier 1 </D><D>Combined maximum of 50% of Tier 1 </D><D>Combined maximum of 50% of Tier 1.</D><ITAG tagnum="3">e. Total qualifying Tier 2 capital </ITAG><D>May not exceed Tier 1 capital </D><D>May not exceed Tier 1 capital </D><D>May not exceed Tier 1 capital.</D><ITAG tagnum="1">6. Definition of total capital <D>Tier 1 </D><T3>plus </T3>Tier 2 <T3>less</T3> <D>Tier 1 </D><T3>plus </T3>Tier 2 <T3>less</T3> <D>Tier 1 </D><T3>plus </T3>Tier 2 <T3>less</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D/>_reciprocal holdings of banking organizations' capital instruments<D/>_reciprocal holdings of banking organizations' capital instruments<D/>_reciprocal holdings of banking organizations' capital instruments.<ITAG tagnum="22">  </ITAG><D/>_investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries <D/>_investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries <D/>_investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries.<F>\1\ Supplementary elements may be included in Tier 1 up to 25% of thesum of Tier 1 plus goodwill.</F><F>\2\ Supplementary elements may be included in Tier 1 up to 10% of thesum of Tier 1 plus goodwill.</F></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 225_BANK HOLDING COMPANIES AND CHANGE IN BANK CONTROL </ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 225 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>12 U.S.C. 1817(j)(13), 1818, 1843(c)(8), 1844(b), 3106,3108, 3907, 3909. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix A to Part 225 [Redesignated as Appendix B to Part 225] </ITAG>2. The Board amends the Appendices to Part 225 by redesignating the currentAppendix A as Appendix B and adding a new Appendix A to read as set forthbelow. 3. The Board amends the redesignated Appendix B to Part 225 by adding atthe end of the title to Appendix B ``: Leverage Measure''. <ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix B to Part 225 [Redesignated as Appendix C to Part 225] </ITAG>4. The Board redesignates the current Appendix B as Appendix C. <ITAG tagnum="85">Appendix A to Part 225_Capital Adequacy Guidelines for Bank HoldingCompanies: Risk-Based Measure </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">I. Overview </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System has adopted arisk-based capital measure to assist in the assessment of the capital adequacyof bank holding companies (``banking organizations''). \1\<NOTE/> The principal objectives of this measure are to: (i) Makeregulatory capital requirements more sensitive to differences in risk profilesamong banking organizations; (ii) factor off-balance sheet exposures intothe assessment of capital adequacy; (iii) minimize disincentives to holdingliquid, low-risk assets; and (iv) achieve greater consistency in the evaluationof the capital adequacy of major banking organizations throughout the world.\2\<NOTE/> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ Supervisory ratios that relate capital to total assetsfor bank holding companies are outlined in Appendix B of this part.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ The risk-based capital measure is based upon a frameworkdeveloped jointly by supervisory authorities from the countries representedon the Basle Committee on Banking Regulations and Supervisory Practices(Basle Supervisors' Committee) and endorsed by the Group of Ten CentralBank Governors. The framework is described in a paper prepared by the BSCentitled ``International Convergence of Capital Measurement,'' July 1988.<ITAG tagnum="21">The risk-based capital guidelines include both a definition of capitaland a framework for calculating weighted risk assets by assigning assetsand off-balance sheet items to broad risk categories. An institution'srisk-based capital ratio is calculated by dividing its qualifying capital(the numerator of the ratio) by its weighted risk assets (the denominator).\3\<NOTE/> The definition of qualifying capital is outlined below insection II, and the procedures for calculating weighted risk assets arediscussed in section III. Attachment I illustrates a sample calculationof weighted risk assets and the risk-based capital ratio.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\ Banking organizations will initially be expected to utilizeperiod-end amounts in calculating their risk-based capital ratios. Whennecessary and appropriate, ratios based on average balances may also becalculated on a case-by-case basis. Moreover, to the extent banking organizationshave data on average balances that can be used to calculate risk-basedratios, the Federal Reserve will take such data into account.<ITAG tagnum="21">The risk-based capital guidelines also establish a schedule for achievinga minimum supervisory standard for the ratio of qualifying capital to weightedrisk assets and provide for transitional arrangements during a phase-inperiod to facilitate adoption and implementation of the measure at theend of 1992. These interim standards and transitional arrangements areset forth in section IV.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The risk-based guidelines apply on a consolidated basis to bank holdingcompanies with consolidated assets of $150 million or more. For bank holdingcompanies with less than $150 million in consolidated assets, the guidelineswill be applied on a bank-only basis unless: (a) The parent bank holdingcompany is engaged in nonbank activity involving significant leverage;\4\<NOTE/> or (b) the parent company has a significant amount of outstandingdebt that is held by the general public.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\ A parent company that is engaged in significant off-balancesheet activities would generally be deemed to be engaged in activitiesthat involve significant leverage.<ITAG tagnum="21">The risk-based guidelines are to be used in the inspection and supervisoryprocess as well as in the analysis of applications acted upon by the FederalReserve. Thus, in considering an application filed by a bank holding company,the Federal Reserve will take into account the organization's risk-basedcapital ratio, the reasonableness of its capital plans, and the degreeof progress it has demonstrated toward meeting the interim and final risk-basedcapital standards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The risk-based capital ratio focuses principally on broad categoriesof credit risk, although the framework for assigning assets and off-balancesheet items to risk categories does incorporate elements of transfer risk,as well as limited instances of interest rate and market risk. The risk-basedratio does not, however, incorporate other factors that can affect an organization'sfinancial condition. These factors include overall interest rate exposure;liquidity, funding and market risks; the quality and level of earnings;investment or loan portfolio concentrations; the quality of loans and investments;the effectiveness of loan and investment policies; and management's abilityto monitor and control financial and operating risks.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In addition to evaluating capital ratios, an overall assessment ofcapital adequacy must take account of these other factors, including, inparticular, the level and severity of problem and classified assets. Forthis reason, the final supervisory judgment on an organization's capitaladequacy may differ significantly from conclusions that might be drawnsolely from the level of the organization's risk-based capital ratio.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The risk-based capital guidelines establish <T3>minimum </T3>ratios of capital to weighted risk assets. In light ofthe considerations just discussed, banking organizations generally areexpected to operate well above the minimum risk-based ratios. In particular,banking organizations contemplating significant expansion proposals areexpected to maintain strong capital levels substantially above the minimumratios and should not allow significant diminution of financial strengthbelow these strong levels to fund their expansion plans. Institutions withhigh or inordinate levels of risk are also expected to operate above minimumcapital standards. In all cases, institutions should hold capital commensuratewith the level and nature of the risks to which they are exposed. Bankingorganizations that do not meet the minimum risk-based standard, or thatare otherwise considered to be inadequately capitalized, are expected todevelop and implement plans acceptable to the Federal Reserve for achievingadequate levels of capital within a reasonable period of time.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Board will monitor the implementation and effect of these guidelinesin relation to domestic and international developments in the banking industry.When necessary and appropriate, the Board will consider the need to modifythe guidelines in light of any significant changes in the economy, financialmarkets, banking practices, or other relevant factors.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">II. Definition of Qualifying Capital for the Risk Based Capital Ratio</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">An institution's qualifying total capital consists of two types ofcapital components: ``core capital elements'' (comprising Tier 1 capital)and ``supplementary capital elements'' (comprising Tier 2 capital). Thesecapital elements and the various limits, restrictions, and deductions towhich they are subject, are discussed below and are set forth in AttachmentII.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">To qualify as an element of Tier 1 or Tier 2 capital, a capital instrumentmay not contain or be covered by any convenants, terms, or restrictionsthat are inconsistent with safe and sound banking practices.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Redemptions of permanent equity or other capital instruments beforestated maturity could have a significant impact on an organization's overallcapital structure. Consequently, an organization considering such a stepshould consult with the Federal Reserve before redeeming any equity ordebt capital instrument (prior to maturity) if such redemption could havea material effect on the level or composition of the organization's capitalbase.\5\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\ Consultation would not ordinarily be necessary if an instrumentwere redeemed with the proceeds of, or replaced by, a like amount of asimilar or higher quality capital instrument and the organization's capitalposition is considered fully adequate by the Federal Reserve. In the caseof limited-life Tier 2 instruments, consultation would generally be obviatedif the new security is of equal or greater maturity than the one it replaces.<ITAG tagnum="71">A. The Components of Qualifying Capital</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Core capital elements (Tier 1 capital). </T3>The Tier 1 component ofan institution's qualifying capital must represent at least 50 percentof qualifying total capital and may consist of the following items thatare defined as core capital elements:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Common stockholders' equity.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Qualifying perpetual preferred stock (including related surplus),subject to certain limitations described below.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Minority interest in the equity accounts of consolidated subsidiaries.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Tier 1 capital is generally defined as the sum of the core capitalelements less goodwill.\6\<NOTE/> (See section II(B) below for a more detailed discussion ofthe treatment of goodwill, including an explanation of certain limitedgrandfathering arrangements.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\6\ During the transition period and subject to certain limitationsset forth in Section IV below, Tier 1 capital may also include items definedas supplementary capital elements.<ITAG tagnum="21">a. <T3>Common stockholders' equity.</T3> Common stockholders' equity includes:common stock; related surplus; and retained earnings, including capitalreserves and adjustments for the cumulative effect of foreign currencytranslation, net of any treasury stock.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. <T3>Perpetual preferred stock.</T3> Perpetual preferred stock is definedas preferred stock that does not have a maturity date, that cannot be redeemedat the option of the holder of the instrument, and that has no other provisionsthat will require future redemption of the issue. In general, preferredstock will qualify for inclusion in capital only if it can absorb losseswhile the issuer operates as a going concern (a fundamental characteristicof equity capital) <T3>and</T3> only if the issuer has the ability and legal right to deferor eliminate preferred dividends.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Perpetual preferred stock in which the dividend is reset periodicallybased, in whole or in part, upon the banking organization's current creditstanding (that is, auction rate perpetual preferred stock, including so-calledDutch auction money market, and remarketable preferred) will not qualifyfor inclusion in Tier 1 capital.\7\<NOTE/> Such instruments, however, qualify for inclusion in Tier2 capital.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\7\ Adjustable rate perpetual preferred stock (that is, perpetualpreferred stock in which the dividend rate is not affected by the issuer'scredit standing or financial condition but is adjusted periodically accordingto a formula based solely on general market interest rates) may be includedin Tier 1 up to the limits specified for perpetual preferred stock.<ITAG tagnum="21">For bank holding companies, both cumulative and noncumulative perpetualpreferred stock qualify for inclusion in Tier 1. However, the aggregateamount of such stock (whether cumulative or noncumulative) that may beincluded in a holding company's Tier 1 is limited to one-third of the sumof core capital elements, excluding the perpetual preferred stock (thatis, items (i) and (iii) above). Stated differently, the aggregate amountmay not exceed 25 percent of the sum of all core capital elements, includingperpetual preferred stock (that is, items (i), (ii) and (iii) above). Anyperpetual preferred stock outstanding in excess of this limit may be includedin Tier 2 capital without any sublimits within that Tier (see discussionbelow).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The limits on preferred stock are consistent with the Board's long-standingview that common equity should remain the dominant form of a banking organization'scapital structure. In addition to these limits, the Board believes that,in general, banking organizations should avoid overreliance on other nonvotingequity instruments in their Tier 1 capital.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. <T3>Minority interest in equity accounts of consolidated subsidiaries.</T3>This element is included in Tier 1 because, as a general rule, itrepresents equity that is freely available to absorb losses in operatingsubsidiaries. While not subject to an explicit sublimit within Tier 1,banking organizations are expected to avoid using minority intererst inthe equity accounts of consolidated subsidiaries as an avenue for introducinginto their capital structures elements that might not otherwise qualifyas Tier 1 capital or that would, in effect, result in an excessive relianceon perferred stock within Tier 1.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Supplementary capital elements (Tier 2 capital). </T3>The Tier 2 componentof an institution's qualifying total capital may consist of the followingitems that are defined as supplementary capital elements: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Allowance for loan and lease losses (subject to limitations discussedbelow). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Perpetual preferred stock and related surplus (subject to conditionsdiscussed below). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Hybrid capital instruments (as defined below), perpetual debt,and mandatory convertible debt securities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) Term subordinated debt and intermediate-term preferred stock,including related surplus (subject to limitations discussed below). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The maximum amount of Tier 2 capital that may be included in an organization'squalifying total capital is limited to 100 percent of Tier 1 capital (netof goodwill). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The elements of supplementary capital are discussed in greater detailbelow.\8\<NOTE/> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\8\ The Basle capital framework also provides for the inclusionof ``undisclosed reserves'' in Tier 2. As defined in the framework, undisclosedreserves represent accumulated after-tax retained earnings that are notdisclosed on the balance sheet of a banking organization. Apart from thefact that these reserves are not disclosed publicly, they are essentiallyof the same quality and character as retained earnings, and, to be includedin capital, such reserves must be accepted by the banking organization'shome supervisor. Although such undisclosed reserves are common in somecountries, under generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) and long-standingsupervisory practice, these types of reserves are not recognized for bankingorganizations in the United States. Foreign banking organizations seekingto make acquisitions or conduct business in the United States would generallybe expected to disclose publicly at least the degree or reliance on suchreserves in meeting supervisory capital requirements. <ITAG tagnum="21">a. <T3>Allowance for loan and lease losses. </T3>Allowances for loan and leaselosses are reserves that have been established through a charge againstearnings to absorb future losses on loans or lease financing receivables.Allowances for loan and lease losses exclude ``allocated transfer riskreserves,'' \9\<NOTE/> and reserves created against identified losses. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\9\ Allocated transfer risk reserves are reserves that havebeen established in accordance with Section 905(a) of the InternationalLending Supervision Act of 1983, 12 U.S.C. 3904(a), against certain assetswhose value U.S. supervisory authorities have found to be significantlyimpaired by protracted transfer risk problems. <ITAG tagnum="21">During the transition period, the risk-based capital guidelines providefor reducing the amount of this allowance that may be included in an institution'stotal capital. Initially, it is unlimited. However, by year-end 1990, theamount of the allowance for loan and lease losses that will qualify ascapital will be limited to 1.5 percent of an institution's weighted riskassets. By the end of the transition period, the amount of the allowancequalifying for inclusion in Tier 2 capital may not exceed 1.25 percentof weighted risk assets.\10\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\10\ The amount of the allowance for loan and lease lossesthat may be included in Tier 2 capital is based on a percentage of grossweighted risk assets. A banking organization may deduct reserves for loanand lease losses in excess of the amount permitted to be included in Tier2 capital, as well as allocated transfer risk reserves, from the sum ofgross weighted risk assets and use the resulting net sum of weighted riskassets in computing the denominator of the risk-based capital ratio. <ITAG tagnum="21">b. <T3>Perpetual preferred stock. </T3>Perpetual preferred stock, as notedabove, is defined as preferred stock that has no maturity date, that cannotbe redeemed at the option of the holder, and that has no other provisionsthat will require future redemption of the issue. Such instruments areeligible for inclusion in Tier 2 capital without limit.\11\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\11\ Long-term preferred stock with an original maturity of20 years or more (including related surplus) will also qualify in thiscategory as an element of Tier 2. If the holder of such an instrument hasa right to require the issuer to redeem, repay, or repurchase the instrumentprior to the original stated maturity, maturity would be defined, for risk-basedcapital purposes, as the earliest possible date on which the holder canput the instrument back to the issuing banking organization. <ITAG tagnum="21">c. <T3>Hybrid capital instruments, perpetual debt, and mandatory convertibledebt securities. </T3>Hybrid capital instruments include instruments thatare essentially permanent in nature and that have certain characteristicsof both equity and debt. Such instruments may be included in Tier 2 withoutlimit. The general criteria hybrid capital instruments must meet in orderto qualify for inclusion in Tier 2 capital are listed below: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The instrument must be unsecured; fully paid-up and subordinatedto general creditors. If issued by a bank, it must also be subordinatedto claims or depositors. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The instrument must not be redeemable at the option of the holderprior to maturity, except with the prior approval of the Federal Reserve.(Consistent with the Board's criteria for perpetual debt and mandatoryconvertible securities, this requirement implies that holders of such instrumentsmay not accelerate the payment of principal except in the event of bankruptcy,insolvency, or reorganization.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The instrument must be available to participate in losses whilethe issuer is operating as a going concern. (Term subordinated debt wouldnot meet this requirement.) To satisfy this requirement, the instrumentmust convert to common or perpetual preferred stock in the event that theaccumulated losses exceed the sum of the retained earnings and capitalsurplus accounts of the issuer. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) The instrument must provide the option for the issuer to deferinterest payments if: a) the issuer does not report a profit in the precedingannual period (defined as combined profits for the most recent four quarters),<T3>and </T3>b) the issuer eliminates cash dividends on common and preferredstock. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Perpetual debt and mandatory convertible debt securities that meetthe criteria set forth in 12 CFR Part 225, Appendix B, also qualify asunlimited elements of Tier 2 capital for bank holding companies. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">d. <T3>Subordinated debt and intermediate-term preferred stock. </T3>The aggregateamount of term subordinated debt (excluding mandatory convertible debt)and intermediate-term preferred stock that may be treated as supplementarycapital is limited to 50 percent of Tier 1 capital (net of goodwill). Amountsin excess of these limits may be issued and, while not included in theratio calculation, will be taken into account in the overall assessmentof an organization's funding and financial condition. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Subordinated debt and intermediate-term preferred stock must havean original weighted average maturity of at least five years to qualifyas supplementary capital.\12\<NOTE/> (If the holder has the option to require the issuer to redeem,repay, or repurchase the instrument prior to the original stated maturity,maturity would be defined, for risk-based capital purposes, as the earliestpossible date on which the holder can put the instrument back to the issuingbanking organization.) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\12\ Unsecured term debt issued by bank holding companiesprior to March 12, 1988, and qualifying as secondary capital at the timeof issuance would continue to qualify as an element of supplementary capitalunder the risk-based framework, subject to the 50 percent of Tier 1 capitallimitation. Bank holding company term debt issued on or after March 12,1988, must be subordinated in order to qualify as capital. <ITAG tagnum="21">In the case of subordinated debt, the instrument must be unsecuredand must clearly state on its face that it is not a deposit and is notinsured by a Federal agency. Bank holding company debt must be subordinatedin right of payment to all senior indebtedness of the company. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">e. <T3>Discount of supplementary capital instruments.</T3> As a limited-lifecapital instrument approaches maturity it begins to take on characteristicsof a short-term obligation. For this reason, the outstanding amount ofterm subordinated debt and any long- or intermediate-life, or term, preferredstock eligible for inclusion in Tier 2 is reduced, or discounted, as theseinstruments approach maturity: one-fifth of the original amount, less anyredemptions, is excluded each year during the instrument's last five yearsbefore maturity.\13\<NOTE/> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\13\ For example, outstanding amounts of these instrumentsthat count as supplementary capital include: 100 percent of the outstandingamounts with remaining maturities of more than five years; 80 percent ofoutstanding amounts with remaining maturities of four to five years; 60percent of outstanding amounts with remaining maturities of three to fouryears; 40 percent of outstanding amounts with remaining maturities of twoto three years; 20 percent of outstanding amounts with remaining maturitiesof one to two years; and 0 percent of outstanding amounts with remainingmaturities of less than one year. Such instruments with a remaining maturityof less than one year are excluded from Tier 2 capital. <ITAG tagnum="21">f. <T3>Revaluation reserves.</T3> Such reserves reflect the formal balancesheet restatement or revaluation for capital purposes of asset carryingvalues to reflect current market values. In the United States, bankingorganizations, for the most part, follow GAAP when preparing their financialstatements, and GAAP generally does not permit the use of market-valueaccounting. For this and other reasons, the Federal banking agencies generallyhave not included unrealized asset values in capital ratio calculations,although they have long taken such values into account as a separate factorin assessing the overall financial strength of a banking organization.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Consistent with long-standing supervisory practice, the excess ofmarket values over book values for assets held by bank holding companieswill generally not be recognized in supplementary capital or in the calculationof the risk-based capital ratio. However, all banking organizations areencouraged to disclose their equivalent of premises (building) and equityrevaluation reserves. Such values will be taken into account as additionalconsiderations in assessing overall capital strength and financial condition.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">B. Deductions from Capital and Other Adjustments </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Certain assets are deducted from an organization's capital for thepurpose of calculating the risk-based capital ratio.\14\<NOTE/> These assets include: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\14\ Any assets deducted from capital in computing the numeratorof the ratio are not included in weighted risk assets in computing thedenominator of the ratio. <ITAG tagnum="21">(i) Goodwill_deducted from the sum of core capital elements. (Seediscussion below of limited grandfathering of bank holding company goodwillduring the transition period.) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Investments in banking and finance subsidiaries that are notconsolidated for accounting or supervisory purposes, and investments inother designated subsidiaries or associated companies at the discretionof the Federal Reserve_deducted from total capital components (as describedin greater detail below). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) Reciprocal holdings of capital instruments of banking organizations_deductedfrom total capital components. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Goodwill and other intangible assets</T3>_a. <T3>Goodwill.</T3> Goodwill is an intangible asset that represents theexcess of the purchase price over the fair market value of identifiableassets acquired less liabilities assumed in acquisitions accounted forunder the purchase method of accounting. Any goodwill carried on the balancesheet of a bank holding company after December 31, 1992, will be deductedfrom the sum of core capital elements in determining Tier 1 capital forratio calculation purposes. Any goodwill in existence before March 12,1988, is ``grandfathered'' during the transition period and is not deductedfrom core capital elements until after December 31, 1992. However, bankholding company goodwill acquired as a result of a merger or acquisitionthat was consummated on or after March 12, 1988, is deducted immediately.\15\<NOTE/> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\15\ Goodwill acquired by a subsidiary bank in connectionwith a merger with a troubled or failed depository institution that regulatoryauthorities have specifically allowed the bank to include in its capitalwill generally not be deducted from the core capital elements of its parentbank holding company. <ITAG tagnum="21">b. <T3>Other intangible assets. </T3>The Federal Reserve is not proposing,as a matter of general policy, to deduct automatically any other intangibleassets from the capital of bank holding companies. The Federal Reserve,however, will continue to monitor closely the level and quality of otherintangible assets_including purchased mortgage servicing rights, leaseholds,and core deposit value_and take them into account in assessing the capitaladequacy and overall asset quality of banking institutions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Generally, banking organizations should review all intangible assetsat least quarterly and, if necessary, make appropriate reductions in theircarrying values. In addition, in order to conform with prudent bankingpractice, an organization should reassess such values during its annualaudit. Banking organizations should use appropriate amortization methodsand assign prudent amortization periods for intangible assets. Examinerswill review the carrying value of these assets, together with supportingdocumentation, as well as the appropriateness of including particular intangibleassets in a banking organization's capital calculation. In making suchevaluations, examiners will consider a number of factors, including:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The reliability and predictability of any cash flows associatedwith the asset and the degree of certainty that can be achieved in periodicallydetermining the asset's useful life and value;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The existence of an active and liquid market for the asset; and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) The feasibility of selling the asset apart from the banking organizationor from the bulk of its assets.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">While all intangible assets will be monitored, intangible assets (otherthan goodwill) in excess of 25 percent of Tier 1 capital (which is definednet of goodwill) will be subject to particularly close scrutiny, both throughthe inspection process and by other appropriate means. Whenever necessary_inparticular, when assessing applications to expand or to engage in otheractivities that could entail unusual or higher-than-normal risks_the Boardwill, on a case-by-case basis, continue to consider the level of an individualorganization's tangible capital ratios (after deducting all intangibleassets), together with the quality and value of the organization's tangibleand intangible assets, in making an overall assessment of capital adequacy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Consistent with long-standing Board policy, banking organizationsexperiencing substantial growth, whether internally or by acquisition,are expected to maintain strong capital positions substantially above minimumsupervisory levels, without significant reliance on intangible assets.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Investments in certain subsidiaries._</T3> a. <T3>Unconsolidated banking or finance subsidiaries.</T3> The aggregateamount of investments in banking or finance subsidiaries \1\\6\<NOTE/> whose financial statements are not consolidated for accountingor regulatory reporting purposes, regardless of whether the investmentis made by the parent bank holding company or its direct or indirect subsidiaries,will be deducted from the consolidated parent banking organization's totalcapital components.\1\\7\<NOTE/> Generally, investments for this purpose are defined as equityand debt capital investments and any other instruments that are deemedto be capital in the particular subsidiary.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\\6\ For this purpose, a banking and finance subsidiarygenerally is defined as any company engaged in banking or finance in whichthe parent institution holds directly or indirectly more than 50 percentof the outstanding voting stock, or which is otherwise controlled or capableof being controlled by the parent institution.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\\7\ An exception to this deduction would be made in thecase of shares acquired in the regular course of securing or collectinga debt previously contracted in good faith. The requirements for consolidationare spelled out in the instructions to the Consolidated Financial Statementsfor Bank Holding Companies (FR Y-9C Report).<ITAG tagnum="21">Advances (that is, loans, extensions of credit, guarantees, commitments,or any other forms of credit exposure) to the subsidiary that are not deemedto be capital will generally not be deducted from an organization's capital.Rather, such advances generally will be included in the parent bankingorganization's consolidated assets and be assigned to the 100 percent riskcategory, unless such obligations are backed by recognized collateral orguarantees, in which case they will be assigned to the risk category appropriateto such collateral or guarantees. These advances may, however, also bededucted from the consolidated parent banking organization's capital if,in the judgment of the Federal Reserve, the risks stemming from such advancesare comparable to the risks associated with capital investments or if theadvances involve other risk factors that warrant such an adjustment tocapital for supervisory purposes. These other factors could include, forexample, the absence of collateral support.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Inasmuch as the assets of unconsolidated banking and finance subsidiariesare not fully reflected in a banking organization's consolidated totalassets, such assets may be viewed as the equivalent of off-balance sheetexposures since the operations of an unconsolidated subsidiary could exposethe parent organization and its affiliates to considerable risk. For thisreason, it is generally appropriate to view the capital resources investedin these unconsolidated entities as primarily supporting the risks inherentin these off-balance sheet assets, and not generally available to supportrisks or absorb losses elsewhere in the organization.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. <T3>Other subsidiaries and investments.</T3> The deduction of investments,regardless of whether they are made by the parent bank holding companyor by its direct or indirect subsidiaries, from a consolidated bankingorganization's capital will also be applied in the case of any subsidiaries,that, while consolidated for accounting purposes, are not consolidatedfor certain specified supervisory or regulatory purposes, such as to facilitatefunctional regulation. For this purpose, aggregate capital investments(that is, the sum of any equity or debt instruments that are deemed tobe capital) in these subsidiaries will be deducted from the consolidatedparent banking organization's total capital components.\1\\8\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\18\ Investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries will be deductedfrom both Tier 1 and Tier 2 capital. As a general rule, one-half (50 percent)of the aggregate amount of capital investments will be deducted from thebank holding company's Tier 1 capital and one-half (50 percent) from itsTier 2 capital. However, the Federal Reserve may, on a case-by-case basis,deduct a proportionately greater amount from Tier 1 if the risks associatedwith the subsidiary so warrant. If the amount deductible from Tier 2 capitalexceeds actual Tier 2 capital, the excess would be deducted from Tier 1capital. Bank holding companies' risk-based capital ratios, net of thesedeductions, must exceed the minimum standards set forth in section IV.<ITAG tagnum="21">Advances (that is, loans, extensions of credit, guarantees, commitments,or any other forms of credit exposure) to such subsidiaries that are notdeemed to be capital will generally not be deducted from capital. Rather,such advances will normally be included in the parent banking organization'sconsolidated assets and assigned to the 100 percent risk category, unlesssuch obligations are backed by recognized collateral or guarantees, inwhich case they will be assigned to the risk category appropriate to suchcollateral or guarantees. These advances may, however, be deducted fromthe consolidated parent banking organization's capital if, in the judgmentof the Federal Reserve, the risks stemming from such advances are comparableto the risks associated with capital investments or if such advances involveother risk factors that warrant such an adjustment to capital for supervisorypurposes. These other factors could include, for example, the absence ofcollateral support.\19\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\19\ In assessing the overall capital adequacy of a bankingorganization, the Federal Reserve may also consider the organization'sfully consolidated capital position.<ITAG tagnum="21">In general, when investments in a consolidated subsidiary are deductedfrom a consolidated parent banking organization's capital, the subsidiary'sassets will also be excluded from the consolidated assets of the parentbanking organization in order to assess the latter's capital adequacy.\20\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\20\ If the subsidiary's assets are consolidated with theparent banking organization for financial reporting purposes, this adjustmentwill involve excluding the subsidiary's assets on a line-by-line basisfrom the consolidated parent organization's assets. The parent bankingorganization's capital ratio will then be calculated on a consolidatedbasis with the exception that the assets of the excluded subsidiary willnot be consolidated with the remainder of the parent banking organization.<ITAG tagnum="21">The Federal Reserve may also deduct from a banking organization'scapital, on a case-by-case basis, investments in certain other subsidiariesin order to determine if the consolidated banking organization meets minimumsupervisory capital requirements without reliance on the resources investedin such subsidiaries.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Federal Reserve will not automatically deduct investments in otherunconsolidated subsidiaries or investments in joint ventures and associatedcompanies.\21\<NOTE/> Nonetheless, the resources invested in these entities, likeinvestments in unconsolidated banking and finance subsidiaries, supportassets not consolidated with the rest of the banking organization's activitiesand, therefore, may not be generally available to support additional leverageor absorb losses elsewhere in the banking organization. Moreover, experiencehas shown that banking organizations stand behind the losses of affiliatedinstitutions, such as joint ventures and associated companies, in orderto protect the reputation of the organization as a whole. In some cases,this has led to losses that have exceeded the investments in such organizations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\21\ The definition of such entities is contained in the instructionsto the Consolidated Financial Statements for Bank Holding Companies. Underregulatory reporting procedures, associated companies and joint venturesgenerally are defined as companies in which the banking organization owns20 to 50 percent of the voting stock.<ITAG tagnum="21">For this reason, the Federal Reserve will monitor the level and natureof such investments for individual banking organizations and may, on acase-by-case basis, deduct such investments from total capital components,apply an appropriate risk-weighted capital charge against the organization'sproportionate share of the assets of its associated companies, requirea line-by-line consolidation of the entity (in the event that the parent'scontrol over the entity makes it the functional equivalent of a subsidiary),or otherwise require the organization to operate with a risk-based capitalratio above the minimum.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In considering the appropriateness of such adjustments or actions,the Federal Reserve will generally take into account whether:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The parent banking organization has significant influence overthe financial or managerial policies or operations of the subsidiary, jointventure, or associated company;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) The banking organization is the largest investor in the affiliatedcompany; or</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Other circumstances prevail that appear to closely tie the activitiesof the affiliated company to the parent banking organization.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Reciprocal holdings of banking organizations' capital instruments.</T3>Reciprocal holdings of banking organizations' capital instruments(that is, instruments that qualify as Tier 1 or Tier 2 capital) will bededucted from an organization's total capital components for the purposeof determining the numerator of the risk-based capital ratio.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Reciprocal holdings are cross-holdings resulting from formal or informalarrangements in which two or more banking organizations swap, exchange,or otherwise agree to hold each other's capital instruments. Generally,deductions will be limited to intentional cross-holdings. At present, theBoard does not intend to require banking organizations to deduct non-reciprocalholdings of such capital instruments.\22\ <NOTE/>\23\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\22\ Deductions of holdings of capital securities also wouldnot be made in the case of interstate ``stake out'' investments that complywith the Board's Policy Statement on Nonvoting Equity Investments, 12 CFR225.143. In addition, holdings of capital instruments issued by other bankingorganizations but taken in satisfaction of debts previously contractedwould be exempt from any deduction from capital.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\23\ The Board intends to monitor non-reciprocal holdingsof other banking organizations' capital instruments and to provide informationon such holdings to the Basle Supervisors' Committee as called for underthe Basle capital framework.<ITAG tagnum="73">III. Procedures for Computing Weighted Risk Assets and Off-BalanceSheet Items</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">A. Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Assets and credit equivalent amounts of off-balance sheet items ofbank holding companies are assigned to one of several broad risk categories,according to the obligor, or, if relevant, the guarantor or the natureof the collateral. The aggregate dollar value of the amount in each categoryis then multiplied by the risk weight associated with that category. Theresulting weighted values from each of the risk categories are added together,and this sum is the banking organization's total weighted risk assets thatcomprise the denominator of the risk-based capital ratio. Attachment Iprovides a sample calculation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Risk weights for all off-balance sheet items are determined by a two-stepprocess. First, the ``credit equivalent amount'' of off-balance sheet itemsis determined, in most cases, by multiplying the off-balance sheet itemby a credit conversion factor. Second, the credit equivalent amount istreated like any balance sheet asset and generally is assigned to the appropriaterisk category according to the obligor, or, if relevant, the guarantoror the nature of the collateral.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In general, if a particular item qualifies for placement in more thanone risk category, it is assigned to the category that has the lowest riskweight. A holding of a U.S. municipal revenue bond that is fully guaranteedby a U.S. bank, for example, would be assigned the 20 percent risk weightappropriate to claims guaranteed by U.S. banks, rather than the 50 percentrisk weight appropriate to U.S. municipal revenue bonds.\24\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\24\ An investment in shares of a fund whose portfolio consistssolely of various securities or money market instruments that, if heldseparately, would be assigned to different risk categories, is generallyassigned to the risk category appropriate to the highest risk-weightedsecurity or instrument that the fund is permitted to hold in accordancewith its stated investment objectives. However, in no case will indirectholdings through shares in such funds be assigned to the zero percent riskcategory. For example, if a fund is permitted to hold U.S. Treasuries andcommercial paper, shares in that fund would generally be assigned the 100percent risk weight appropriate to commercial paper, regardless of theactual composition of the fund's investments at any particular time. Sharesin a fund that may invest only in U.S. Treasury securities would generallybe assigned to the 20 percent risk category. If, in order to maintain anecessary degree of short-term liquidity, a fund is permitted to hold aninsignificant amount of its assets in short-term, highly liquid securitiesof superior credit quality that do not qualify for a preferential riskweight, such securities will generally not be taken into account in determiningthe risk category into which the banking organization's holding in theoverall fund should be assigned. Regardless of the composition of the fund'ssecurities, if the fund engages in any activities that appear speculativein nature (for example, use of futures, forwards, or option contracts forpurposes other than to reduce interest rate risk) or has any other characteristicsthat are inconsistent with the preferential risk weighting assigned tothe fund's investments, holdings in the fund will be assigned to the 100percent risk category. During the examination process, the treatment ofshares in such funds that are assigned to a lower risk weight will be subjectto examiner review to ensure that they have been assigned an appropriaterisk weight.<ITAG tagnum="21">The terms ``claims'' and ``securities'' used in the context of thediscussion of risk weights, unless otherwise specified, refer to loansor debt obligations of the entity on whom the claim is held. Assets inthe form of stock or equity holdings in commercial or financial firms areassigned to the 100 percent risk category, unless some other treatmentis explicitly permitted.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">B. Collateral, Guarantees, and Other Considerations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Collateral. </T3>The only forms of collateral that are formally recognizedby the risk-based capital framework are: cash on deposit in a subsidiarylending institution; securities issued or guaranteed by the central governmentsof the OECD-based group of countries,\2\\5\<NOTE/> U.S. Government agencies, or U.S. Government-sponsored agencies;and securities issued by multilateral lending institutions or regionaldevelopment banks. Claims fully secured by such collateral are assignedto the 20 percent risk category.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\\5\ The OECD-based group of countries comprises all fullmembers of the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD),as well as countries that have concluded special lending arrangements withthe International Monetary Fund (IMF) associated with the Fund's GeneralArrangements to Borrow. The OECD includes the following countries: Australia,Austria, Belgium, Canada, Denmark, the Federal Republic of Germany, Finland,France, Greece, Iceland, Ireland, Italy, Japan, Luxembourg, Netherlands,New Zealand, Norway, Portugal, Spain, Sweden, Switzerland, Turkey, theUnited Kingdom, and the United States. Saudi Arabia has concluded speciallending arrangements with the IMF associated with the Fund's General Arrangementsto Borrow.<ITAG tagnum="21">The extent to which qualifying securities are recognized as collateralis determined by their current market value. If a claim is only partiallysecured, that is, the market value of the pledged securities is less thanthe face amount of a balance sheet asset or an off-balance sheet item,the portion that is covered by the market value of qualifying collateralis assigned to the 20 percent risk category, and the portion of the claimthat is not covered by collateral in the form of cash or a qualifying securityis assigned to the risk category appropriate to the obligor or, if relevant,the guarantor. For example, to the extent that a claim on a private sectorobligor is collateralized by the current market value of U.S. Governmentsecurities, it would be placed in the 20 percent risk category and thebalance would be assigned to the 100 percent risk category.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Guarantees. </T3>Guarantees of the OECD and non-OECD central governments,U.S. Government agencies, U.S. Government-sponsored agencies, state andlocal governments of the OECD-based group of countries, multilateral lendinginstitutions and regional development banks, U.S. depository institutions,and foreign banks are also recognized. If a claim is partially guaranteed,that is, coverage of the guarantee is less than the face amount of a balancesheet asset or an off-balance sheet item, the portion that is not fullycovered by the guarantee is assigned to the risk category appropriate tothe obligor or, if relevant, to any collateral. The face amount of a claimcovered by two types of guarantees that have different risk weights, suchas a U.S. Government guarantee and a state guarantee, is to be apportionedbetween the two risk categories appropriate to the guarantors.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The existence of other forms of collateral or guarantees that therisk-based capital framework does not formally recognize may be taken intoconsideration in evaluating the risks inherent in an organization's loanportfolio_which, in turn, would affect the overall supervisory assessmentof the organization's capital adequacy.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Mortgage-backed securities.</T3> Mortgage-backed securities, includingpass-throughs and collateralized mortgage obligations (but not strippedmortgage-backed securities), that are <T3>issued</T3> or <T3>guaranteed</T3> by a U.S. Government agency or U.S. Government-sponsoredagency are assigned to the risk weight category appropriate to the issueror guarantor. Generally, a privately-issued mortgage-backed security meetingcertain criteria set forth in the accompanying footnote \2\\6\<NOTE/> is treated as essentially an indirect holding of the underlyingassets, and is assigned to the same risk category as the underlying assets,but in no case to the zero percent risk category. Privately-issued mortgage-backedsecurities whose structures do not qualify them to be regarded as indirectholdings of the underlying assets are assigned to the 100 percent riskcategory. During the inspection process, privately-issued mortgage-backedsecurities that are assigned to a lower risk weight category will be subjectto examiner review to ensure that they meet the appropriate criteria.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\\6\ A privately-issued mortgage-backed security may betreated as an indirect holding of the underlying assets provided that:(1) The underlying assets are held by an independent trustee and the trusteehas a first priority, perfected security interest in the underlying assetson behalf of the holders of the security; (2) either the holder of thesecurity has an undivided <T3>pro rata</T3> ownership interest in the underlying mortgage assetsor the trust or single purpose entity (or conduit) that issues the securityhas no liabilities unrelated to the issued securities; (3) the securityis structured such that the cash flow from the underlying assets in allcases fully meets the cash flow requirements of the security without unduereliance on any reinvestment income; and (4) there is no material reinvestmentrisk associated with any funds awaiting distribution to the holders ofthe security. In addition, if the underlying assets of a mortgage-backedsecurity are composed of more than one type of asset, for example, U.S.Government-sponsored agency securities and privately-issued pass-throughsecurities that qualify for the 50 percent risk weight category, the entiremortgage-backed security is generally assigned to the category appropriateto the highest risk-weighted asset underlying the issue, but in no caseto the zero percent risk category. Thus, in this example, the securitywould receive the 50 percent risk weight appropriate to the privately-issuedpass-through securities.<ITAG tagnum="21">While the risk category to which mortgage-backed securities is assignedwill generally be based upon the issuer or guarantor or, in the case ofprivately-issued mortgage-backed securities, the assets underlying thesecurity, any class of a mortgage-backed security that can absorb morethan its <T3>pro rata</T3> share of loss without the whole issue being in default(for example, a so-called subordinated class or residual interest), isassigned to the 100 percent risk category. Furthermore, all stripped mortgage-backedsecurities, including interest-only strips (IOs), principal-only strips(POs), and similar instruments, are also assigned to the 100 percent riskweight category, regardless of the issuer or guarantor.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. <T3>Maturity.</T3> Maturity is generally not a factor in assigning itemsto risk categories with the exception of claims on non-OECD banks, commitments,and interest rate and foreign exchange rate contracts. Except for commitments,short-term is defined as one year or less <T3>remaining </T3>maturity and long-term is defined as over one year <T3>remaining</T3> maturity. In the case of commitments, short-term isdefined as one year or less <T3>original</T3> maturity and long-term is defined as over one year <T3>original</T3> maturity.\2\\7\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\\7\ Through year-end 1992, remaining, rather than original,maturity may be used for determining the maturity of commitments.<ITAG tagnum="71">C. Risk Weights</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Attachment III contains a listing of the risk categories, a summaryof the types of assets assigned to each category and the risk weight associatedwith each category, that is, 0 percent, 20 percent, 50 percent, and 100percent. A brief explanation of the components of each category follows.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Category 1: zero percent.</T3> This category includes cash (domesticand foreign) owned and held in all offices of subsidiary depository institutionsor in transit and gold bullion held in either a subsidiary depository institution'sown vaults or in another's vaults on an allocated basis, to the extentit is offset by gold bullion liabilities.\2\\8\<NOTE/> The category also includes all direct claims (including securities,loans, and leases) on, and the portions of claims that are directly andunconditionally guaranteed by, the central governments \2\\9\<NOTE/> of the OECD countries and U.S. Government agencies,\3\\0\<NOTE/> as well as all direct local currency claims on, and the portionsof local currency claims that are directly and unconditionally guaranteedby, the central governments of non-OECD countries, to the extent that subsidiarydepository institutions have liabilities booked in that currency. A claimis not considered to be unconditionally guaranteed by a central governmentif the validity of the guarantee is dependent upon some affirmative actionby the holder or a third party. Generally, securities guaranteed by theU.S. Government or its agencies that are actively traded in financial markets,such as GNMA securities, are considered to be unconditionally guaranteed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\\8\ All other holdings of bullion are assigned to the 100percent risk category.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\\9\ A central government is defined to include departmentsand ministries, including the central bank, of the central government.The U.S. central bank includes the 12 Federal Reserve Banks, and stockheld in these banks as a condition of membership is assigned to the zeropercent risk category. The definition of central government does not includestate, provincial, or local governments; or commercial enterprises ownedby the central government. In addition, it does not include local governmententities or commercial enterprises whose obligations are guaranteed bythe central government, although any claims on such entities guaranteedby central governments are placed in the same general risk category asother claims guaranteed by central governments. OECD central governmentsare defined as central governments of the OECD-based group of countries;non-OECD central governments are defined as central governments of countriesthat do not belong to the OECD-based group of countries.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\\0\ A U.S. Governmnt agency is defined as an instrumentalityof the U.S. Government whose obligations are fully and explicitly guaranteedas to the timely payment of principal and interest by the full faith andcredit of the U.S. Government. Such agencies include the Government NationalMortgage Association (GNMA), the Veterans Administration (VA), the FederalHousing Administration (FHA), the Export-Import Bank (Exim Bank), the OverseasPrivate Investment Corporation (OPIC), the Commodity Credit Corporation(CCC), and the Small Business Administration (SBA).<ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Category 2: 20 percent. </T3>This category includes cash items in theprocess of collection, both foreign and domestic; short-term claims (includingdemand deposits) on, and the portions of short-term claims that are guaranteedby,\3\\1\<NOTE/> U.S. depository institutions \3\\2\<NOTE/> and foreign banks \3\\3\<NOTE/>; and long-term claims on, and the portions of long-term claimsthat are guaranteed by, U.S. depository institutions and OECD banks.\3\\4\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\\1\ Claims guaranteed by U.S. depository institutions andforeign banks include risk participations in both bankers acceptances andstandby letters of credit, as well as participations in commitments, thatare conveyed to U.S. depository institutions or foreign banks.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\\2\ U.S. depository institutions are defined to includebranches (foreign and domestic) of federally-insured banks and depositoryinstitutions chartered and headquartered in the 50 states of the UnitedStates, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, and U.S. territories andpossessions. The definition encompasses banks, mutual or stock savingsbanks, savings or building and loan associations, cooperative banks, creditunions, and international banking facilities or domestic banks. U.S.-chartereddepository institutions owned by foreigners are also included in the definition.However, branches and agencies of foreign banks located in the U.S., aswell as all bank holding companies, are excluded.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\\3\ Foreign banks are distinguished as either OECD banksor non-OECD banks. OECD banks include banks and their branches (foreignand domestic) organized under the laws of countries (other than the U.S.)that belong to the OECD-based group of countries. Non-OECD banks includebanks and their branches (foreign and domestic) organized under the lawsof countries that do not belong to the OECD-based group of countries. Forthis purpose, a bank is defined as an institution that engages in the businessof banking; is recognized as a bank by the bank supervisory or monetaryauthorities of the country of its organization or principal banking operations;receives deposits to a substantial extent in the regular course of business;and has the power to accept demand deposits. Claims on, and the portionsof claims that are guaranteed by, a non-OECD central bank are treated asclaims on, or guaranteed by, a non-OECD bank, except for local currencyclaims that are guaranteed by, a non-OECD central bank that are fundedin local currency liabilities. The latter claims are assigned to the zeropercent risk category.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\\4\ Long-term claims on, or guaranteed by, non-OECD banksand all claims on bank holding companies are assigned to the 100 percentrisk category, as are holdings of bank-issued securities that qualify ascapital of the issuing banks.<ITAG tagnum="21">This category also includes the portions of claims that are conditionallyguaranteed by OECD central governments and U.S. Government agencies, aswell as the portions of local currency claims that are conditionally guaranteedby non-OECD central governments, to the extent that subsidiary depositoryinstitutions have liabilities booked in that currency. In addition, thiscategory also includes claims on, and the portions of claims that are guaranteedby, U.S. Government-sponsored agencies \3\\5\<NOTE/> and claims on, and the portions of claims guaranteed by,the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development (World Bank),the Interamerican Development Bank, the Asian Development Bank, the AfricanDevelopment Bank, the European Investment Bank, and other multilaterallending institutions or regional development banks in which the U.S. Governmentis a shareholder or contributing member. General obligation claims on,or portions of claims guaranteed by the full faith and credit of, statesor other political subdivisions of the U.S. or other countries of the OECD-basedgroup are also assigned to this category.\3\\6\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\\5\ For this purpose, U.S. Government-sponsored agenciesare defined as agencies originally established or chartered by the Federalgovernment to serve public purposes specified by the U.S. Congress butwhose obligations are <T3>not explicitly </T3>guaranteed by the full faith and credit of theU.S. Government. These agencies include the Federal Home Loan MortgageCorporation (FHLMC), the Federal National Mortgage Association (FNMA),the Farm Credit System, the Federal Home Loan Bank System, and the StudentLoan Marketing Association (SLAM). Claims on U.S. Government-sponsoredagencies include capital stock in a Federal Home Loan Bank that is heldas a condition of membership in that Bank.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\\6\ Claims on, or guaranteed by, states or other politicalsubdivisions of countries that do not belong to the OECD-based group ofcountries are placed in the 100 percent risk category.<ITAG tagnum="21">This category also includes the portions of claims (including repurchaseagreements) collateralized by cash on deposit in the subsidiary lendinginstitution; by securities issued or guaranteed by OECD central governments,U.S. Government agencies or U.S. Government-sponsored agencies; or by securitiesissued by multilateral lending institutions or regional development banksin which the U.S. Government is a shareholder or contributing member.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Category 3: 50 percent. </T3>This category includes loans fully securedby first liens \3\\7\<NOTE/> on 1-4 family residential properties,\3\\8\<NOTE/> either owner-occupied or rented, provided that such loanshave been made in accordance with prudent underwriting standards, includinga conservative loan-to-value ratio; \3\\9\<NOTE/> are performing in accordance with their original terms; andare not 90 days or more past due or carried in nonaccrual status.\4\\0\<NOTE/> Also included in this category are privately-issued mortgage-backedsecurities provided that: (1) The structure of the security meets the criteriadescribed in section III(B)(3) above; (2) if the security is backed bya pool of conventional mortgages, <T3>each</T3> underlying mortgage meets the criteria described above inthis section for eligibility for the 50 percent risk weight category atthe time the pool is originated; and (3) if the security is backed by privately-issuedmortgage-backed securities, <T3>each</T3> underlying security qualifies for the 50 percent risk category.Privately-issued mortgage-backed securities that do not meet these criteriaor that do not qualify for a lower risk weight are generally assigned tothe 100 percent risk weight category.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\\7\ If a banking organization holds the first and juniorlien(s) on a residential property and no other party holds an interveninglien, the transaction is treated as a single loan secured by a first lienfor the purpose of determining the loan-to-value ratio.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\\8\ The types of properties that qualify as 1-4 familyresidences are listed in the instructions to the FR Y-9C Report.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\\9\ The loan-to-value ratio is based upon the most currentappraised value of the property. All the appraisals must be made in a mannerconsistent with the Federal banking agencies' real estate appraisal guidelinesand with the banking organization's own appraisal guidelines.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\\0\ Residential property loans that do not meet all thespecified criteria or that are made for the purpose of speculative propertydevelopment are placed in the 100 percent risk category.<ITAG tagnum="21">Also assigned to this category are <T3>revenue</T3> (non-general obligation) bonds or similar obligations,including loans and leases, that are obligations of states or other politicalsubdivisions of the U.S. (for example, municipal revenue bonds) or othercountries of the OECD-based group, but for which the government entityis committed to repay the debt with revenues from the specific projectsfinanced, rather than from general tax funds.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Credit equivalent amounts of interest rate and foreign exchange ratecontracts involving standard risk obligors (that is, obligors whose loansor debt securities would be assigned to the 100 percent risk category)are included in the 50 percent category, unless they are backed by collateralor guarantees that allow them to be placed in a lower risk category. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. <T3>Category 4: 100 percent. </T3>All assets not included in the categoriesabove are assigned to this category, which comprises standard risk assets.The bulk of the assets typically found in a loan portfolio would be assignedto the 100 percent category. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This category includes long-term claims on, and the portions of long-termclaims that are guaranteed by, non-OECD banks, and all claims on non-OECDcentral governments that entail some degree of transfer risk.\41\<NOTE/> This category also includes all claims on foreign and domesticprivate sector obligors not included in the categories above (includingloans to nondepository financial institutions and bank holding companies);claims on commercial firms owned by the public sector; customer liabilitiesto the bank on acceptances outstanding involving standard risk claims;\42\<NOTE/> investments in fixed assets, premises, and other real estateowned; common and preferred stock of corporations, including stock acquiredfor debts previously contracted; commercial and consumer loans (exceptthose assigned to lower risk categories due to recognized guarantees orcollateral and loans for residential property that qualify for a lowerrisk weight); mortage-backed securities that do not meet criteria for assignmentto a lower risk weight (including any classes of mortgage-backed securitiesthat can absorb more than their <T3>pro rata </T3>share of loss without the whole issue being in default);and all stripped mortgage-backed and similar securities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\41\ Such assets include all non-local currency claims on,and the portions of claims that are guaranteed by, non-OECD central governmentsand those portions of local currency claims on, or guaranteed by, non-OECDcentral governments that exceed the local currency liabilities held bysubsidiary depository institutions. <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\42\ Customer liabilities on acceptances outstanding involvingnon-standard risk claims, such as claims on U.S. depository institutions,are assigned to the risk category appropriate to the identity of the obligoror, if relevant, the nature of the collateral or guarantees backing theclaims. Portions of acceptances conveyed as risk participations to U.S.depository institutions or foreign banks are assigned to the 20 percentrisk category appropriate to short-term claims guaranteed by U.S. depositoryinstitutions and foreign banks.<ITAG tagnum="21">Also included in this category are industrial development bonds andsimilar obligations issued under the auspices of states or political subdivisionsof the OECD-based group of countries for the benefit of a private partyor enterprise where that party or enterprise, not the government entity,is obligated to pay the principal and interest, and all obligations ofstates or political subdivisions of countries that do not belong to theOECD-based group.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The following assets also are assigned a risk weight of 100 percentif they have not been deducted from capital: investments in unconsolidatedcompanies, joint ventures or associated companies; instruments that qualifyas capital issued by other banking organizations; and any intangibles,including grandfathered goodwill.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">D. Off-Balance Sheet Items</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The face amount of an off-balance sheet item is incorporated intothe risk-based capital ratio by multiplying it by a credit conversion factor.The resultant credit equivalent amount is assigned to the appropriate riskcategory according to the obligor, or, if relevant, the guarantor or thenature of the collateral.\4\\3\<NOTE/> Attachment IV sets forth the conversion factors for varioustypes of off-balance sheet items.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\\3\ The sufficiency of collateral and guarantees for off-balancesheet items is determined by the market value of the collateral or theamount of the guarantee in relation to the face amount of the item, exceptfor interest and foreign exchange rate contracts, for which this determinationis made in relation to the credit equivalent amount. Collateral and guaranteesare subject to the same provisions noted under section III(B).<ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Items with a 100 percent conversion factor. </T3>A 100 percent conversionfactor applies to direct credit substitutes, which include guarantees,or equivalent instruments, backing financial claims, such as outstandingsecurities, loans, and other financial liabilities, or that back off-balancesheet items that require capital under the risk-based capital framework.Direct credit substitutes include, for example, financial standby lettersof credit, or other equivalent irrevocable undertakings or surety arrangements,that guarantee repayment of financial obligations such as: commercial paper,tax-exempt securities, commercial or individual loans or debt obligations,or standby or commercial letters of credit. Direct credit substitutes alsoinclude the acquisition of risk participations in bankers acceptances andstandby letters of credit, since both of these transactions, in effect,constitute a guarantee by the acquiring banking organization that the underlyingaccount party (obligor) will repay its obligation to the originating, orissuing, institution.\4\\4\<NOTE/> (Standby letters of credit that are performance-related arediscussed below and have a credit conversion factor of 50 percent.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\\4\ Credit equivalent amounts of acquisitions of risk participationsare assigned to the risk category appropriate to the account party obligor,or, if relevant, the nature of the collateral or guarantees.<ITAG tagnum="21">The full amount of a direct credit substitute is converted at 100percent and the resulting credit equivalent amount is assigned to the riskcategory appropriate to the obligor or, if relevant, the guarantor or thenature of the collateral. In the case of a direct credit substitute inwhich a risk participation\4\\5\<NOTE/> has been conveyed, the full amount is still converted at100 percent. However, the credit equivalent amount that has been conveyedis assigned to whichever risk category is lower: the risk category appropriateto the obligor, after giving effect to any relevant guarantees or collateral,or the risk category appropriate to the institution acquiring the participation.Any remainder is assigned to the risk category appropriate to the obligor,guarantor, or collateral. For example, the portion of a direct credit substituteconveyed as a risk participation to a U.S. domestic depository institutionor foreign bank is assigned to the risk category appropriate to claimsguaranteed by those institutions, that is, the 20 percent risk category.\4\\6\<NOTE/> This approach recognizes that such conveyances replace theoriginating banking organization's exposure to the obligor with an exposureto the institutions acquiring the risk participations.\4\\7\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\\5\ That is, a participation in which the originating bankingorganization remains liable to the beneficiary for the full amount of thedirect credit substitute if the party that has acquired the participationfails to pay when the instrument is drawn.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\\6\ Risk participations with a remaining maturity of overone year that are conveyed to non-OECD banks are to be assigned to the100 percent risk category, unless a lower risk category is appropriateto the obligor, guarantor, or collateral.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\4\\7\A risk participation in bankers acceptances conveyedto other institutions is also assigned to the risk category appropriateto the institution acquiring the participation or, if relevant, the guarantoror nature of the collateral.<ITAG tagnum="21">In the case of direct credit substitutes that take the form of a syndication,that is, where each banking organization if obligated only for its <T3>pro rata </T3>share of the risk and there is no recourse to the originatingbanking organization, each banking organization will only include its <T3>pro rata </T3>share of the direct credit substitute in its risk-basedcapital calculation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Financial standby letters of credit are distinguished from loan commitments(discussed below) in that standbys are irrevocable obligations of the bankingorganization to pay a third-party beneficiary when a customer (accountparty) <T3>fails to repay </T3>an outstanding loan or debt instrument (directcredit substitute). Performance standby letters of credit (performancebonds) are irrevocable obligations of the banking organization to pay athird-party beneficiary when a customer (account party) <T3>fails to perform </T3>some other contractual non-financial obligation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The distinguishing characteristic of a standby letter of credit forrisk-based capital purposes is the combination of irrevocability with thefact that funding is triggered by some failure to repay or perform an obligation.Thus, any commitment (by whatever name) that involves an <T3>irrevocable </T3>obligation to make a payment to the customer or toa third party in the event the customer <T3>fails to repay </T3>an outstanding debt obligation or <T3>fails to perform </T3>a contractual obligation is treated, for risk-basedcapital purposes, as respectively, a financial guarantee standby letterof credit or a performance standby.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A loan commitment, on the other hand, involves an obligation (withor without a material adverse change or similar clause) of the bankingorganization to fund its customer <T3>in the normal course </T3>of business should the customer seek to drawdown the commitment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Sale and repurchase agreements and asset sales with recourse (to theextent not included on the balance sheet) and forward agreements also areconverted at 100 percent.\48\<NOTE/> So-called ``loan strips'' (that is, short-term advances soldunder long-term commitments without direct recourse) are treated for risk-basedcapital purposes as assets sold with recourse and, accordingly, are alsoconverted at 100 percent.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\48\ In regulatory reports and under GAAP, bank holding companiesare permitted to treat some asset sales with recourse as ``true'' sales.For risk-based capital purposes, however, such assets sold with recourseand reported as ``true'' sales by bank holding companies are convertedat 100 percent and assigned to the risk category appropriate to the underlyingobligor, or, if relevant the guarantor or nature of the collateral, providedthat the transactions meet the definition of assets sold with recourse,including the sale of 1-4 family residential mortgages, that is containedin the instructions to the commercial bank Consolidated Reports of Conditionand Income (Call Report).<ITAG tagnum="21">Forward agreements are legally binding contractual obligations topurchase assets with <T3>certain </T3>drawdown at a specified future date. Such obligationsinclude forward purchases, forward forward deposits placed,\49\<NOTE/> and partly-paid shares and securities; they do not includecommitments to make residential mortage loans or forward foreign exchangecontracts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\49\ Forward forward deposits accepted are treated as interestrate contracts.<ITAG tagnum="21">Securities lent by a banking organization are treated in one of twoways, depending upon whether the lender is at risk of loss. If a bankingorganization, as agent for a customer, lends the customer's securitiesand does not indemnify the customer against loss, then the transactionis excluded from the risk-based capital calculation. If, alternatively,a banking organization lends its own securities or, acting as agent fora customer, lends the customer's securities and indemnifies the customeragainst loss, the transaction is converted at 100 percent and assignedto the risk weight category appropriate to the obligor, to any collateraldelivered to the lending banking organization, or, if applicable, to theindependent custodian acting on the lender's behalf.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Items with a 50 percent conversion factor. </T3>Transaction-relatedcontingencies are converted at 50 percent. Such contingencies include bidbonds, performance bonds, warranties, standby letters of credit relatedto particular transactions, and performance standby letters of credit,as well as acquisitions of risk participation in performance standby lettersof credit. Peformance standby letters of credit represent obligations backingthe performance of nonfinancial or commercial contracts or undertakings.To the extent permitted by law or regulation, performance standby lettersof credit include arrangements backing, among other things, subcontractors'and suppliers' performance, labor and materials contracts, and constructionbids.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The unused portion of commitments with an <T3>original </T3>maturity exceeding one year,\50\<NOTE/> including underwriting commitments, and commercial and consumercredit commitments also are converted at 50 percent. Original maturityis defined as the length of time between the date the commitment is issuedand the earliest date on which: (1) The banking organization can, at itsoption, unconditionally (without cause) cancel the commitment; \51\<NOTE/> and (2) the banking organization is scheduled to (and asa normal practice actually does) review the facility to determine whetheror not it should be extended. Such reviews must continue to be conductedat least annually for such a facility to qualify as a short-term commitment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\50\ Through year-end 1992, remaining maturity may be usedfor determining the maturity of off-balance sheet loan commitments; thereafter,original maturity must be used.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\51\ In the case of consumer home equity or mortgage linesof credit secured by liens on 1-4 family residential properties, the bankis deemed able to unconditionally cancel the commitment for the purposeof this criterion if, at its option, it can prohibit additional extensionsof credit, reduce the credit line, and terminate the commitment to thefull extent permitted by relevant Federal law.<ITAG tagnum="21">Commitments are defined as any legally binding arrangements that obligatea banking organization to extend credit in the form of loans or leases;to purchase loans, securities, or other assets; or to participate in loansand leases. They also include overdraft facilities, revolving credit, homeequity and mortgage lines of credit, and similar transactions. Normally,commitments involve a written contract or agreement and a commitment fee,or some other form of consideration. Commitments are included in weightedrisk assets regardless of whether they contain ``material adverse change''clauses or other provisions that are intended to relieve the issuer ofits funding obligation under certain conditions. In the case of commitmentsstructured as syndications, where the banking organization is obligatedsolely for its <T3>pro rata </T3>share, only the banking organization's proportional shareof the syndicated commitment is taken into account in calculating the risk-basedcapital ratio.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Facilities that are unconditionally cancellable (without cause) atany time by the banking organization are not deemed to be commitments,provided the banking organization makes a separate credit decision beforeeach drawing under the facility. Commitments with an original maturityof one year or less are deemed to involve low risk and, therefore, arenot assessed a capital charge. Such short-term commitments are definedto include the unused portion of lines of credit on retail credit cardsand related plans (as defined in the instructions to the FR Y-9C Report)if the banking organization has the unconditional right to cancel the lineof credit at any time, in accordance with applicable law. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Once a commitment has been converted at 50 percent, any portion thathas been conveyed to U.S. depository institutions or OECD banks as participationsin which the originating banking organization retains the full obligationto the borrower if the participating bank fails to pay when the instrumentis drawn, is assigned to the 20 percent risk category. This treatment isanalogous to that accorded to conveyances of risk participations in standbyletters of credit. The acquisition of a participation in a commitment bya banking organization is converted at 50 percent and assigned to the riskcategory appropriate to the account party obligor or, if relevant, thenature of the collateral or guarantees. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Revolving underwriting facilities (RUFs), note issuance facilities(NIFs), and other similar arrangements also are converted at 50 percentregardless of maturity. These are facilities under which a borrower canissue on a revolving basis short-term paper in its own name, but for whichthe underwriting organizations have a legally binding commitment eitherto purchase any notes the borrower is unable to sell by the roll-over dateor to advance funds to the borrower. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Items with a 20 percent conversion factor.</T3> Short-term, self-liquidatingtrade-related contingencies which arise from the movement of goods areconverted at 20 percent. Such contingencies generally include commercialletters of credit and other documentary letters of credit collateralizedby the underlying shipments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. <T3>Items with a zero percent conversion factor.</T3> These include unusedportions of commitments with an original maturity of one year or less,\52\<NOTE/> or which are unconditionally cancellable at any time, provideda separate credit decision is made before each drawing under the facility.Unused portions of lines of credit on retail credit cards and related plansare deemed to be short-term commitments if the banking organization hasthe unconditional right to cancel the line of credit at any time, in accordancewith applicable law. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\52\ Through year-end 1992, remaining maturity may be usedfor determining term to maturity for off-balance sheet loan commitments;thereafter, original maturity must be used. <ITAG tagnum="71">E. Interest Rate and Foreign Exchange Rate Contracts </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Scope.</T3> Credit equivalent amounts are computed for each of thefollowing off-balance sheet interest rate and foreign exchange rate instruments:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">I. Interest Rate Contracts </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Single currency interest rate swaps. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Basis swaps. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. Forward rate agreements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">D. Interest rate options purchased (including caps, collars, and floorspurchased). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">E. Any other instrument that gives rise to similar credit risks (includingwhen-issued securities and forward forward deposits accepted). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">II. Exchange Rate Contracts </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">A. Cross-currency interest rate swaps. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">B. Forward foreign exchange contracts. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">C. Currency options purchased. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="24">D. Any other instrument that gives rise to similar credit risks.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Exchange rate contracts with an original maturity of fourteen calendardays or less and instruments traded on exchanges that require daily paymentof variation margin are excluded from the risk-based ratio calculation.Over-the-counter options purchased, however, are included and treated inthe same way as the other interest rate and exchange rate contracts. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Calculation of credit equivalent amounts.</T3> Credit equivalent amountsare calculated for each individual contract of the types listed above.To calculate the credit equivalent amount of its off-balance sheet interestrate and exchange rate instruments, a banking organization sums these amounts:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The mark-to-market value \53\<NOTE/> (positive values only) of each contract (that is, the currentexposure); and </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\53\ Mark-to-market values are measured in dollars, regardlessof the currency or currencies specified in the contract, and should reflectchanges in both interest rates and counterparty credit quality. <ITAG tagnum="21">(2) An estimate of the potential future credit exposure over the remaininglife of each contract. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The potential future credit exposure on a contract, including contractswith negative mark-to-market values, is estimated by multiplying the notionalprincipal amount by one of the following credit conversion factors, asappropriate: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s10,9.1,10 </C>  <H1>Remaining maturity </H1><H1>Interest rate contracts (percent)</H1><H1>Exchange rate contracts (percent)</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">One year or less <D>0 </D><D>1.0 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Over one year <D>0.5 </D><D>5.0</D></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="20">Examples of the calculation of credit equivalent amounts for theseinstruments are contained in Attachment V. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Because exchange rate contracts involve an exchange of principal uponmaturity, and exchange rates are generally more volatile than interestrates, higher conversion factors have been established for foreign exchangecontracts than for interest rate contracts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">No potential future credit exposure is calculated for single currencyinterest rate swaps in which payments are made based upon two floatingrate indices, so-called floating/floating or basis swaps; the credit exposureon these contracts is evaluated solely on the basis of their mark-to-marketvalues.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Risk weights.</T3> Once the credit equivalent amount for interest rateand exchange rate instruments has been determined, that amount is assignedto the risk weight category appropriate to the counterparty, or, if relevant,the nature of any collateral or guarantees.\5\\4\<NOTE/> However, the maximum weight that will be applied to the creditequivalent amount of such instruments is 50 percent.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\\4\ For interest and exchange rate contracts, sufficiencyof collateral or guarantees is determined by the market value of the collateralor the amount of the guarantee in relation to the credit equivalent amount.Collateral and guarantees are subject to the same provisions noted undersection III (B).<ITAG tagnum="21">4. <T3>Avoidance of double counting.</T3> In certain cases, credit exposuresarising from the interest rate and exchange instruments covered by theseguidelines may already be reflected, in part, on the balance sheet. Toavoid double counting such exposures in the assessment of capital adequacyand, perhaps, assigning inappropriate risk weights, counterparty creditexposures arising form the types of instruments covered by these guidelinesmay need to be excluded from balance sheet assets in calculating bankingorganizations' risk-based capital ratios.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. <T3>Netting.</T3> Netting of swaps and similar contracts is recognizedfor purposes of calculating the risk-based capital ratio <T3>only</T3> when accomplished through netting by novation.\5\\5\<NOTE/> While the Federal Reserve encourages any reasonable arrangementsdesigned to reduce the risks inherent in these transactions, other typesof netting arrangements are not recognized for purposes of calculatingthe risk-based ratio at this time.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\\5\ Netting by novation, for this purpose, is a writtenbilateral contract between two counterparties under which any obligationto each other to deliver a given currency on a given date is automaticallyamalgamated with all other obligations for the same currency and valuedate, <T3>legally</T3> substituting one single net amount for the previous grossobligations.<ITAG tagnum="73">IV. Minimum Supervisory Ratios and Standards</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The interim and final supervisory standards set forth below specify<T3>minimum</T3> supervisory ratios based primarily on broad credit riskconsiderations. As noted above, the risk-based ratio does not take explicitaccount of the quality of individual asset portfolios or the range of othertypes of risks to which banking organizations may be exposed, such as interestrate, liquidity, market or operational risks. For this reason, bankingorganizations are generally expected to operate with capital positionswell above the minimum ratios. This is particularly true for institutionsthat are undertaking significant expansion or that are exposed to highor unusual levels of risk.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Upon adoption of the risk-based framework, any organization that doesnot meet the interim or final supervisory ratios, or whose capital is otherwiseconsidered inadequate, is expected to develop and implement a plan acceptableto the Federal Reserve for achieving an adequate level of capital consistentwith the provisions of these guidelines or with the special circumstancesaffecting the individual organization. In addition, such organizationsshould avoid any actions, including increased risk-taking or unwarrantedexpansion, that would lower or further erode their capital positions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">A. Minimum Risk-Based Ratio After Transition Period</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">As reflected in Attachment VI, by year-end 1992, all bank holdingcompanies \5\\6\<NOTE/> should meet a minimum ratio of qualifying total capital toweighted risk assets of 8 percent, of which at least 4.0 percentage pointsshould be in the form of Tier 1 capital. (Section II above contains detaileddefinitions of capital and related terms used in this section.) The maximumamount of supplementary capital elements that qualifies as Tier 2 capitalis limited to 100 percent of Tier 1 capital net of goodwill. In addition,the combined maximum amount of subordinated debt and intermediate-termpreferred stock that qualifies as Tier 2 capital is limited to 50 percentof Tier 1 capital net of goodwill. The maximum amount of the allowancefor loan and lease losses that qualifies as Tier 2 capital is limited to1.25 percent of gross weighted risk assets. Allowances for loan and leaselosses in excess of this limit may, of course, be maintained, but wouldnot be included in an organization's total capital. The Federal Reservewill continue to require bank holding companies to maintain reserves atlevels fully sufficient to cover losses inherent in their loan portfolios.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\\6\ As noted in Section I above, bank holding companieswith less than $150 million in consolidated assets would generally be exemptfrom the calculation and analysis of risk-based ratios on a consolidatedholding company basis, subject to certain terms and conditions.<ITAG tagnum="21">Qualifying total capital is calculated by adding Tier 1 capital andTier 2 capital (limited to 100 percent of Tier 1 capital) and then deductingfrom this sum certain investments in banking or finance subsidiaries thatare not consolidated for accounting or supervisory purposes, reciprocalholdings of banking organizations' capital securities, or other items atthe direction of the Federal Reserve. The conditions under which thesedeductions are to be made and the procedures for making the deductionsare discussed above in section II(B).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">B. Transition Arrangements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The transition period for implementing the risk-based capital standardends on December 31, 1992.\5\\7\<NOTE/> Initially, the risk-based capital guidelines do not establisha minimum level of capital. However, by year-end 1990, banking organizationsare expected to meet a minimum interim target ratio for qualifying totalcapital to weighted risk assets of 7.25 percent, at least one-half of whichshould be in the form of Tier 1 capital. For purposes of meeting the 1990interim target, the amount of loan loss reserves that may be included incapital is limited to 1.5 percent of weighted risk assets and up to 10percent of an organization's Tier 1 capital may consist of supplementarycapital elements. Thus, the 7.25 percent interim target ratio implies aminimum ratio of Tier 1 capital to weighted risk assets of 3.6 percent(one-half of 7.25) and a minimum ratio of core capital elements to weightedrisk assets ratio of 3.25 percent (nine-tenths of the Tier 1 capital ratio).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\5\\7\ The Basle capital framework does not establish an initialminimum standard for the risk-based capital ratio before the end of 1990.However, for the purpose of calculating a risk-based capital ratio priorto year-end 1990, no sublimit is placed on the amount of the allowancefor loan and lease losses includable in Tier 2. In addition, this frameworkpermits, under temporary transition arrangements, a certain percentageof an organization's Tier 1 capital to be made up of supplementary capitalelements. In particular, supplementary elements may constitute 25 percentof an organization's Tier 1 capital (before the deduction of goodwill)up to the end of 1990; from year-end 1990 up to the end of 1992, this allowablepercentage of supplementary elements in Tier 1 declines to 10 percent ofTier 1 (before the deduction of goodwill). Beginning on December 31, 1992,supplementary elements may not be included in Tier 1. The amount of subordinateddebt and intermediate-term preferred stock temporarily included in Tier1 under these arrangements will not be subject to the sublimit on the amountof such instruments includable in Tier 2 capital. While the transitionalarrangements allow an organization to include supplementary elements inTier 1 on a temporary basis, the amount of perpetual preferred stock thatmay be included in a bank holding company's Tier 1_both during and afterthe transition period_is, as described in section II(A), based solely upona specified percentage of the organization's permanent core capital elements(that is, common equity, perpetual preferred stock, and minority interestin the equity of consolidated subsidiaries), not upon total Tier 1 elementsthat temporarily include Tier 2 items. Once the amount of supplementaryitems that may temporarily qualify as Tier 1 elements is determined, goodwillmust be deducted from the sum of this amount and the amount of the organization'spermanent core capital elements for the purpose of calculating Tier 1 (netof goodwill), Tier 2, and total capital.<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Attachment I._Sample Calculation of Risk-Based Capital Ratio for BankHolding Companies</T4><H1>  </H1><H1> </H1>Example of a banking organization with $6,000 in total capital and thefollowing assets and off-balance sheet items:Balance Sheet Assets:<ITAG tagnum="3">Cash</ITAG><D>$5,000</D><ITAG tagnum="3">U.S. Treasuries</ITAG><D>20,000</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Balances at domestic banks</ITAG><D>5,000</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Loans secured by first liens on 1-4 family residential properties</ITAG><D>5,000</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Loans to private corporations</ITAG><D>65,000</D><R>n,s</R><ITAG tagnum="4">Total Balance Sheet Assets<D>$100,000</D><R>n,d</R></ITAG>Off-Balance Sheet Items:<ITAG tagnum="3">Standby letters of credit (``SLCs'') backing general obligation debtissues of U.S. municipalities (``GOs'')</ITAG><D>$10,000</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Long-term legally binding commitments to private corporations</ITAG><D>20,000</D><R>n,s</R><ITAG tagnum="4">Total Off/Balance Sheet Items<D>$30,000</D></ITAG>This bank holding company's total capital to <T3>total</T3> assets (leverage) ratio would be: ($6,000/$100,000)=6.00%.To compute the bank holding company's weighted risk assets:1. Compute the credit equivalent amount of each off-balance sheet (``OBS'')item.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>6,L1(0,0,0),tp0,i1,s300,10,1,10,1,10</C> <H1>OBS item</H1><H1>Face value</H1><H1> </H1><H1>Conversion factor</H1><H1> </H1><H1>Credit equivalent amount</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">SLCS backing municipal GOs<D>$10,000</D><D>andmultiply;</D><D>1.00</D><D>=</D><D>$10,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Long-term commitments to private corporations<D>$20,000</D><D>andmultiply;</D><D>0.50</D><D>=</D><D>$10,000</D></ITAG>2. Multiply each balance sheet asset and the credit equivalent amount ofeach OBS item by the appropriate risk weight.0% Category:<ITAG tagnum="3">Cash</ITAG><D>5,000</D><ITAG tagnum="3">U.S. Treasuries</ITAG><D>20,000</D><R>n,s,nandCx.3;</R><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>25,000</D><D>andmultiply;</D><D>0</D><D>=</D><D>0</D><R>n,d,nandCx.3;</R>20% Category:<ITAG tagnum="3">Balances at domestic banks</ITAG><D>5,000</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Credit equivalent amounts of SLCs backing GOs of U.S. municipalities</ITAG><D>10,000</D><R>n,s</R><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>15,000</D><D>andmultiply;</D><D>.20</D><D>=</D><D>$3,000</D><R>n,d,nandCx.3;</R>50% Category:<ITAG tagnum="3">Loans secured by first liens on 1-4 family residential properties</ITAG><D>5,000</D><D>andmultiply;</D><D>.50</D><D>=</D><D>$2,500</D><R>n,d,nandCx.3;</R>100% Category:<ITAG tagnum="3">Loans to private corporations</ITAG><D>65,000</D><ITAG tagnum="3">Credit equivalent amounts of long-term committments to private corporations</ITAG><D>10,000</D><R>n,s,n,n,n,n</R><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D>$75,000</D><D>andmultiply;</D><D>1.00</D><D>=</D><D>75,000</D><R>n,n,n,n,n,s</R><ITAG tagnum="4">Total Risk-weighted Assets<D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>80,500</D></ITAG>This bank holding company's ratio of total capital to weighted risk assets(risk-based capital ratio) would be: ($6,000/$80,500)=7.45%</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Attachment II._Summary Definition of Qualifying Capital for Bank HoldingCompanies* (Using the Year-End </T4>1992<T4> Standards)</T4><H1>Components </H1><H1>Minimum requirements after transition period</H1><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>Core Capital (Tier 1)</T3><D>Must equal or exceed 4% of weighted risk assets.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Common stockholders' equity<D>No limit.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Qualifying cumulative and noncumulative perpetual preferred stock<D>Limited to 25% of the sum of common stock, minority interests, and qualifyingperpetual preferred stock.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Minority interest in equity accounts of consolidated subsidiaries<D>Organizations should avoid using minority interests to introduce elementsnot otherwise qualifying for Tier 1 capital.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Less: Goodwill \1\</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>Supplementary Capital (Tier 2)</T3><D>Total of Tier 2 is limited to 100% of Tier 1.\2\</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Allowance for loan and lease losses<D>Limited to 1.25% of weighted risk assets.\2\</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Perpetual preferred stock<D>No limit within Tier 2.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Hybrid capital instruments, perpetual debt, and mandatory convertiblesecurities<D>No limit within Tier 2.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Subordinated debt and intermediate-term preferred stock (original weightedaverage maturity of 5 years or more)<D>Subordinated debt and intermediate-term preferred stock are limitedto 50% of Tier 1;\3\ amortized for capital purposes as they approach maturity.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Revaluation reserves (equity and building)<D>Not included; organizations encouraged to disclose; may be evaluatedon a case-by-case basis for international comparisons; and taken into accountin making an overall assessment of capital.</D></ITAG><T3>Deductions (from sum of Tier 1 and Tier 2):</T3><ITAG tagnum="3">Investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries </ITAG><D>As a general rule, one-half of the aggregate investments will be deductedfrom Tier 1 capital and one-half from Tier 2 capital.\4\</D><ITAG tagnum="13">Reciprocal holdings of banking organizations' capital securities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="13">Other deductions (such as other subsidiaries or joint ventures) asdetermined by supervisory authority</ITAG><D>On a case-by-case basis or as a matter of policy after formal rulemaking.</D><ITAG tagnum="1"><T3>Total Capital (Tier 1+Tier 2-Deductions)</T3><D>Must equal or exceed 8% of weighted risk assets.</D><F>* See discussion in section II of the guidelines for a complete descriptionof the requirements for, and the limitations on, the components of qualifyingcapital.</F><F> </F><F> </F><F> </F><F> </F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Attachment III_Summary of Risk Weights and Risk Categories for BankHolding Companies</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Category 1: Zero Percent </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Cash (domestic and foreign) held in subsidiary depository institutionsor in transit. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Balances due from Federal Reserve Banks (including Federal ReserveBank stock) and central banks in other OECD countries. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Direct claims on, and the portions of claims that are unconditionallyguaranteed by, the U.S. Treasury and U.S. Government agencies \1\<NOTE/> and the central governments of other OECD countries, andlocal currency claims on, and the portions of local currency claims thatare unconditionally guaranteed by, the central governments of non-OECDcountries (including the central banks of non-OECD countries), to the extentthat subsidiary depository institutions have liabilities booked in thatcurrency.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ For the purpose of calculating the risk-based capitalratio, a U.S. Government agency is defined as an instrumentality of theU.S. Government whose obligations are fully and <T3>explicitly</T3> guaranteed as to the timely payment of principal andinterest by the full faith and credit of the U.S. Government. <ITAG tagnum="21">4. Gold bullion held in the vaults of a subsidiary depository institutionor in another's vaults on an allocated basis, to the extent offset by goldbullion liabilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Category 2: 20 Percent </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Cash items in the process of collection. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. All claims (long- or short-term) on, and the portions of claims(long- or short-term) that are guaranteed by, U.S. depository institutionsand OECD banks. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Short-term claims (remaining maturity of one year or less) on,and the portions of short-term claims that are guaranteed by, non-OECDbanks. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. The portions of claims that are conditionally guaranteed by thecentral governments of OECD countries and U.S. Government agencies, andthe portions of local currency claims that are conditionally guaranteedby the central governments of non-OECD countries, to the extent that subsidiarydepository institutions have liabilities booked in that currency. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Claims on, and the portions of claims that are guaranteed by, U.S.Government-sponsored agencies.\2\<NOTE/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ For the purpose of calculating the risk-based capitalratio, a U.S. Government-sponsored agency is defined as an agency originallyestablished or chartered to serve public purposes specified by the U.S.Congress but whose obligations are not explicitly guaranteed by the fullfaith and credit of the U.S. Government. <ITAG tagnum="21">6. General obligation claims on, and the portions of claims that areguaranteed by the full faith and credit of, local governments and politicalsubdivisions of the U.S. and other OECD local governments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Claims on, and the portions of claims that are guaranteed by, officialmultilateral lending institutions or regional development banks. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. The portions of claims that are collateralized \3\ by securitiesissued or guaranteed by the U.S. Treasury the central governments of otherOECD countries, U.S. Government agencies, U.S. Government-sponsored agencies,or by cash on deposit in the subsidiary depository institution. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9. The portions of claims that are collateralized \3\<NOTE/> by securities issued by official multilateral lending institutionsor regional development banks. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\3\ The extent of collateralization is determined by currentmarket value.<ITAG tagnum="21">10. Certain privately-issued securities representing indirect ownershipof mortgage-backed U.S. Government agency or U.S. Government-sponsoredagency securities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11. Investments in shares of a fund whose portfolio is permitted tohold only securities that would qualify for the zero or 20 percent riskcategories.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Category 3: 50 Percent </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Loans fully secured by first liens on 1-4 family residential propertiesthat have been made in accordance with prudent underwriting standards,that are performing in accordance with their original terms, and are notpast due or in nonaccrual status, and certain privately-issued mortgage-backedsecurities representing indirect ownership of such loans. (Loans made forspeculative purposes are excluded.) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Revenue bonds or similar claims that are obligations of U.S. stateor local governments, or other OECD local governments, but for which thegovernment entity is committed to repay the debt only out of revenues fromthe facilities financed. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Credit equivalent amounts of interest rate and foreign exchangerate related contracts, except for those assigned to a lower risk category.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Category 4: 100 Percent </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. All other claims on private obligors. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Claims on, or guaranteed by, non-OECD foreign banks with a remainingmaturity exceeding one year. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Claims on, or guaranteed by, non-OECD central governments thatare not included in item 3 of Category 1 of item 4 of Category 2; all claimson non-OECD state or local governments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Obligations issued by U.S. state of local governments, or otherOECD local governments (including industrial development authorities andsimilar entities), repayable solely by a private party or enterprise. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Premises, plant, and equipment; other fixed assets; and other realestate owned. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. Investments in any unconsolidated subsidiaries, joint ventures,or associated companies_if not deducted from capital. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. Instruments issued by other banking organizations that qualifyas capital_if not deducted from capital. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. Claims on commercial firms owned by a government. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9. All other assets, including any intangible assets that are notdeducted from capital.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Attachment IV_Credit Conversion Factors for Off-Balance Sheet Itemsfor Bank Holding Companies</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">100 Percent Conversion Factor</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Direct credit substitutes. (These include general guarantees ofindebtedness and all guarantee-type instruments, including standby lettersof credit backing the financial obligations of other parties.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Risk participations in bankers acceptances and direct credit substitutes,such as standby letters of credit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Sale and repurchase agreements and assets sold with recourse thatare not included on the balance sheet.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. Forward agreements to purchase assets, including financing facilities,on which drawdown is <T3>certain.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. Securities lent for which the banking organization is at risk.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">50 Percent Conversion Factor</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Transaction-related contingencies. (These include bid bonds, performancebonds, warranties, and standby letters of credit backing the nonfinancialperformance of other parties.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Unused portions of commitments with an original maturity\1\<NOTE/> exceeding one year, including underwriting commitments andcommercial credit lines.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\Remaining maturity may be used until year-end 1992.<ITAG tagnum="21">3. Revolving underwriting facilities (RUFs), note issuance facilities(NIFs), and similar arrangements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">20 Percent Conversion Factor</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Short-term, self-liquidating trade-related contingencies, includingcommercial letters of credit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Zero Percent Conversion Factor</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Unused portions of commitments with an original maturity\1\ ofone year or less, or which are unconditionally cancellable at any time,provided a separate credit decision is made before each drawing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Credit Conversion for Interest Rate and Foreign Exchange Contracts</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The total replacement cost of contracts (obtained by summing the positivemark-to-market values of contracts) is added to a measure of future potentialincreases in credit exposure. This future potential exposure measure iscalculated by multiplying the total notional value of contracts by oneof the following credit conversion factors, as appropriate:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L2,tp0,i1,s25,10,10 </C> <H1>Remaining Maturity </H1><H1>Interest Rate Contracts (percent) </H1><H1>Exchange Rate Contracts (percent)</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">One year or less <D>0 </D><D>1.0</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Over one year <D>0.5 </D><D>5.0</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">No potential exposure is calculated for single currency interest rateswaps in which payments are made based upon two floating rate indices,that is, so called floating/floating or basis swaps. The credit exposureon these contracts is evaluated solely on the basis of their mark-to-marketvalue. Exchange rate contracts with an original maturity of fourteen daysor less are excluded. Instruments traded on exchanges that require dailypayment of variation margin are also excluded. The only form of nettingrecognized is netting by novation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Attachment V_Calculation of Credit Equivalent Amounts Interest Rateand Foreign Exchange Rate Related Transactions for Bank Holding Companies</T4><H1>Type of contract (remaining maturity)</H1><H1>Potential exposure</H1><H2>Notional principal (dollars)</H2><H2>x</H2><H2>Potential exposure conversion factor</H2><H2>=</H2><H2>Potential exposure (dollars)</H2><H1>+</H1><H1>Current exposure</H1><H2>Replacement cost \1\</H2><H2>Current exposure (dollars) \2\</H2><H1>=</H1><H1>Credit equivalent amount (dollars)</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">(1) 120-day forward foreign exchange <D>5,000,000 </D><D>  </D><D>.01 </D><D>  </D><D>50,000 </D><D>  </D><D>100,000 </D><D>100,000 </D><D>  </D><D>150,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(2) 120-day forward foreign exchange <D>6,000,000 </D><D>  </D><D>.01 </D><D>  </D><D>60,000 </D><D>  </D><D>^120,000 </D><D>0 </D><D>  </D><D>60,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(3) 3-year single-currency fixed/floating interest rate swap <D>10,000,000 </D><D>  </D><D>.005 </D><D>  </D><D>50,000 </D><D>  </D><D>200,000 </D><D>200,000 </D><D>  </D><D>250,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(4) 3-year single currency fixed/floating interest rate swap <D>10,000,000 </D><D>  </D><D>.005 </D><D>  </D><D>50,000 </D><D>  </D><D>^250,000 </D><D>0 </D><D>  </D><D>50,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">(5) 7-year cross-currency floating/floating interest rate swap <D>20,000,000 </D><D>  </D><D>.05 </D><D>  </D><D>1,000,000 </D><D>  </D><D>^1,300,000 </D><D>0 </D><D>  </D><D>1,000,000</D><R>n,s,n,n,n,n,n,n,n,n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total <D>$51,000,000 </D><D>  </D><D> </D><D>  </D><D> </D><D>  </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>  </D><D>$1,510,000</D><F>\1\ These numbers are purely for illustration.</F><F>\2\ The larger of zero or a positive mark-to-market value.</F></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Attachment VI._Summary</T4><H1> </H1><H1>Transitional arrangements for bank holding companies</H1><H2>Initial</H2><H2>Year-end 1990</H2><H1>Final arrangement_Year-end 1992</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">1. Minimum standard of total capital to weighted risk assets<D>None</D><D>7.25%</D><D>8.0%.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">2. Definition of Tier 1 capital<D>Common equity, qualifying cum. and noncum. perpetual preferred stock,\1\and minority interests, </D><T3>plus </T3>supplementary elements,\2\ <T3>less </T3>goodwill.\3\<D>Common equity, qualifying cum. and noncum. perpetual preferred stock,\1\and minority interests, </D><T3>plus </T3>supplementary elements,\4\ <T3>less </T3>goodwill.\3\<D>Common equity, qualifying cum. and noncom. perpetual preferred stock,\1\and minority interests, </D><T3>less </T3>goodwill.\3\</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">3. Minimum standard of Tier 1 capital to weighted risk assets<D>None</D><D>3.625%</D><D>4.0%.</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">4. Minimum standard of stockholders' equity to weighted risk assets<D>None</D><D>3.25%</D><D>4.0%.</D></ITAG>5. Limitations on supplementary capital elements:<ITAG tagnum="3">a. Allowance for loan and lease losses</ITAG><D>No limit within Tier 2</D><D>1.5% of weighted risk assets</D><D>1.25% of weighted risk assets.</D><ITAG tagnum="3">b. Perpetual preferred stock</ITAG><D>No limit within Tier 2</D><D>No limit within Tier 2</D><D>No limit within Tier 2.</D><ITAG tagnum="3">c. Hybrid capital instruments, perpetual debt, and mandatory convertibles</ITAG><D>No limit within Tier 2</D><D>No limit within Tier 2</D><D>No limit within Tier 2.</D><ITAG tagnum="3">d. Subordinated debt and intermediate term preferred stock</ITAG><D>Combined maximum of 50% of Tier 1</D><D>Combined maximum of 50% of Tier 1</D><D>Combined maximum of 50% of Tier 1.</D><ITAG tagnum="3">c. Total qualifying Tier 2 capital</ITAG><D>May not exceed Tier 1 capital</D><D>May not exceed Tier 1 capital</D><D>May not exceed Tier 1 capital.</D><ITAG tagnum="1">6. Definition of total capital<D/>Tier 1 <T3>plus </T3>Tier 2 <T3>less:</T3><D/>Tier 1 <T3>plus </T3>Tier 2 <T3>less:</T3><D>Tier 1 </D><T3>plus </T3>Tier 2 <T3>less:</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D/>_reciprocal holdings of banking organizations' capital instruments<D/>_reciprocal holdings of banking organizations' capital instruments<D/>_reciprocal holdings of banking organizations' capital instruments<ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG><D/>_investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries.\5\<D/>_investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries.\5\<D/>_investments in unconsolidated subsidiaries.\5\<F>\1\Perpetual preferred stock is limited within Tier 1 to 25% of thesum of common stockholders' equity, qualifying perpetual preferred stock,and minority interests.</F><F>\2\ Supplementary elements may be included in the Tier 1 up to 25% ofthe sum of Tier 1 plus good will.</F><F>\3\ See the guidelines for discussion of relevant definitions and grandfatheringarrangements for goodwill.</F><F>\4\ Supplementary elements may be included in Tier 1 up to 10% of thesum of Tier 1 plus goodwill.</F><F>\5\ As a general rule, one-half (50%) of the aggregate amount of investmentswill be deducted from Tier 1 capital and one-half (50%) from Tier 2 capital.A proportionally greater amount may be deducted from Tier 1 capital ifthe risks associated with the subsidiary so warrant.</F></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, January 18, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">William W. Wiles,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary of the Board.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-1587 Filed 1-26-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6210-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>